Chapter 1.

"I'm hungry."

How weak must the voice of the two-year-old have been? Yet, it echoed throughout the underground storage room. The place was as empty as the child’s stomach.

"Natty."

Natalia, lying next to the boy wrapped in a blanket, did not reply. Her vacant eyes, fixed only on the dark ceiling, seemed to have lost the ability to hear.

"Natty..."

The child, lacking the strength to even shake his sister, could only whimper through his mouth.

"My stomach..."

Struggling even with that simple phrase, the boy briefly opened his mouth and finished his thought.

"My stomach, hungry."

"...Be quiet."

"Why?"

"If you don't be quiet, the bad men will come and eat us."

A two-year-old infant and a ten-year-old girl.

The ten-year-old, no longer innocent, knew well what would happen if they drew any attention. But the two-year-old was simply too young to grasp the world’s rapid descent into chaos.

"Sniff, sniff..."

The baby started to sob and suddenly burst into tears.

"I’m hungry!"

"Be quiet!"

Natalia clapped a hand over her brother's mouth and quickly sat up. Her frightened eyes were glued to the trapdoor in the ceiling, where the curtain was slightly drawn aside.

Up there, bloodthirsty, slaughter-hungry monsters were likely prowling, searching for them. The girl's pale eyes trembled.

"Stop... please stop crying..."

No sounds were audible from outside, drowned out by the weeping. Even though she pressed hard against her little brother's mouth, trying to block the noise with her trembling hands was useless.

"Sob, huuu..."

If the soldiers heard this sound and rushed in, they would surely die. Perhaps it would be better to die quickly if that was the case.

"Please, quiet! Hush..."

While her little brother continued to cry, Natalia finally broke down in tears herself.

She regretted it so much. If only she hadn't brought the rotten potatoes two days ago.

'I should have just starved him until he had no strength left to cry. I should have just let him die.'

Yes, it was better to die.

Living a life worse than death made you wonder why people grieved for those who had gone before. They should be congratulated instead.

"Mommy."

"I'm going to look for Mommy, then."

The moment her little brother suggested going to find their mother, Natalia, acting on impulse, grabbed a pillow.

The girl's eyes, which had dried from endlessly shedding tears onto her brother's tear-stained face, were incomparably dry now as she lowered the pillow, yellowed from tears, toward him.

Natalia clearly loved her brother—no, her siblings.

But that was a story from before life became a curse more painful than death. A story from the time when she was only told she was a perpetual foreigner in this land.

It seems like a distant era, yet it took only one month for everything to change completely.

A lonely village hidden deep within a dense forest. The outskirts of a kingdom where electricity was a luxury. A poverty-stricken countryside where the distinction between landowners and tenant farmers was strictly enforced, yet outwardly indistinguishable.

In such a place, Natalia was born the second child to the tenant farmer, Mr. Ludnique, and the only daughter among the many sons of her father, grandfather, and mother. Her father, grandfather, and generations before had all lived on that land. To think she would be called a foreigner in her own home.

"Rozelliana."

Occasionally, when the hunting season arrived, outsiders with long rifles slung over their shoulders would pass through the village and call her a foreigner.

Natalia, who could not go to school, did not know what the word meant. All she knew was that beyond the forest and across the immense lake lay a kingdom called Constanza. And the kingdom she lived in was called Mercia.

"The outsiders call me a Rozelliana, but where is Rozelle?"

Curious, she asked the oldest, most knowledgeable villager. The answer was simple: there was no such country.

"There is no such country."

"But since we live in Mercia, aren't we Mercians?"

"That's what's written on the paper."

It wasn't until she was eight that she realized the truth. The people of the five surrounding villages were listed as Mercians in the thick book at the town hall, but in reality, they called themselves Rozellians.

A thousand years ago, a certain nomadic people who had lost their homeland and wandered the continent settled in this forest. The customs and blood of those from the long-forgotten Rozelle naturally mingled with the bloodlines of Constanza and Mercia over time. Their writing was also a dialect, a blend of Mercian and Constanzan.

"Somehow, the men from outside the forest have interesting accents."

"Natalia, don't get too close to the outsiders. You'll only hear the sounds of mongrel dogs."

What was wrong with mongrel dogs? Natalia adored her three mongrel dogs.

And so, Natalia grew up, completely unaware of her true status or what kind of existence she was outside the forest.

This ignorance lasted until the year she turned ten, before the war broke out.

Constanza and Mercia traditionally had a poor relationship. The peace that had been maintained for 30 years after the last war shattered overnight.

"Damn it, the dog pack from Constanza charged into the field at the western edge of the lake!"

With the ready-to-harvest fields burning day and night, the rising black smoke was clearly visible from the village. It was then that Natalia saw a plane for the very first time.

'Incredible. How can such a large piece of metal fly like a bird?'

The ignorant girl of the forest, without newspapers or radios, had no idea of the terror of war. For her, war was merely a game where boys pretended sticks were guns and made shooting noises with their mouths.

Soon enough, the young men of the village had to pick up real weapons. Natalia's fifteen-year-old brother was taken away by the approaching Mercian army in three trucks.

Watching the backs of the forcefully conscripted young men leaving, the older villagers murmured worriedly aloud.

"I wonder if using the Rozellians only as bullet shields is a good idea."

"Wouldn't it be better to wear a military uniform instead? You wouldn't have to carry the stigma of being a Constanzan."

It wasn't long before she completely and painfully understood what that meant.

The frontline shifted to the east, where Natalia lived. The peaceful forest village, which had been left in quiet for a month with the armies of both countries fighting victories and defeats on either side, suddenly became a hell on earth.

The livestock that had been raised, the stored grain, and the firewood for winter were all taken. Some houses were turned to ashes by fire, and others into piles of rubble by bombardment. Planes were no longer fascinating.

But that was not the most terrible thing.

"These filthy mongrel dogs of the Mercians!"

When the Constanzan army arrived, she was a Mercian.

"There was a report that this village is helping the Constanzan army. Traitors will be regarded as enemy soldiers and executed immediately."

When the Mercian army arrived, she became a Constanzan.

Knowing nothing, more and more people were dragged away by soldiers, falsely accused of being enemy enemies, and executed. Some were taken into the forest and never returned.

By then, fear outweighed hunger. Natalia was too frightened to go to the forest where she used to pick mushrooms and wild strawberries, dreading the possibility of finding her neighbors in a terrible state. Even then, young Natalia did not know how or why they had died, but the smell of death and fear emanating from the forest was unmistakable.

"Father, I can't live here anymore. Can't we just leave?"

"Natty, we can't do that."

The people could not escape. Their deep attachment to this land, which had endured persecution for a thousand years, was more than just extraordinary.

"If we leave, we will all die."

Whether in Constanza or Mercia, the fate of being considered a foreigner and facing death remained the same wherever they went.

From then on, Natalia envied her brother, who had become a Mercian and wore the Mercian army uniform.

As they were isolated in the village, waiting for the frontline to retreat in either direction, the once-kind villagers changed.

One person saved their own life by sacrificing a neighbor, whom they had loved like family, by falsely accusing them of being a Constanzan. Then, when the Constanzan army arrived, those who had pressured for Mercian support were cornered as accomplices and either hanged or burned alive.

Many innocents were swallowed by the madness of the village and perished. That is how Natalia's father died. That is how her mother died.

Natalia's younger siblings began to disappear one by one. Two children, unable to bear their hunger, were seen entering the forest. And those same two children have never been seen again to this day.

"They must have escaped and survived."

They knew it was a lie that no one believed.

Those who barely survived began to die of starvation. They even ate the dog they raised; there was no longer any need for excuses. They resorted to killing each other and stealing without the pretense of necessity.

The war revealed the depths of human depravity. Among them, the Natalia Ludnique who used to share even a single bean had died. She did not hesitate to steal food and clothing from the deceased.

Until she reached the point of killing the younger brother she had raised on her own...

"Mommy."

"I'm going to look for Mommy, then."

It was the very moment she was about to press a thick pillow onto her little brother's face. But suddenly, a word that should not have come from the mouth of a two-year-old child slipped out.

Chapter 2.

"I want to die."

The words, mixed with sobs, forcefully pierced her heart. Something unexpectedly sprouted from the cracks in her soul, a place where it seemed all emotion had been completely dried up.

"Sniff..."

At an age when her little brother shouldn't even know what death is, he had already learned. Tears fell from the girl's eyes onto her trembling hands as she held the pillow.

What will become of me if he dies?

Natalia threw the pillow away and tightly embraced her little brother.

"I'm sorry. I am so sorry."

"Natty, I'd rather die."

"You won't die. Just hold on until the sun comes out and I find something to eat. Okay? Promise me."

Sadly, her will to live was in vain, as her little brother froze to death that very night. Her mourning was brief, and her relief, longer. Indeed, in the face of war, human kindness was a luxury.

"Search everywhere! Don't let a single mouse escape! Kill those who resist!"

On the night following a month of isolation, the massacre began again.

When the men in Constanzan military uniform burst in, Natalia fled and hid in the back barn.

"Please spare my life, please!"

From her hiding spot in the pile of straw, Natalia could only hear the sound of the kind neighbor—who had shared rotten potatoes with her just days ago—being murdered.

'Please save me.'

With trembling hands, she pleaded to God for her own life, not for the woman's.

Even a night that seemed endless had an end. Following a bombardment in the early morning, silence soon fell.

Just before dawn, Natalia crept out of the barn. She had to search the neighbor's house before anyone else did. Perhaps there would be more rotten potatoes in the cellar.

'Hungry, hungry.'

The girl staggered across the frost-covered yard on legs so thin only bones remained.

She didn't have the strength to make the sign of the cross or offer condolences. She merely shuffled past the neighbor's lifeless body lying on the cold ground.

The sound of a motor could be heard from beyond the farm.

'It's a car.'

Natalia froze at the ominous sign.

"I have to hide."

The sound of the car soon stopped, and the clatter of boots and men's voices followed. It was a much worse sign.

"Search for any surviving civilians or soldiers. If there are any, make sure to capture them and bring them to me."

It was a Mercian. To her, a Rozellian, the Mercian army was no longer an ally.

Natalia, who lacked the strength to run back to the barn, quickly devised a plan. She lay down next to the elderly woman's body in a pool of dried blood.

Creak.

Her heart clenched at the sound of the ice breaking.

Tak tak.

The sound of dozens of footsteps drew closer.

Natalia, withered from starvation and with a parched face, smeared dried blood onto her body, then squeezed her eyes shut.

'Oh God, please make them believe I am dead.'

The cold blood seeped through her thin clothes and stained her itching skin. She trembled at the thought that it would soon be replaced by her own warm blood.

'If I move, they will know I'm alive. Please, please, stop.'

The girl held her breath with her last remaining strength, trying to stop herself from shaking. Meanwhile, the sound of the boots grew louder than her own heartbeat.

Two steps approached Natalia. A click, followed by a sharp shout, pierced her ears.

"Found two dead civilians!"

As soon as she let out a sigh of relief, a heavier set of footsteps began to approach from the distance. The weighty, resonant sound ceased right near her head.

From that moment on, in the ominous silence, the sound of her heartbeats began to tick in her ears like a time bomb.

"Hmm..."

She felt someone crouch down near her. A warm breath brushed across her cold skin. Someone was examining her face closely.

Her throat, already constricted, tightened even further under the scrutiny.

"Huh..."

The moment a strange touch reached her neck, she almost gasped for breath. Startled, her rapidly beating heart began to buzz in her ears.

"The girl is alive."

As soon as the hand checking her pulse retreated, she would be sentenced to death. She would be lucky to be executed on the spot.

"Oh God, please kill me."

The prayer for salvation had turned into a plea for immediate death.

"You were pretending to be dead next to the corpse."

The body lying on the cold ground was suddenly lifted up. Natalia froze and trembled at the human warmth she had felt for the first time in a long while.

"Smart girl, will you tell me your name?"

Faced with the man's quick question, Natalia stopped playing dead and opened her eyes.

"Hah."

Under the brim of the officer's cap, she met his deep blue eyes and lost her breath. The man holding her was a young officer dressed in the Mercian military uniform.

From the moment an unfamiliar body temperature enveloped her, the image of being dragged by such a soldier into a bedroom or a forest kept coming to her mind, and now it was starting to become a reality.

"No, I don't want to."

"You don't have to be afraid. I am not trying to kill you."

Natalia felt even greater despair at the words that he would not kill her.

"I don't like it. Just kill me, please, sob..."

She thought that if she cried out loud and begged for death, he would find her annoying and kill her instantly. But why did this officer have such a painful expression on his face?

He took off his thick wool coat and wrapped Natalia in it, then lifted the trembling girl and ordered the driver of the car stopped in the street to drive.

"To the hospital immediately."

The man did not drag Natalia to a bed.

He treated the wounded girl, fed the starving girl, and clothed the naked girl.

He gave her a home when she lost her house, and he even became her only family after she lost her own.

This was how the man saved Natalia.

And then he killed her.

"Giselle, your name is now Giselle Bishop."

Natalia Ludnique, daughter of a Rozellian tenant farmer, died at the hands of the man who saved her.

An angel I met in hell.

'Sir...'

As the bell for the morning worship grew clearer, the man's face became blurred. She woke from her sleep, but Giselle’s eyes remained clouded with tears.

"Why did I dream of the first time I met the Duke again?"

Giselle wiped the tears with the back of her hand. It was the first step in the ritual to welcome a new day.

"Elena, get up."

"Ugh... just 5 more minutes."

She woke Elena, the sleepyhead who shared a dorm with her.

"Good morning, Mary."

"Good morning, Giselle."

After washing the sleep from her eyes in the communal bathroom, she returned to her room and changed into her school uniform.

"Our Father in Heaven, please watch over their fragile souls, and protect both my family and the body and soul of Sir."

She offered a prayer in the chapel for the peace of her family and the well-being of the Lord. This was Giselle's morning worship before following the school schedule.

'Will I say goodbye to this ritual soon?'

There was only one month left until graduation, but a tearful morning like this might not change even after she graduates.

"Ahh."

Giselle took a deep breath as she stepped out of the chapel. The cool air of the May morning refreshed the anxiety that had been boiling inside her.

"No. There will be good news today. Let's go see."

Giselle's steps became lighter as she walked past the ivy-covered Gothic-style buildings under the warm sunlight.

"Good morning, Giselle."

"Good morning."

As she approached her destination, more girls her age appeared on the path. All were dressed in white blouses and navy pinafore dresses. Above them, the school motto, embroidered in gold thread on the chest of the emerald green cardigan, shone brightly.

Fullerton Academy.

From nobles to wealthy commoners, it was the kingdom's most prestigious boarding school for high-class girls, where Giselle spent four years away from the Lord...

"Giselle! Over here!"

The moment she entered the dining hall, Elena's voice cut through the noise. Instantly, the dining hall, filled with hundreds of students, fell silent.

Everyone was looking at her. Giselle pretended not to notice the meaning behind those stares and walked toward the center of the dining hall, where Elena was seated.

Her eyes were fixed on the newspaper placed next to her friend's meal. She set her untouched food down and picked up the paper. Without even sitting, she quickly flipped through the list on the front page.

There was only one name Giselle was looking for.

Edwin Eccleston.

A hero, an army captain with the title attached to his name, and a Duke with close ties to the royal family.

"And Sir."

It was a name that had to be at the top of the list, considering his position and reputation.

Chapter 3.

Even knowing this, Giselle stubbornly scrutinized the list of names—which contained nothing more than common soldiers—all the way to the end. How many times did she have to comb over it from the very start just to find him?

"I found it!"

Meanwhile, intermittent cheers could be heard from somewhere else in the dining hall, coming from the students who had found the name they were looking for.

Finally acknowledging that her efforts had been in vain, Giselle reluctantly stopped at the very last name. Elena asked cautiously,

"He's not there?"

"No, not today either."

The Duke's name was not on the list of prisoners slated for exchange in Constanza.

The war, which had briefly ceased four years ago when Duke Eccleston swept her from the battlefield, had resumed. He left Giselle at this boarding school and returned to the front.

"Giselle, if you study hard here and wait for me, I promise to return and take you with me."

"Haah, I promise."

Giselle never missed a class, resolute in keeping her promise to her Lord no matter the cost. She only missed one single day of class in the three years since she enrolled. That was the day she learned the Duke had been captured by the enemy during a mission.

"Ahhh..."

Elena glanced around as Giselle sank into her chair with a sigh. The eyes of a group of adolescent girls, gathered with their newspapers, were fixed directly upon them.

Among them, the clique that had openly despised Giselle since the Duke's safety was first jeopardized, was now full of laughter.

"Those people who only find joy in the sadness of others."

Elena bit her tongue inwardly.

"Those girls probably looked for the Eccleston surname—which has no relation to them—as soon as they received the newspaper, instead of searching for their own family member who went to war."

What relief they must have felt at finding nothing; and how long Giselle had been forced to wait for this very moment of just disappointment.

As expected, when their ringleader signaled Giselle, the girls began to move.

"Here they come."

Elena quickly warned, speaking only loud enough for the dazed Giselle to hear.

"Maintain calm, maintain elegance."

It was a phrase they recited like a military creed, the two rules of survival in a school that felt more like a battlefield where these two were treated as enemies.

There was power in the words. Giselle, who wiped the despair from her face and offered a smile, was a model of calm and elegance.

"Bishop."

The girls surrounded her, armed and ready.

"What do you want?"

"I sincerely hope you don't end up on the street again."

"A Fullerton woman on the street. Good heavens."

"Oh, that can't happen. If you need help, let us know. There are many farmers in our family who raise cows and plow the fields, looking for wives."

Despite the sarcasm—that the former peasant must return to her humble status of herding cows and working the fields—Giselle smiled slowly and elegantly and asked,

"Does your family still have land left?"

"Y-yes, of course..."

"Really? Truly? That's entirely different from the rumor I heard."

"What are you talking about now..."

"I was worried because I heard that all your land was seized by the bank due to your brother's gambling debts."

Giselle's guardian hadn't forgotten to place a weapon in her hand when sending her to a school that was like a battlefield. He gave her a lawyer's business card.

Lawyers were like the "shoulders" of the upper class.

When her professor publicly slighted her, Giselle called the number on the business card. Following the lawyer's visit, the professor's attitude changed one hundred and eighty degrees.

Noting down the list of students who were bothering Giselle, the lawyer conducted a background check and gathered their weak points for her.

"H-How dare you make such an outrageous accusation?"

So it wasn't a fabricated taunt. The fear of being immediately ostracized by the group made the girl tremble.

"No. It's not true. Bishop is lying."

However, no matter how she looked, her 'friends' had already begun secretly exchanging suspicious glances. It was truly lamentable to see the girl, trapped in a dilemma, denying defiantly while surrounded.

"Is it a lie? Could it be a calumny? I've only said what I heard. Anyway, it's a relief if it's only a rumor."

"It's not 'it's only a rumor,' but 'if it's only a rumor'."

She simply said what she had heard and walked away like a fox, leaving room for doubt.

Unable to speak or respond, the girl simply trembled. Giselle returned the insult she had received without missing a beat.

"But it's not just a rumor, so if you end up on the street soon, come look for me. I can't bear to see a Fullerton girl become a woman on the street, can I? Isn't that right?"

And to cap it off, one more thing.

"But I might forget you, so be sure to give this to my housekeeper later."

Giselle took a fountain pen from her bag and scribbled something on the corner of the newspaper before tearing it off.

"I'm generous, so I'll leave you the maid position for cleaning the bathroom."

The document written on a torn piece of newspaper was a contract promising to hire that girl as a maid in Giselle's name.

However, the name was written incorrectly. It was a subtle insult that implied Giselle didn't care enough to even know the girl's name.

Of course, the girl didn't accept and turned away. Her face, flushed with shame, looked like a ripe tomato about to burst.

"Only that? She's gotten weak."

Elena stuck out her tongue as she watched the retreating backs of the defeated enemy 'soldiers'.

In a quiet corner, the large indoor plants bent even with the slightest breeze.

"Wow, she's as elegant as a princess with her words."

The words spoken might seem elegant on the surface, but the thoughts and feelings behind them were far from it. In her heart, she wanted to curse, grab them by the hair, and shove their heads into the toilet.

However, if she were to run around acting like a brat, everyone's fingers would point toward the man who raised her.

"Maintain calm, maintain elegance."

This, too, was a creed to protect her Lord.

This time, she held the fork and knife unhurriedly and with elegance. Yet, the speed at which the food entered her mouth was of an unparalleled slowness, even factoring in her poise.

The long war was finally nearing its end. The two countries were also discussing the repatriation of prisoners of war alongside the ceasefire agreement.

The list of repatriation candidates sent by Constanza began to grow morning and evening, starting three days ago.

For Giselle, who had spent four years scrutinizing the obituary list in the newspaper, this was rare and shocking news.

"The name of Sir is not here!"

What was once a source of comfort has now turned into despair.

"The name of Sir is not here..."

The name of the man who gave Giselle a new name is not on the list of survivors. The life or death of the benefactor who gave her a new life is uncertain.

She felt as if she was chewing dirt in her mouth. Giselle got up without even finishing half of her meal.

Since the Duke is such a significant figure, he's sure to appear on the final list.

On the way across the courtyard toward the classroom, Elena exclaimed and nudged Giselle.

"Don't you think my theory—that they haven't released him yet because they are using him as a bargaining chip in Constanza—is correct?"

Giselle nodded without hesitation.

The head of the prestigious and highly respected Eccleston Dukedom, once a ruling family, still received unofficial respect both nationally and internationally.

A capable military commander with exceptional experience, he earned the rank of captain while his peers were barely starting to pin on lieutenant insignias.

Putting aside her subjective interpretation, objectively speaking, Elena's words were brimming with reason.

Of course, assuming he is alive.

"I'm truly considering specializing in politics or diplomacy."

"To Your Majesty in the future, this future beggar greets you. Please don't forget that I woke you up every morning and lent you notes during exam season."

"No."

"Seeing you without blood or tears, you truly have the natural sense of someone of the nobility."

"It's not that you're going to become a beggar. Don't worry, Giselle."

Giselle, who bravely endured throughout the war, begins to falter as it comes to an end.

It's outrageous that that group of troublemakers tries to torment her by calling her destitute.

It was widely known that even if the Duke were to perish, Giselle would not become indigent. It was rumored that the Duke had hastily revised his will before leaving for war.

It's unlikely that the Duke would hand over all assets to someone with whom he does not share a drop of blood, but even so, he would probably provide an amount that could support her for an entire lifetime.

Giselle also knows that if the Duke died, she would be left with nothing. She thinks this because she believes her Lord is everything she has.


Chapter 4.

The composition professor had the unpleasant habit of returning graded papers in descending order of marks.

"Giselle Bishop."

No one was surprised anymore that her name was called first. But what if they knew the perennial top student of the class had only learned to write at the age of ten?

'If the man who so diligently taught me the alphabet were called, he would be astonished. He would offer me a warm smile, praising me with such gentle kindness and grace.'

Giselle had carefully guarded papers marked with perfect scores for four years, dreaming only of that day.

*'They shouldn't become just a pile of meaningless papers...' *

Her bright, hopeful smile vanished effortlessly.

"Swanho is located in the border area with Constanza and historically played a crucial role in defense..."

The next class was geography. Giselle's complexion darkened further as she listened to another student’s presentation.

"It is currently occupied by Constanza and is called Schwanho, but..."

Giselle's true homeland had fallen into Constanza's hands during this war.

Over the years, the number of Rozellians had shrunk from thousands to mere hundreds. If the Duke's unit hadn't intervened to prevent the brutal massacre during the Swanho incident in the previous war, even those hundreds would have been annihilated.

At the time, Giselle was nothing more than a beaten stray puppy. Initially, she was even afraid of the man who had saved her. But how could a child not blindly follow an adult who offered food, clothing, a warm, safe place to sleep, and even affection?

"Don't worry. As long as I am here, no one can hurt you."

Soon, she began to smile at him, yet Giselle remained terrified and trembling around the other soldiers. The man had given his solemn promise to shield her.

However, not long after, the frontline finally liberated the village and moved westward.

It was a strategic necessity for the Duke's unit to leave the village and march on, but it was a catastrophe for the ten-year-old orphan who had seen far too much.

"What will become of me then?"

If he left, there would be absolutely no one left to protect her. Giselle, having witnessed so much, began to distrust not only soldiers but also the very elders of the village.

"I will go with Sir."

"Natalia, Sir is going to the battlefield."

"I know."

It was better to be in hell with a protector than in hell alone, even if it meant returning to the battlefield she had so desperately sought to flee.

The man, unable to march with a small girl, attempted to send her to an orphanage in the rear. For Giselle, that place, too, was nothing short of hell.

"They will kill me."

"Don't worry about that. No one will try to kill you anymore."

"But I am from Rozelle!"

Blinded by a profound terror of death, Giselle finally did something astonishing. She cut her hair short like a soldier with a pair of sheep shears.

That day, Giselle, now resembling a child soldier, put on an ill-fitting uniform and stood before him with utter determination.

"Natalia... why did you do this?"

The expression he wore at that moment remains unforgettable.

"I want to be a soldier too! I can carry bullets and prepare meals. And of course, I'm good at washing clothes and sewing."

Lifting her loose sleeves to reveal her arms, which had lost all muscle and were nothing but skin and bone, surely had the opposite effect.

"I can't kill people, but I'm good at hiding. I promise not to make a sound."

As soon as Giselle spoke her carefully rehearsed words without pausing for breath, she asked him earnestly,

"So, will you take me with you?"

It was a mistake to think she would gain permission, because the man only sighed while stroking her newly short, boyish hair with his large hands.

"Natalia, I'm sorry..."

"I will do everything Sir tells me. If he tells me to starve, I will starve. If he tells me to kill someone, I will kill."

The eyes of the man, who usually remained perfectly calm, trembled with urgent distress. Though the man uttered, "What?" in a bewildered voice, the sound didn't even register in her ears.

"Please, take me with you, I will do anything."

Giselle clung to his clothes and wept uncontrollably. It was the first time in her life she had wept with such abandon, even more than when her own parents had died.

"This poor, wretched child... What am I to do with you?"

Yet, the man only tried to comfort her. In the end, he never said, "Let's go together."

That was when it began. The insatiable hunger that never disappeared, not even during the most horrifying moments, suddenly vanished without a trace.

She couldn't eat anything. Even the meager food she managed to swallow, her body violently rejected, and she would vomit it up.

"I'm not hungry."

She remembers the eyes that watched her—a cold gaze, the cold eyes giving way to a sorrowful impression.

Contrary to the first impression that suggested his heart was made of ice, the man turned out to be warm and kind.

"Very well. Let us go together."

"Thank you, Sir! I will never forget this favor for the rest of my life."

"In exchange, promise me that you will always heed my words. If I run, you must run too without looking back."

"Yes, yes. I will."

Ultimately, the man had to venture onto the battlefield with a ten-year-old girl for ten long months until the war finally ceased.

Looking back now, it's a humiliating story, but back then, she truly felt she would die without the man. In reality, even reflecting on it now, Giselle would have certainly lost her life if he hadn't been there.

Even if she had somehow survived until then, it might have been a life more miserable than death.

"This is a life in the gutter that not even a mongrel would dream of..."

Throughout the class, Giselle distractedly traced the Duke's name engraved on her fountain pen. The person who taught her how to use it was also the man.

When she held the pen, warm from his hand, it felt good. The chill that once froze her heart now brought a vibrant spring to Giselle's soul.

But, unfortunately, spring never lingers long.

'Where will this winter finally end?'

Her frozen heart fixated on him in every ordinary moment of daily life. Even during the post-class discussion with the composition professor about her future, her thoughts remained tethered to him.

"Have you decided to go to Kingsbridge University?"

"Yes."

Giselle had received acceptance letters from all five universities she applied to last year. Choosing one among them, each a prestigious institution steeped in history, was a difficult task.

"If Sir were here, I would have asked him."

The place she finally chose after agonizing over the decision alone was Kingsbridge, which boasted the longest tradition. She remembered hearing him mention it was the university he wished he could have attended when he was younger.

"It's my alma mater. Soon, Bishop will no longer be my student, but my colleague."

The professor, who held Giselle in particularly high regard, lifted his spectacles and smiled kindly.

"Have you decided what to major in?"

"No, I plan to decide gradually while exploring classes."

She didn't need to discuss her major yet, as the decision wouldn't be finalized until sophomore year, but the professor had a clear motive for calling her in.

"What do you think about specializing in literature?"

"Yes?"

"I am thoroughly convinced you have talent. Writing is a way to make the world more beautiful and warm. Your writing truly possesses that power."

Referring to the subject of her previous assignment, the professor praised her prose, saying it showed the potential to be a great novelist or poet.

"Wouldn't the world be even warmer if you shared the beautiful story you carry within you with everyone?"

"Thank you very much for your generous words. I will seriously consider it."

It was a purely courteous lie. She had absolutely no intention of becoming a novelist or poet.

Giselle knew the truth. What she carried inside was not beautiful. Sharing it with the world would only make the world a more vile place. She might be able to conceal it in a short five-page paper, but in a lengthy piece of writing, there would be no way to hide the truth.

The Duke's story might be beautiful, but she wanted to keep it exclusively as her own, forever.

Besides, this was not the time to worry about a major scheduled for the following year. Instead, the most pressing concern for the coming month had to take precedence.

'Where am I supposed to go after graduation?'

They said she could move into the university residence in the fall, but the problem was the three months immediately preceding that.

Others return home, but Giselle could not possibly call the abandoned mansion home without her Lord there.

Furthermore, when Giselle came of age and became an adult, the man would legally cease to be her guardian. There would be even less reason for her to return there.

So far, the Duke's lawyer hadn't disclosed any information about her post-graduation arrangements. It seemed they would only raise the subject once the war concluded and the Duke's fate was definitively known.

Is this what it feels like to be imprisoned?

Chapter 5.

"What did he say?" Elena pressed, as they left the meeting and headed toward the dining hall for supper.

"He suggested I consider specializing in literature."

"Literature?"

Elena, who had a strong distaste for books, made a face as if she'd bitten into something repulsive.

"And what did you tell him?"

"That I'd think about it."

"Are you serious?"

"Of course not. You know me. I'm going to study something useful."

Useful, not for the world, but for her Lord.

'I am not an ungrateful leech who will fail to repay the favor I've received.'

It was only thanks to him that she could pursue a university education without a single financial worry. He had made arrangements with his lawyer before leaving for the war.

"His Excellency instructed me to utilize his personal funds to fully support Miss Bishop's education at the university of her choice, in the event he does not return before her graduation. So, please focus on your studies without worry."

Not only that, the Duke had instructed his lawyer to prepare for every conceivable future.

'It makes sense that he would plan for my welfare if I fell ill, but... why prepare for my marriage?'

The thought alone was enough to make her face burn.

'What should I become to be of the greatest help to him? I wish he had only told me before he left.'

No, she would ask him when he returned. He would surely return.

Yet, there was no mention of Edwin Eccleston in the evening newspaper received during dinner. The list had already been cut in half compared to the one that morning. By tomorrow, it would be reduced even further.

"How about we play tennis for just one hour and then tackle our homework?"

"Sounds good."

"The loser does the winner's homework..."

"Absolutely not."

Giselle stifled a deep sigh while chatting with Elena, their steps echoing along the path that led back to their dormitory.

"Rudnik!"

Someone screamed her old name from behind. Giselle ignored it and quickened her pace. As she pretended not to hear and continued walking...

Splash!

A cold deluge drenched Giselle.

Water streamed from her eyelashes, and she instinctively squeezed her eyes shut. The liquid seeped through her thin cardigan, immediately soaking her blouse and sending a profound shiver through her body.

It was ice-cold water, poured from a bucket and aimed directly at her head.

This was hardly the first time such a thing had happened.

A commoner, a mere Rosel girl, attending a prestigious school for the aristocracy, sponsored by the kingdom's most desired bachelor, the head of a family almost as revered as the royal line. It was utterly predictable she would become a target for spite and harassment from the start.

That's why she initially concealed her Rosel heritage. As well as the fact that she attended the academy by her Lord's recommendation.

By then, she had completely abandoned her Rosel dialect and spoke the Mercian high-class language flawlessly, so no one, apart from a few professors, had known her secret during her first semester.

But secrets, as always, have a way of surfacing.

"Do you know the Rosel orphan that Duke Eccleston picked up during the Swan Lake Incident? She goes to our school."

It didn't take long for them to discover that the orphan was none other than Giselle Bishop.

And so the bullying began. Someone had even unearthed her birth name, Natalia Rudnik—the name she had cast aside due to the rampant discrimination and scorn it brought. They started calling her that just to mock her.

"Now even peasants are welcome? Fullerton is truly going downhill."

They insulted her for staining the school's prestige. But, ironically, the students from the most established, prestigious families did not participate in the harassment. For them, their own prestige superseded the school's petty dramas.

Those students simply ignored Giselle. Their interactions were strictly limited to polite exchanges during classes and club activities. They might despise her behind her back, but Giselle rarely gave them a thought.

The professors, keenly aware of the substantial donations the Duke made to the school annually in her name, were generally appreciative of her. They might harbor their personal prejudices, but as adults, they knew better than to openly display them.

The daughters of high-ranking families, those who aspired to become the Duke's wife, had their own chilling ways of tormenting her.

"So you're that poor little orphan sponsored by the Duke."

They would occasionally invite Giselle for tea or a luncheon, feigning kindness and hoping to gain his favor. But it was all a shallow ploy to remind her of her place.

All their methods were chillingly similar.

"I would just love to know how you met the Duke on the battlefield."

They would begin by probing her past, forcing her to relive her miserable origins.

"Do they eat this in those remote mountain villages?"

They would serve her delicacies that she had already grown weary of eating at the Duke's mansion, claiming they were exotic treats she couldn't possibly have experienced in her rural upbringing.

"It must have been so incredibly hard losing your parents so young."

They would shower her with pitying stares and, upon leaving, hand her a cashier's check as if it were a charitable donation to a tragically less fortunate soul.

They sought to ensure she never forgot her true station as the 'Rosel orphan,' convinced she was secretly aspiring to the Duke's wife.

'As if I would ever dream of becoming a Duchess. How utterly absurd.'

Some even dared to suggest she should become a nun. Her Lord, who once said he dreamed of walking her down the aisle like a father, would be horrified if he ever heard such a vile suggestion.

Meanwhile, the students who openly attacked her were from the school's lower social strata. Daughters of newly wealthy families or rural landowners without aristocratic titles, their acceptance into Fullerton Academy was one of the few things they could truly brag about.

It was understandable that they saw her as a bitter thorn in their side, a relentless reminder that she, a street beggar, had achieved the same standing through the patronage of a powerful man.

"God save this kingdom if these fools become teachers and mothers."

Elena, the daughter of a foreign entrepreneur, also endured discrimination and bullying. This is precisely how they had bonded, fighting side-by-side against their tormentors.

"Those little... Ugh! What on earth is this?!"

It turned out it wasn't just water. When Elena ran her hand through Giselle's hair, a dark, viscous mass fell to the ground.

It was a leech.

No wonder the water had a strange, repulsive, fishy odor.

"Quickly, wipe it off!"

When Elena thrust a handkerchief at her, Giselle wiped her handbag instead of her face.

This was infuriating. It was a gift from her Lord when she first enrolled. She had guarded it like a treasure, keeping it in pristine condition despite four years of use.

"If the Duke finds out about this, your families are finished!" Elena shrieked, shaking her fist in the air. A mocking retort came back.

"If he ever returns, that is."

After the prisoner exchange was announced, they had been quiet for a while, but as his return became increasingly doubtful, they were back to their old, vicious tricks.

"He will return," Giselle declared, gritting her teeth, her eyes fixed on the ground. Last year it was live leeches. This time, they were dead. The message was unmistakable: Her days as his "leech" were over.

"I am not a leech."

She would definitively repay his kindness. Giselle took a deep breath and deliberately crouched down.

Composure. Elegance.

Chanting her mantra, she collected the dark, slimy creatures scattered across the ground one by one, her body dripping wet like a phantom of the water.

"My goodness, she's actually touching them with her bare hands."

"How utterly foul."

Unlike Elena, who was fiercely cursing in her native language, Giselle did not react, nor did she even look up. She knew exactly who they were without glancing.

'It's those girls from this morning.'

She would have her revenge when the moment was ripe.

It was pointless to report them to the headmistress or the principal. This school was a breeding ground for rich and influential families; unless one was royalty, the administration consistently turned a blind eye to the small disputes between students.

Which, thankfully, meant they wouldn't interfere in what she did, either.

That very night, the ringleader of the group who had tormented Giselle slipped in the communal bathroom while showering and shattered her leg.

"It was Bishop! It was her!"

The girl hysterically alleged she had slipped on a leech that had suddenly dropped from above, but the damning evidence had already gone down the drain.

"You're lucky Giselle found you and reported it to the headmistress. You could have been lying there all night, your cold, dead body discovered in the morning," Elena scoffed.

"It's alright, Elena. I didn't expect a thank you."

This school was a battlefield veiled in exquisite elegance. If those girls were a chaotic band of bullies, then Giselle was a seasoned, precise soldier, taking down the enemy with swift accuracy—and then promptly calling a medic.

The following morning, a startling silence descended upon the dining hall. All eyes were on Giselle, who suddenly burst into tears.

9th Repatriation List Major Edwin Fitzgerald Eccleston

Giselle's angel had returned alive from hell.

Chapter 6.

Clank, clank, clank.

The rhythmic, ceaseless sound of the wheels grinding against the steel rails eventually startled the Duke awake from a light sleep with the sudden blare of a whistle.

Opening his eyes, his gaze settled on a young girl framed by the train window. She looked scarcely fourteen.

The child, appearing about Giselle's age, was perched atop the fence bordering the tracks, waving at the train as it hurtled past a rural settlement. Farms with tiled roofs and weathered barns clad in climbing ivy rushed by, a vivid echo of the very place where he had first encountered Giselle.

It was inevitable that his thoughts would be pulled back to that time. His expression tightened with grim memory.

A skeletal girl, smeared with someone else's blood, lying among the dead and desperately feigning death.

Her face, stark white with terror, was still burned into his mind. How could he possibly forget the utter desperation that had driven a child of only ten years to such extremes?

"No! Let go of me!"

At first, she screamed and thrashed, trying to escape him, but she quieted instantly when he produced a square of chocolate from his jacket pocket.

How ravenous must she have been to suppress her fear so utterly?

Even as she greedily stuffed every morsel he offered into her mouth, her eyes remained wary, distrustful. What unspeakable horrors had she survived?

When he gently inquired about the tragedy in her village, the child, with vacant eyes as if utterly devoid of tears, recounted the calamity in a strangely calm, detached voice. The more he learned about Giselle, the deeper the wound in his heart grew.

But at some indefinable point, the meaning Giselle held for him began to shift.

The girl who had once been petrified of him started to approach gradually. She would steal glances from the periphery, slowly draw nearer, and finally settle by his side.

Like a deeply frightened puppy, desperately starved for affection.

One day, as a silent gesture of gratitude, she secretly polished his heavy military boots...

'Thank you.'

With those two simple words, she smiled for the very first time. From that day forward, she followed him everywhere like a tenacious shadow.

Adorable was the only word that sufficed to describe her. Even now, the mere recollection of her brought a genuine smile to his face.

She would tie tiny bows onto the neck of the kitten the soldiers had found, she would relentlessly beg him for bedtime stories... Little by little, nestled in his protective presence, Giselle began to recover her stolen childhood innocence.

As he watched the child heal, Edwin himself began to mend the internal scars left by the war.

From military school to his officer's commission, he had endured endless training, but this was his first taste of real combat. The war he experienced was a bottomless tragedy.

As a commander, he could not betray his emotions to his men, but the longer the war dragged on, the more he felt he was dying inside.

Watching those children lose their innocence was the most unbearable suffering. He had enlisted to be their protector, their savior, yet his duty as a soldier had made him complicit in their agony.

He still grieved for his dead mother, killed in a house bombed due to faulty intelligence his unit had provided to the air forces. The mounds of children's bodies he found after urban battles. The young Constanzan soldiers he was forced to execute in the line of duty.

Edwin was consumed by a desperate need to atone for his sins. He made it his solemn duty to rescue every orphan he encountered on the battlefield and ensure they were sent to orphanages sponsored by his noble family.

Giselle, however, was the first child he had personally guarded until the war's conclusion—the child he had grown so profoundly attached to.

"I cannot believe it... The rumors were true... You actually brought an orphan with you to the battlefield..."

His now-deceased brother had been left utterly speechless when Edwin brought Giselle home after the war. He was even shocked and deeply impressed to see the lifelong bachelor Edwin, who had never raised a child, skillfully care for and tutor the little girl.

But ten years old was not an unusually difficult age. Moreover, Giselle was a remarkably obedient child.

The only times she ever defied him was when they were faced with separation.

"Please, take me with you."

"I cannot. The battlefield is far too dangerous for you."

Initially, he had fully intended to send her to an orphanage like the other children. But he could not force himself to do it.

A girl who had developed the desperate habit of hoarding food due to prolonged starvation, a girl who slept with a tin of biscuits clutched tightly in her arms, now lay rigid and immobile before a bowl of rich, delicious stew.

The same girl who had coated herself in blood and feigned death to survive was now openly refusing life.

'What kind of hell does this world represent to her?'

He yearned to prove to her that good people existed, that many hands in the world would reach out without asking for anything in return. Yet, despite his four years of dedicated effort, when it was time for him to leave, the child threatened to abandon life itself.

"Sir, don't leave."

When he had to depart for war again, Giselle tearfully pleaded with him, just as she had in the past. When her desperate pleas failed, she resorted to the silent protest of refusing to eat.

"Please, don't go. I want to stay here with you."

But he could not yield. As a soldier, he had a duty to his nation.

In the past, he had taken her because he feared he might never see her again if he left her. Now, things were profoundly different.

"I will return to you. I promise."

"You must return."

And so, Edwin left Giselle behind, safe within the sanctuary he had created for her.

For the past four years in the inferno of the battlefield, Edwin's thoughts were solely of her. His time as a prisoner—a torturous hell where even the Devil himself would hesitate—had been bearable only because of his rock-hard determination never to leave that child alone again.

Giselle was everything to him, just as he was everything to her.

Upon his release, he immediately demanded an exhaustive report on Giselle's welfare from his lawyer and the Headmistress of Fullerton Academy.

He was immensely relieved to learn that she was not only safe but thriving, excelling in her studies, and on track to graduate from a prestigious university. He felt a fierce, brazen pride, as though he had raised her himself, despite his long absence.

But he did not go to see her.

It was probably more accurate to admit that he could not.

Edwin stared hard at the man reflected in the train window. The man mirrored his every move, narrowing his eyes when Edwin did.

"Fullerton. Next station, Fullerton."

His internal war, which had been raging for days, only ended when the conductor passed through, loudly announcing their arrival. Edwin closed his eyes and drew a deep, shuddering breath.

He had agonized for days over whether or not to board this train.

But in the end, the pull of leaving Giselle alone on such a monumental day as her graduation had conquered him. He couldn't evade her forever, anyway.

She will come running into my arms.

As he pictured the moment of their reunion, he could almost hear her joyful voice shouting,

"Sir!"

Suddenly, a voice, chillingly detached, whispered in his ear, mocking him.

Edwin snapped his eyes open and gazed at his reflection once more. It was his face, yet he doubted that those dangerously sharp, cold eyes truly belonged to him.

He shed his suit jacket, which he had worn with an almost rigid formality throughout the journey. He unbuttoned his cuffs and forcefully rolled up his sleeves, revealing his thick, corded forearms. Scars, contrasting sharply with the faded four-leaf clover tattoo, marred his skin.

Edwin pulled a pen from his jacket and violently scrawled "Giselle" onto the skin next to the tattoo, pressing hard enough to draw blood.

Don't you dare touch her.

In an instant, he was himself again. The eyes staring back from the window were as cold and distant as a stranger's.

Perhaps it was a lie, to claim he had only thought of Giselle for the past four years.

This was the last time she would ever wear this uniform. Giselle smoothed her attire and sat upright at her desk.

"Hah..."

She couldn't suppress the weary sigh as she looked at her graduation speech.

"Nervous, Milady?" Elena, who was across the desk applying makeup, asked playfully.

"No."

It wasn't nervousness, but a profound sigh of disappointment.

What was the use of walking across that stage, of delivering the commencement address, if her Lord would not be there to witness it?

Twenty agonizing days had passed since his return.

Rumor held that he had made only a fleeting appearance at the palace to see the King upon his arrival and had since sequestered himself in his Templeton mansion, refusing all social engagements.

Which meant he wouldn't be attending her graduation ceremony either. He hadn't sent a single word confirming his presence.

People were already gossiping gleefully about how her Lord hadn't visited her yet.

"She's been abandoned."

However, the arrival of the butler from the Eccleston family's main manor in the capital later that day to collect Giselle's belongings served as solid proof that she was not forsaken.

"Do you think he's found a new orphan to shower with attention?" Some people began to maliciously spread such cruel speculations.

Chapter 7.

"Hmph, one call to the chief butler of Templeton would be enough to utterly silence those rumors."

But even if she called, she wouldn't be able to hear her Lord's voice.

"Is the Duke unwell?"

"He is not unwell, Miss Bishop."

She felt a rush of relief hearing that he was not injured.

'But... I thought he would at least visit me at school upon his return.'

Giselle slumped into her chair, utterly deflated.

"If you continue to look so somber, who is going to ask you for a date?" Elena chided, walking over. It was the same reprimand she had endured for weeks, urging Giselle to keep an eye out for eligible bachelors among the guests attending her graduation ceremony.

"I don't need a date."

"So you really intend to show up alone tonight?"

"Elena, I cannot simply ask the first eligible bachelor I see to escort me to the ball. That is absurd."

"Why not? Any gentleman with a keen eye should be dropping to his knee and saying, 'Please, grant me that honor!' the moment you mention you are unescorted. Now, chin up. I'm doing your makeup."

Giselle raised her head but recoiled in horror when her gaze fell upon Elena's eyelids, which were tinted a deep, bruised blue.

"W-Wait, how about this one instead?"

She pointed to the lightest tone on Elena's eyeshadow palette, a soft peach.

"Very well, open your eyes... How's this?"

"Isn't it a bit much?"

"This?"

Elena opened a magazine and caressed the brush while looking at the illustration. Giselle felt as though her face had become a mere canvas.

"Ah! Those look like grasshopper antennae!"

When Elena reached for a razor to thin her eyebrows to match the illustration, Giselle quickly grabbed her friend's wrist.

"Skip the eyebrows. Just do my eyes and lips."

"As you wish, Milady. There, all done. Now this..."

"You want to put that... on my cheeks? It looks like a drunken flush."

"That is the very latest makeup trend, Grandmother Giselle."

Only after being thoroughly soaked in perfume did Giselle finally turn to face the mirror.

"What's the point of dressing up? I don't want to impress anyone..."

She felt the makeup was far too heavy, but there was no time to fix it. Giselle grabbed her gown and cap and hurried out of the dorm.

The weather, unlike her mood, was perfect. The plaza in front of the auditorium, where the ceremony was scheduled to begin in ten minutes, buzzed with students, faculty, and guests.

"Excuse me."

Just as she was about to squeeze through the crowd near the entrance...

"My goodness, is that...?"

"Heavens. We weren't told they were coming."

The headmaster, who had been chatting with parents, straightened his attire and rushed toward the direction everyone was staring.

"Is the Queen visiting in person? Come on, Giselle, let's see who it is."

Giselle, who was about to step inside, was dragged back by the utterly curious Elena.

"It's not Her Majesty, is it? ...Huh?"

The moment they pushed through the crowd, Giselle froze at the sight of a luxury sedan parked in the plaza. The crest emblazoned on the rear door was unmistakable.

The Eccleston Family crest? It can't be...

The most logical explanation was that her Lord had come, but she simply could not believe it.

'He didn't even attend the welcoming ceremony at the palace. Why would he come to my graduation? Perhaps the butler came to collect my things and mistook the auditorium for the dormitory?'

While she struggled to grasp a plausible explanation, the chauffeur descended from the front seat and courteously opened the rear door.

A tall, strikingly handsome gentleman emerged, a large bouquet of flowers clutched in his hand.

He ran a hand over his slicked black hair, and his eyes scanned the crowd, searching for someone. Meanwhile, the entire assembly fell silent, gazing fixedly at him.

Some were captivated by his fame, others by his striking features. Perhaps it was the raw aura of power that emanated from his tall, imposing figure, defying his elegant three-piece suit.

Whatever the reason, the atmosphere of the plaza shifted the moment he appeared, and Giselle's world instantly turned upside down.

Even after nearly 1,500 days, she recognized him instantly. The gentleman was none other than him...

"Sir!"

It was him.

Giselle ran and flung herself into his arms. His eyes widened in surprise when their gazes met. Blinded by tears, she did not see the momentary flash of confusion in his eyes.

"I missed you so much! Why did you only come now?"

"I am sorry for the delay."

His voice, deep and smooth as the notes of a cello, his familiar scent of mint... The overwhelming relief, mixed with the aching pain of longing, nearly made her sob.

"It's alright. Don't apologize. I'm not complaining. It's just that I am so happy. I am so, so happy you came to my graduation."

"Of course I came. This is where I needed to be."

The man who had rejected all high society invitations and had shut himself away in the Templeton estate was saying her graduation was the place where he naturally belonged.

As she smiled up at him, unable to contain her joy, his Adam's apple bobbed nervously.

"You are no longer the child I knew. You have become quite the lady."

She was about to tell him how handsome he looked, despite the hardships he must have suffered on the battlefield...

"My apologies, Your Grace."

The headmaster's voice intervened sharply from behind.

"Miss Bishop has always conducted herself as a proper lady, following the teachings of Fullerton... but for a moment, she..."

"Oh."

Giselle sprang away from her Lord as if she had been burned. Her face flushed, burning with shame.

I acted like a child.

In front of a massive crowd, no less.

And I called him Sir! What have I done?

In front of others, she should have addressed him as 'Your Grace,' but her excitement had completely swept away her manners.

And to think she had just been proud of her Lord calling her a lady after acting so un-ladylike. How utterly humiliating.

His understanding and indulgent nature only deepened her shame.

"If anyone is at fault, it is I, for not informing you of my arrival ahead of time."

As she stepped back, staring at her feet, he extended his hand to her.

Giselle hesitantly placed her hand in his, his great hand dwarfing hers, making her feel like a child again.

He drew her close gently, and his warmth enveloped her as it always had.

"I wanted to surprise my little angel..."

She allowed herself to be pulled along, melting into his warmth. With a natural movement, he placed her hand in the crook of his arm.

"Have I been too naughty?"

The man who smiled down at her, his eyes full of warmth, was not Duke Eccleston. He was her Lord, the kind and loving man she had always known.

"As proud graduates of Fullerton, let us not rest on our laurels, but embrace new adventures..."

Edwin, seated in the front row of the auditorium, looked up at the valedictorian delivering her address.

The only times he had looked at Giselle, who was much shorter than him, were when she was climbing trees like a mischievous boy. He couldn't shake a strange feeling of nostalgia.

The top of her class, eh?

Edwin rested his chin in his hand, lost in thought.

This was the same child who hadn't learned to read or do simple math until the age of ten, when most children were graduating from their first school. Fullerton had been her first real school.

And now, she was the valedictorian of this prestigious academy. It was astonishing, incredibly impressive.

It meant she had worked tirelessly throughout the four years he had been gone. His worry that she wouldn't be able to manage without him had been completely unfounded.

Then why did he feel a sharp pang of emptiness in his heart amidst his pride?

Following the ceremony, Edwin walked out with Giselle. His aide took several photographs of them, side-by-side, with Giselle holding her diploma and her graduation cap.

"Giselle, I am incredibly proud of you."

"Thank you."

Instinctively, his hand rose to stroke her head, but it froze.

He used to kiss her forehead or embrace her every time he praised her. But it no longer felt appropriate.

Only when she flew into his arms did Edwin realize he was still expecting the 14-year-old Giselle he had last seen.

He had never imagined she would mature into a young woman capable of wearing such bold, sophisticated makeup with ease.

The child who had barely reached his chest was now tall enough to reach his chin. It was a marvelous thing that she had grown so well on her own, but he couldn't help but feel a sudden sadness that she had done so without waiting for him.

Yes, that must be the reason for this strange feeling.

I have finally met your atonement, your salvation.

It is only polite to greet her, as a gentleman must.

Chapter 8.

"This way, Sir."

After a rather tense tea session with the headmistress, Giselle finally had the chance to show her Lord the school.

"This was my room."

Gaining permission from the dormitory matron had been easy. Although it was a place strictly forbidden to men, exceptions were gladly made for a national hero.

Giselle's dorm room had already been emptied. She was slightly disappointed not to be able to show him how she had lived, but the sheer fact of his presence here made her heart pound with excitement.

'It really is him. The Duke.'

Even as she watched him run his large hand over the desk she had used every day for the past four years, she still couldn't quite believe it.

'It feels like a dream...'

The fact that he looked exactly the same as she remembered four years ago only made it more surreal.

Though he appeared a bit thinner, perhaps due to his year-long captivity, it was a miracle that he had returned without severe injury.

"Did the four-leaf clover protect you, Sir?"

He nodded as if it were the most obvious thing in the world.

"Did it fade?"

Giselle wanted to check for herself if the lucky charm was still there, so she reached out her hand. But he swiftly tucked his arm behind his back.

She tried to reach for it again, but he moved away as if hiding something precious. Determined, she refused to give up.

"I got you!"

"Ouch!"

Their impromptu game of catch ended with her Lord's victory, as he playfully pinched her nose.

"A grown woman playing tag? I should demand a refund from the headmistress for her inadequate teachings."

He pretended to scold her, but hadn't he been the one who started the playful chase? The warmth in his eyes was the same she saw every time he teased her.

A wave of profound relief washed over her. It felt as though they had fallen right back into old patterns. She asked him the same question she had asked when the last war ended:

"Sir, where are we going now?"

It was a bold question that implied she would go with him without a second thought.

'He took this cheeky orphan home then.'

She expected him to do the same this time.

"There should be a late-night train to Templeton."

Although she hinted that she wanted to go to his mansion immediately, he seemed to have something else on his mind, for he asked,

"What about the ball?"

Tonight was the Graduation Ball in Richmond, not far from Fullerton. It was a significant event, the first time they were permitted to bring escorts, symbolizing their transition from girls to women.

"It's at Amherst Hall at 8 p.m. Of course, Your Grace must have other plans, but if you have even a moment free..."

The headmistress had mentioned it earlier, inviting him to attend the ball and suggesting it would be a good opportunity to reconnect with other prominent figures who would be there as guardians.

'But it's also been so long for us. We have so much to catch up on.'

Giselle didn't want to share him with anyone else.

She sat on the edge of the desk, next to her Lord, who was leaning against it. Coincidentally, his suit trousers were the same shade as her school uniform skirt. It would be perfect if they could sit side-by-side on the train.

"I don't want to go. Besides, I don't have a date."

"You don't?"

"No."

"Why not?"

"...Because it's an all-girls school."

"There are plenty outside the school. Don't the students secretly date?"

"I would never do such a thing."

"Giselle, it's not a bad thing. There is no need to be so secretive about it. I am not an old-fashioned man."

"I am an old-fashioned woman, so I have never dated anyone."

He chuckled softly, his eyes full of amusement.

'Why haven't you dated anyone?' his eyes seemed to ask.

Feeling strangely wronged, Giselle pouted as she retorted,

"I've been concentrating on my studies!"

"Good. I'm glad to hear it."

He praised her, even stroking her hair. Just like the old days.

But as his fingers slid through her hair, brushing the nape of her neck, she felt something different in her chest. No—it was like a certain, fleeting time in the past.

"Oh, yes! My report card. I packed it in my luggage, right? I'll show it to you later..."

Nervous, Giselle babbled, but his gaze seemed fixed on her lips.

"What is it?"

"You look quite experienced."

Assuming he meant dating, Giselle flinched.

"I have never dated anyone!"

It turned out he was referring to her makeup skills.

"Oh, t-this... My roommate did it for me. I don't usually wear makeup..."

It must have seemed funny to him, like a child playing with her mother's makeup.

She reached for the handkerchief to wipe off the lipstick, but his hand stopped her.

"Don't wipe it off. It looks very beautiful."

"...Really? ...Thank you."

She was suddenly grateful to Elena for doing her makeup.

Why is it so hot in here?

She fanned her flushed face with the handkerchief. He watched her, a kind smile playing on his lips. Then he brought up the topic they had left behind.

"In any case, I hope you'll tell me if you ever start dating someone. I want to make sure he's a good man."

"I'll introduce him to you first, of course. In fact, I'll ask for your permission before I even start dating him."

"You don't need my permission."

He shook his head, then playfully repeated the same question.

"So, are you absolutely certain you don't have a date for the ball?"

As if the entire conversation had been a mere introduction to this question.

"I already told you no!"

He laughed, amused by her reaction. It was his playful smile from the past, the smile that used to make her feel like a child again. Emboldened, she pleaded,

"I'd rather stay here with you than go to the ball..."

"There is no reason why we can't do both."

Rising to his feet, he erased the playful look from his face and, like a gentleman inviting a lady to dance, extended his hand to her. Giselle's heart leaped.

"T-Then, you will be my..."

"Am I to play the role of your guardian again?"

"Oh..."

What sort of foolish thoughts was I having?

No amount of fanning could cool Giselle's burning face.

Why am I like this?

'It's only because I haven't seen him in so long. Yes, that's all it is.'

"Bring me an ashtray."

"An... ashtray, Your Grace?"

The house butler repeated the Duke's request, even though he had heard it perfectly. He couldn't help himself. The Duke was the only person in the sitting room.

The Duke did not smoke.

Edwin Eccleston, a man who so detested his family's hedonistic tendencies that he had denied himself every form of simple pleasure. He was so ascetic that he had never once tried a cigarette—a vice so common it was almost considered a matter of taste rather than a true indulgence.

Of course, the butler had been forewarned by the chief butler of Templeton that the Duke might seem different from before.

'Could this be it?'

It was not unusual for soldiers to change after experiencing the horrors of war.

'He must have picked up the habit to deal with the stress on the battlefield.'

The butler wrongly assumed it was a simple change in preference.

"Here you are, Your Grace."

He placed an onyx ashtray on the side table and stepped back. Edwin nodded, gesturing toward the door.

When he was alone, he pulled a cigarette case from his pocket.

He selected a cigar, snipped the tip, and put it between his lips. He lit the other end and inhaled a cloud of smoke. His face contorted.

'Disgusting.'

The cigars were not to his taste. They were to his.

The parasite that lived in his mind was very demanding and insisted on a specific brand of Constanzan cigars.

Edwin tore the band from the cigar and flicked it into the ashtray. The ribbon, emblazoned with the enemy's language, turned to ash in an instant.

As much as he wanted to extinguish the cigar, he forced himself to take another drag.

This was a bribe for him. A few puffs of this cigar usually kept him silent.

He took another drag, closing his eyes.

Perhaps he wasn't enjoying the cigar itself, but rather the sheer discomfort Edwin felt smoking it.

'Whatever you enjoy, I will cooperate. You, too.'

There was no reply. There could be none.

Chapter 9.

Yet, Edwin pressed on with his unspoken request.

"Please, just for this one night."

"I'd rather stay here with you than go to the ball..."

"There is no reason why we can't do both."

Drunk on her unexpected beauty upon their reunion, he had momentarily forgotten his current state. His sanity only screamed a warning after he had already issued the invitation.

'There is no guarantee he will remain silent.'

But in that brief, searing moment, he saw a flash of limitless hope ignite in Giselle's eyes. He could not bear to see the hope in her eyes—eyes that had waited for him for four long years—be extinguished into disappointment.

Of course, that was not the only reason he had consented to attend the ball.

"How was school?"

"Wonderful."

A lie.

Having endured the cold, hard realities of a military academy, Edwin knew better than anyone that boarding schools were just the army cloaked in silk. It was a vicious social hierarchy where one had to claw their way to survival.

And in that hierarchy, a student's rank was brutally defined by their parents' social standing. Giselle, an orphan, had only her guardian. Even with Edwin, her guardian, commanding the very apex of the social pyramid, it would have only pushed her position up by a mere notch or two.

"Did you see how she clung to him?"

"Whoever the next Duchess is, that leech needs to be permanently excised first."

The scathing whispers that had reached his ears from the auditorium crowd were all the proof he needed. While the tie between parents and children was sacred, patronage could be severed at any time. Especially if the patron was a soldier who could be killed without warning.

The ball, where he could publicly demonstrate to everyone that he treated Giselle as his own daughter, was his last, best chance to utterly crush the established hierarchy among her peers. It was also his opportunity to blaze a clear, undeniable trail for the soon-to-be adult Giselle to enter high society.

"So, cooperate with me. Just this once."

"Pardon?"

Edwin was wrenched from his thoughts as Giselle's voice finally reached him from a distance. The voice seemed to come from behind the closed door.

"What did you say?"

He had been so preoccupied that he hadn't even registered the knock.

"One moment."

Edwin crushed the cigar beneath his heel and stood. He absolutely could not allow her, with her sensitive lungs, to step into a room thick with smoke and the stale stench of tobacco.

"You're already..."

He stopped midsentence as he pulled the door open.

He had been expecting a girl. A girl who, despite her best attempts at being a lady, could not hide the sweet, wild aroma of wildflowers clinging to her fingers, the gentle persistence of new blooms.

But the person standing before him was a woman.

In her school uniform, he could cling to the image of a child, but now, draped in an elegant gown, he could deny it no longer.

And the white silk dress she wore was disturbingly modern, clinging to her curves and exposing her back with a daring, low-cut neckline.

"Consult Miss Bishop regarding her attire and jewelry."

He had given the instruction to his house butler to prepare the outfit upon learning of the ball. But he had not anticipated this.

His gaze froze on her exposed skin, making him feel as though he were committing a sin. He forcibly dragged his eyes away, unable to find a single, respectable place to look.

"D-Do I look strange?"

"...No."

It wasn't strange. It was disturbing. It was still an impossibility for him to accept that she, whom he had always sheltered as a child, was now suddenly a woman. For him, it was not a gentle change, but a violent, sudden transformation.

"You are so radiant, it is blinding."

He gathered himself and offered his arm to Giselle.

"Miss Bishop."

A child needed a guardian, but a lady deserved a gentleman.

"It is my great honor to escort the most dazzling lady in the world to the ball tonight."

Giselle's cheeks burned crimson, her hand trembling slightly as she placed it delicately on his arm.

"The honor is all mine, to be escorted by the most dazzling gentleman in the world."

He was the one who was dazzling. She, decked in white silk and glittering jewels, was supposed to be the one shining, yet why did he, simply dressed in black evening tails, seem to radiate such brilliant light?

As they walked towards the waiting carriage, escorted by her Lord, Giselle could not resist stealing glances at him. It was as if looking at him was a forbidden, thrilling act that she had to conceal.

"My stars, Duke Eccleston has arrived!"

"He's here? Good heavens, I must be dreaming."

The instant they entered the grand ballroom of Amherst Hall, every single head snapped to them. The headmistress, exactly as she had earlier that day, scuttled towards the Duke, nearly losing her footing.

The atmosphere in the ballroom crackled with palpable excitement, as if the King himself had walked in. Many applauded the hero's sudden appearance, while others whispered in frantic disbelief.

"But why here, of all places?"

A prominent figure's first public appearance after a long absence was always symbolic, hinting at their future direction. It was customary to meticulously select the grandest stage for their return.

But for Duke Eccleston, a man of staggering power and influence, to choose his sponsored orphan's graduation ball as his first public showing since returning from the war...

What terrifying message was he trying to send?

As wild speculations raced, a crowd of high society figures immediately swarmed Edwin.

"It is such a relief to see you back safe and sound, Your Grace."

"Thank you."

"We were so concerned when we heard you had cloistered yourself away in the mansion, but seeing you here today, our worries were unfounded. You look well."

"I was faced with a mountain of work to catch up on after my four-year absence."

"Oh dear, oh dear..."

"It is only natural, after being gone for so long."

"But surely, reconnecting with people after all this time should take precedence over mere work."

The middle-aged woman who interjected with a sugary smile was Duchess Roxworth, Edwin's own aunt.

"You are correct. That is precisely why I put aside my work and came here."

It was the perfect moment to shift the attention from his well-being to the true reason for his presence.

He placed his hand deliberately over Giselle's, which rested delicately upon his arm. Every single gaze in the room swung to the girl who had stood silently beside him, like a mere accessory.

"This is Miss Giselle Bishop. She graduated from Fullerton with top honors and will be attending Kingsbridge in the autumn. She is a brilliant mind."

"Ah, so this is the young woman you have been sponsoring..."

An elderly gentleman paused, his eyes wide with shock as he stared at Giselle.

"The Rosel orphan," his wife finished the sentence for him, utterly unfazed by her husband's failed courtesy.

"Am I correct?"

She stared them down, her eyes challenging them to point out any inaccuracy in her statement. This was far more than an innocent slip of the tongue.

Edwin's jaw tightened. If they dared to disrespect her so openly even in his presence, they must be treating her even worse when he was away.

They needed to understand that an insult to Giselle Bishop was an insult to Edwin Eccleston.

"Er... well... that is..."

The elderly woman, who had just brazenly glared at the Rosel orphan, felt a sickening chill race down her spine as she met the young Duke's eyes. His lips were pressed into a hard, unforgiving line, his eyes cold and deadly.

He was a decorated soldier, after all. His gaze alone seemed capable of murder.

'But she is a Rosel!'

The woman felt a sudden, righteous surge of indignation. The Rosel were mere half-breeds, a chaotic mix of low blood. No matter how noble her owner was, she could never become a purebred dog.

"How dare a mongrel like her try to sneak into high society?"

She was certain everyone present shared her opinion, even if they were too terrified to voice it aloud.

Is the Duke completely blind?

She had only intended to point it out, trying to advise him not to elevate the status of the Rosel Orphan too high. But the Duke reacted as if she had insulted his own daughter.

'Or his mistress.'

Perhaps those old, vile rumors were true after all. Why else would he go to the extraordinary trouble of changing her name, sending her to a prestigious school, and trying to completely erase her past?

The Duke had not yet spoken a single word, but the air in the ballroom had grown dangerously thin. Everyone exchanged terrified glances, subtly urging the elderly woman to apologize immediately.

Her husband, beads of sweat glistening on his forehead, frantically wiped his face with a handkerchief and elbowed his wife hard.

'Apologize, now.' That was his desperate command. His wife, though boiling with offense, knew she had no other choice. This was an Eccleston. She forced a brittle smile, trying desperately to salvage the situation.

Chapter 10.

"Oh no, you see... I was simply curious. If my innocent inquiry caused any offense, I apologize..."

The elderly couple hailed from a notoriously proud family. While their apologies were usually long-winded evasions, this was the first time Edwin could recall anyone from that family actually uttering the word "apology" rather than a mere expression of "regret."

Everything was proceeding according to his plan, even surpassing his expectations, but...

"It is quite alright, Madam. I am indeed an orphan."

Giselle's admission was not part of his plan.

"The Duke saved my life and gave me a new one after I lost my parents."

Her mature response, elevating him instead of diminishing herself, caught Edwin off guard once more.

"They said... they said I smelled bad because I was a Rosel orphan."

During Giselle's first year with him, he had sent her to the school closest to the mansion.

"And they called me the Duke's pet child, the one he picked up from the battlefield. They threw twigs and told me to fetch them. I am not a dog."

The child, who had been thrilled at the prospect of attending school for the first time, had returned crying less than three hours later, swearing never to go back. She had even pleaded with him to change her name, a name that screamed "Rosel."

Where was that fragile child who used to flee at the mere mention of the words "orphan" or "Rosel"?

She had transformed into a strong, resilient woman.

"I am humbled to hear those words from Miss Bishop, who saved my life and gave me a reason to live."

Edwin softened his expression, playing along. The elderly gentleman, sensing the shift in mood, quickly intervened.

"You have raised an excellent young woman, Your Grace. We have all heard of your exceptional gifts as a military commander, but I had no idea you were also a gifted educator."

"Not at all. Miss Bishop is the gifted one. I merely offered my company."

Despite the minor friction, he had achieved his goal. He had demonstrated to everyone that Giselle Bishop commanded the full, unwavering backing of the Eccleston Family.

"But still... choosing her as the first person to reconnect with after all this time..."

Duchess Roxworth, who had remained silent until now, leaned toward Edwin and whispered in a hushed, sharp tone.

"It seems you have a closer bond with Miss Bishop than we realized."

Her eyes, though crinkled with a polite smile, held a cutting glint, as if accusing him of something illicit. Accusing him of what?

"Caring for those left behind on the battlefield is as patriotic as fighting on it. But make sure the girl knows her place."

His aunt had been one of the few people who had supported his decision to bring a war orphan home. The reason? The orphan was a girl.

Due to her short hair and the trousers he had dressed her in for ease during their travels, Giselle had been mistaken for a boy.

But when he brought her to the mansion after the war, wearing a dress and a hat with a large bow, he would never forget the look on everyone's faces.

"It's a girl!"

There had been an uproar, both within the family and in society, but it eventually died down. She was not a boy, but a girl. And it wasn't an adoption, merely a sponsorship. There were no worries about complicated inheritance issues.

"To think there would come a day when I would regret that it wasn't an adoption."

It was only when his aunt whispered those words, meant only for his ears, that Edwin fully grasped the truth.

They weren't scornful of Giselle because of her background. They were distrustful of her because she was a woman.

He had treated her with respect and courtesy at the ball, expecting others to follow his lead. He wanted her to be accorded the same respect he held for her.

But he had failed to factor in that they no longer saw her as a child, but as a potential rival woman.

His actions, based on a misunderstanding of their perception, had created unintended, dangerous consequences.

'Seeing the child I raised as a woman? They have all lost their minds,' His aunt, who had been left alone with Edwin after Giselle excused herself to seek out her roommate, pressed him.

"Whose idea was the white dress? Or should I ask, whose intention was it?"

It was an absurd accusation, implying Giselle's dress was a subtle hint at marriage. Edwin frowned deeply.

"White is merely a color."

"Is it, truly?"

"Look around you. Is Giselle the only one wearing a white gown in this ballroom?"

"But it is a different story when your escort is the one who puts her in white."

"She is not my escort. I am here as her guardian, and I always will be."

One day, Giselle would wear a white gown, veil included. And he would be the one to walk her down the aisle. But he would be the one giving her away, not the one waiting at the end of the aisle.

"I am relieved to hear you state that so firmly, but I am not so sure about the girl."

His aunt whispered, her eyes fixed on Giselle, who was being introduced to her friend's partner a short distance away.

"Be cautious. She may have her sights set on becoming a Duchess."

How dare she? Edwin clenched his jaw hard.

"Who do you take her for? Giselle sees me as a father figure. This is an insult to me, the man who raised her as his own daughter."

"You are too young to be her father, and she is far too mature to be your daughter."

Even if she was his aunt, the Queen of Society, there was a limit to what he would tolerate.

"Your concern for me verges on the delusional."

"Prove me wrong, then. Don't just tell me, prove it."

He had been half-listening as his aunt lectured him on the importance of marriage, even presenting him with a list of potential brides, both domestic and foreign.

"Professor Fletcher, long time no see."

A familiar name snagged his attention, and he turned his head.

It wasn't difficult to tell which of the two men greeting each other a short distance away was Professor Fletcher. The one with the messy, graying hair looked more comfortable in a lab coat than in evening tails.

Edwin excused himself from his aunt and approached the elderly gentleman.

"Pardon my interruption, but are you Professor Fletcher, from the Kingsbridge Faculty of Medicine?"

"Yes, yes, that is correct. And you are...?"

"Edwin Eccleston."

"It's you!"

The professor clapped his hands with delight, seizing Edwin's extended hand in both of his own.

"My word! What an honor for the Duke himself to approach me. And what terrible etiquette on my part!"

"Not at all."

"I should have been the one to greet you first, but there was such a long line of people waiting to speak with you, I hesitated to steal your time."

"Nonsense. I was hoping to meet you."

"...Me?"

The professor's eyes widened behind his spectacles.

"It is an honor that you even know of my humble existence, but to think you wanted to meet me... it is like a dream."

"Humble? You give yourself too little credit."

Professor Fletcher was a renowned psychiatrist and a pioneer in the field of mental health.

"Even a layman like me finds your research fascinating."

"I see. I'm surprised to hear you are interested in psychiatry, Your Grace."

Edwin, feeling a strange discomfort at the professor's innocent remark, added defensively,

"As a military commander, I have learned that mental well-being is as important as physical health."

"Indeed. You are quite progressive for a young commander."

The professor smiled, nodding his head, then his expression turned thoughtful.

"But when you say 'my research'..."

His next words made Edwin instantly rigid.

"Do you mean Multiple Personality Disorder?"

Edwin quickly masked his reaction with a practiced smile and nodded.

"I am curious how a man such as yourself has come to be interested in Multiple Personality Disorder. Have you ever encountered it?"

"Once."

The professor's eyes gleamed behind his glasses.

"A rare case, indeed. Most intriguing."

The professor, sensing a unique research opportunity, pressed Edwin for details about the "patient." Edwin skillfully parried the most sensitive questions, offering vague answers.

"I witnessed one of our officers exhibiting those symptoms while we were in the prisoner-of-war camp."

It was not a lie. Sadly.

Chapter 11.

"And did he survive this time?"

"Yes, Your Grace."

"I'm relieved to hear that, though I fear the war against the enemy that invaded his head is far from over."

The professor was spot-on.

"If it can be of any assistance to him, you may contact me here..."

The professor pulled a business card from his wallet and handed it over.

"I will pass it along."

Edwin took the business card and prepared to finish his story about the soldier, but the professor, now thoroughly intrigued, did not relent.

"Can you tell me his state?"

"I think that is best left to him."

"I suppose so."

"More than that, you surely know of far more interesting cases."

"Of course."

As an academic, one cannot help but become excited when a high-profile, wealthy celebrity takes an interest in their field of study. The professor enthusiastically presented his area of research.

"As you can see from these different cases, the causes, symptoms, and prognosis vary wildly—it remains a complete mystery."

"I see."

"That makes diagnosis difficult; there is much misdiagnosis."

"Are there any cured cases?"

The professor's wide smile abruptly clouded over.

"Very few, I'm afraid. It is one of the mental illnesses with the bleakest prognosis."

"...I see."

"Oh, one patient I had about ten years ago was fortunate enough to be treated very well..."

Sneaking. Sneaking. Something snagged Edwin's attention as he listened with feigned intellectual curiosity.

"Isn't that the cure you wrote about...."

"Professor, I apologize, but I have an urgent matter demanding my attention, may I hear the rest at another time?"

"Oh dear, you have waited too long."

"That is more on my part. I would like to reserve some time to hear more—I will be in touch."

"Yes, Duke. I look forward to hearing from you."

Edwin hastily terminated the conversation and strode purposefully across the center of the ballroom, where men and women danced in pairs, toward the opposite side.

"Oh!"

If he had arrived a moment later, Giselle would have already tasted the champagne in the flute she had accepted from the waiter.

"You may not drink yet."

"But..."

"No means no."

Giselle's lips pouted at the severe command. She was a child in moments like these, which meant alcohol was strictly out of the question.

Edwin snatched the champagne flute from Giselle's hand with a swift, decisive motion and tossed the liquid away, his eyes scanning the dance floor.

"Well, beautiful Giselle, since you came to the ball, don't you think it's better to show off your new gown and dance than to be a drunkard?"

"Do you mean I should dance alone?" Giselle retorted sharply, leaning against the wall with her arms crossed, still angry about her drink being taken away.

"Has no man invited you to dance?"

"No."

Of course not.

A guardian must never take his eyes off his daughter. Edwin watched Giselle from the corner of his eye the entire time he was speaking with Professor Fletcher. In the interim, a steady stream of young men approached Giselle and spoke to her. But she turned them all away and stood against the wall like a resolute wallflower.

"Who would you like to...."

Edwin looked around the ballroom for young men he knew. No peers. No older than twenty-two. Good manners, character, and disposition. He sifted them out and found none. I am in trouble.

It was a disgrace to remain a wallflower at the graduation ball. As an escort, he should be her partner. Some students danced with their fathers or brothers, so it was not unheard of to dance with a guardian.

But...

A sickening noise was raging in his head.

"By the way, Sir," Giselle, who had remained silent while he searched for a suitable dance partner, spoke up. "I would like my first dance to be with...."

Giselle looked at him, hesitant. The way she looked at Edwin when she wanted something from him. He didn't need to be told what she wanted.

"I want my first dance to be with you." A piercing thought cut through the noise in his head. I would regret leaving you a wallflower. Edwin raised his hand to offer it, and then froze.

But... but...

Other thoughts had suddenly raised their voice. And so he hesitated, one part of him unable to speak, the other unable to reach out.

"Excuse me."

A complete stranger, a man appearing to be in his early twenties, addressed Giselle. He likely didn't realize he was being rude by interrupting their conversation. To others, the two of them must have looked like they were doing nothing at all.

As expected, the man asked Giselle to dance, and Edwin, involuntarily, found himself pushing her away with a subtle tension in his back.

Giselle took his hand and headed toward the floor, looking back at him and puffing out her cheeks. Edwin laughed—a repulsive, bitter sound.

A spoiled child, to say the least.

So, dancing with her guardian wasn't out of the ordinary, but to not approach Giselle himself at first....

'I never thought I would see the day I wished she wasn't adopted.'

He blamed the many eyes that did not see her as a child. Dancing with her would only amplify the misunderstanding. Gossip would haunt a young woman just starting out, giving ammunition to her detractors.

So, it is a wise decision.

Edwin stood exactly where Giselle had been leaning, his arms crossed, watching her dance with a man who was not him.

The true wallflower of the evening was Edwin Eccleston, who had used every excuse to snap at the women who approached him.

His impassive face twisted in an instant. The stranger's hand broke away from Giselle's waist for a moment, and when it came back down, it spanned her back. It touched her bare skin. How dare he go anywhere near her?

Giselle stopped dead, uttered some words, and the man apologized. Nothing further occurred after that. It was likely a mistake, given that he withdrew his hand before she could question him. Yet, to Edwin, the offender was already condemned.

Only this afternoon Giselle had told him she didn't need his permission to associate with anyone; now here he was.

'I am being overly sensitive.'

And yet, he could not tear his eyes away from the two of them, his senses prickling.

"A soldier's beloved is his lucky charm." Somewhere deep in his mind, a man's voice began to whisper the enemy's military song in the enemy's language.

My dear Giselle, if you wait for me, I will be able to return to your side.

Edwin flinched as the man had the audacity to change his lover's name to Giselle in what was originally a Helgaan song.

'You have a difficult daughter.'

He did not look at Giselle until the music ended. He had to stop the master of insidious whispers before he took over his head, and then his body.

He vanished.

He slipped in and out of Amherst Hall until he found him in the cloisters of the public garden.

A tall man was leaning against a pillar among the arches. If not for the sheen of moonlight, he would not have recognized him. He had an unusual object between his fingers.

"Sir, you smoke? Since when?"

He straightened from his oblique posture like a man caught doing something wrong. Giselle blinked hard as she watched him stub the cigar out in the ashtray set into the archway.

"There is something I have to tell you."

She suddenly remembered his instructions before they entered Amherst Hall this afternoon. If he did anything suspicious or seemed out of sorts, she was to run immediately and call Mr. Loise, his aide, and...

"If I run, I run and I do not look back."

Those are war-time things. The war is over.

Besides, she never had to run as he said in the war, so why would she in the middle of a peaceful metropolis?

'You know what is even more suspicious?'

Giselle knew him as a man who shunned women and even mild indulgences like alcohol and tobacco. Yet there he was, with a faint wisp of white smoke curling from his stoic lips. Giselle stared, mesmerized, then asked.

"You are unfamiliar to me now. Do you think it is time to run and call for Mr. Loise?"

He smiled—a satisfied, cold smile.

Chapter 12.
"I'm not running away, but don't come any closer to me."

"Why?"

"You have weak bronchial tubes."

"Since when is that a problem? I had a cold once as a child, and you still act like this."

He sealed his lips.

Giselle is a strong woman, seasoned by childcare and farm labor from a young age, yet he thinks she is weak. Giselle hates being misunderstood, but strangely, she likes this misconception. That’s why she never says aloud that she is not sickly. Because then the infantilization would continue.

Giselle didn't want to be treated like a child, but she was also terrified of being treated like an adult.

'You're all grown up now; it's time to stand on your own two feet.'

She feared those words would leave his mouth. Giselle would soon come of age; legally, they would no longer be orphan and guardian, but man and woman. Their bond, unbound by blood, could snap at any moment. It wouldn't surprise her if he did snap it.

'You are all I have.'

She hoped he would confuse her for a child who could never be alone.

But a part of her wondered what it was like to be treated as an adult by a gentleman like him.

"Miss Bishop, it is an infinite honor to have the most brilliant lady under the heavens accompany me at the ball tonight."

I suppose she secretly hoped he would go beyond his duty and be her partner. But judging by his lack of dancing, he had no intention of doing so.

"Where is your young, handsome companion? Why are you chasing an old, boring man?"

"He is not my partner."

And he was far more handsome; the man was not old enough to be called old, much less boring.

He pulled a small tin from the inside of his jacket and opened it. The warm breeze of the early summer evening carried a crisp mint aroma.

Giselle was amused that the man she had missed so much had a habit she only ever saw in dreams.

After taking out two mint candies, he extended his hand to her. His arms seemed longer today than usual, perhaps because of the cigarette smell.

A smile crept onto her face, like that of a puppy receiving a treat. Giselle leaned toward him, parted her lips, and his hand gently placed a mint candy on the tip of her tongue before withdrawing.

A tingle spread from the tip of her tongue.

The remaining mint went into his mouth, as always.

"He looked like he wanted to dance with you until the ball ended."

"I can't dance better than him, so I'm disqualified."

"I raised my eyes for nothing."

He was the first person to teach Giselle how to dance.

"Then it's your fault."

"Is one dance enough punishment?"

Giselle’s eyes narrowed.

'Are you going to dance with me?'

Giselle felt like jumping for joy but maintained her composure, barely remembering the feminine manners she had learned at school.

"I will spare you my obvious loss this time, Duke."

His smile changed as if he were looking at a puppy. A puppy that had been bitten.

He quickly erased the strange expression from his face and turned toward Giselle with a simple smile.

"I won't forget your generosity, Miss Bishop."

Her heart began to race when he crouched down to meet Giselle's eye level and politely extended his hand.

'I shouldn't be doing this....'

Even knowing that, she put her hand in his, and he clasped it, pulling her close to his arms.

She thought they were going back to the ballroom and dancing in front of everyone. He took her other hand, which she had left hanging in the air, and placed it on his shoulder.

Immediately, Giselle's hand slid around his waist, conscious of the plunge of her back, which was much lower than she remembered from her childhood. He began tapping his foot to the weak music heard in the distance, but the sound was quickly drowned out by her heart.

She could only follow his skilled lead.

The two danced through the moonlight and the darkness that hung like piano keys in the long corridor. In the darkness, Giselle had to work hard to avoid stepping on anything, but she kept getting distracted. She was distracted by the warmth of his body through the thin silk.

"Lift your head."

"...Yes."

She obeyed, but only when they moved into the darkness did she raise her stubbornly bowed head. The darkness concealed her flushed face, but she couldn't help but feel the sweat in her hands.

I'll be embarrassed if he notices.

Why am I doing this?

He doesn't feel like him. Perhaps it's because his scent is unfamiliar. His breath always smells of fresh mint. Today, however, it is heavy, with the musky odor of cigars. His heavy body odor made her short of breath, as if it were weighing down on her chest. Her eyes snapped open as she gasped for air.

"Aah!"

She grabbed his hand and spun, losing her balance. The hem of her dress tangled between her legs, and she tripped over her own feet as she stepped back.

"Ah...."

"......."

Their eyes met in the darkness, and the sound of her heels echoing like a chord in the silent hallway ceased. The silence, interrupted only by her ragged breathing, felt as if it would break at any moment.

Giselle felt it in retrospect.

His hand in the middle of her back.

Heat shot through her body from the point where their warm flesh met, slightly damp with sweat.

Bump bump.

She felt her heart hammering, beating against his palm. She squirmed, feeling strange and ashamed, but he did not remove his hand.

Suddenly, Giselle noticed there was something strange about his expression.

It was as if he wasn't here.

He was clearly looking at her, but he wasn't focused on her. His eyes, which were slowly being invaded by an emotion that might have been fear, suddenly closed and disappeared behind his eyelids.

"...Sir?"

"Giselle, run...."

The words came out squeezed from a constricted throat, and she couldn't quite distinguish them. She was about to ask a question when the hand on her back slid and pushed Giselle's shoulder.

'Are you telling me to leave?'

She staggered back, studying his still-closed eyes.

"Aah!"

His hand grabbed Giselle's wrist again, afraid to let go.

"Urgh...."

He didn't stop there, pulling her closer until their bodies were pressed together. Before she realized it, his hand was around her waist again, traveling up the small of her back, gently grazing her skin. Giselle shivered as if she were cold in summer.

Bump bump.

The hand that had risen between her wing bones began to trace the spot where her heart was fiercely pounding. Ashamed and frightened, she wanted to flee, but she couldn't move a muscle—she felt as if she were his captive.

"Ah, Sir...."

It was then that his eyes snapped open, his dark blue pupils gleaming as they met Giselle's. He inhaled deeply and let out the air languidly, like one waking from a long sleep, then offered a dreamy smile and greeted her nonchalantly.

"Hello."

"Hello."

The charming angel, Edwin Eccleston.

"You have no idea how long I have waited for this moment."

It does not mean what you think it means, naive child. You have no idea.

All you see is a prison of gray walls. All you hear is the barking of the guards, the screams of the prisoners, and one name endlessly repeated in your head like a mantra. Giselle, Giselle, Giselle.

When the other prisoners shouted the names of their lovers, he could only repeat one girl's name. Once in a narrow cell, again in an even narrower cell bearing the name of Edwin Eccleston. My double imprisonment was a terrible torture.

"I have to bring her back alive, so stop your nonsense."

The man who ordered me to do this would soon realize. He would realize that the only thing that mattered was him returning to the girl alive. If she lives, so do I. Giselle Bishop, for you.

And you wonder why I have been waiting for the day I would finally meet the terrifying Giselle Bishop?

"Because I was forced to stare at your disgusting, ugly face," I told myself.

Chapter 13
"When I see this face, I am going to..."

The Lord's hand slowly traced the outline of Giselle’s lips, from end to end. His firm fingertips gently pressed into the soft, full flesh.

Giselle's body trembled as she surrendered her lips to his, completely mesmerized. His tightly sealed lips parted, and before her eyes, the tip of his wet tongue slowly dipped onto her parched lower lip and disappeared.

Soon, he swallowed hard, his throat visibly agitated. Her heart raced in sync with him. Giselle finally resolved to give in to the fearful, frantic pounding.

"You have no idea how long I have waited for this moment."

I was waiting for this moment too.

She was just about to close her eyes. He closed his a second before Giselle.

When he opened them again, he withdrew his hands from her in a startled rush, like a man suddenly caught in a flame. He then took a decisive step back.

"...Sir?"

"I think we should go back."

"Okay...."

Giselle followed without another word, her eyes fixed on the back of his head.

'What was that just now? What happened right now?'

She gently touched her own lips, forgetting that she might smear her lipstick. Her lips were still burning from the imprint his fingertips had left. She imagined the afterimage of the kiss she had still not managed to capture.

"Did you sleep well?"

The next morning, he greeted Giselle warmly, seated at the kitchen table of the townhouse.

How she had missed hearing his morning greeting—so much so that the lack of it had made her cry every morning for four years.

'My angel. My puppy. My ray of sunshine.'

"Good mornings" were always followed by such affectionate nicknames, but today, there was none.

"I wonder if the reason you've changed... is the same reason I couldn't sleep last night."

Giselle took a bite of the tea cake the maid brought to clear the fog from her head and asked for coffee.

"The same."

Giselle's sleepy eyes snapped wide open at his voice.

He only drank tea in the morning. The only time she had ever seen him drink coffee was during vigils on the battlefield.

"You didn't sleep well either? Why? You can't..."

Giselle began to suffer again from the foolish anticipation that had kept her awake. Judging by the brevity of his morning greeting, there was no reason for excitement.

'I guess I'll have to keep my distance from him now.'

Even knowing that, she couldn't help but remember last night, after they returned from the ball. She didn't dare to bring it up. The breakfast table was unusually quiet.

"So, Giselle, what do you plan to do?" He spoke as if nothing had happened.

"I don't really have any plans." So I have plenty of free time.

"Then, what are you going to do today?" she asked him, hoping he had something he wanted to do with her, but...

"I have a lot of work to catch up on now that I'm in Richmond, so I hope you won't feel badly if you don't see me for a while."

There was a distinct wall of coolness underlying his sweet words. It was as if he had read Giselle's expectations and preemptively rejected them.

'He doesn't want me to feel sorry for him, which makes me feel even worse.'

It wasn't just that he wouldn't be with her. 'I just wanted to spend time with you like when I was a child...' She never meant that as an insult, but it annoyed her even more that he had misinterpreted it and erected a wall between them.

"I don't feel sorry for you." Giselle, who had been feeling resentful, feigned that she was completely unaffected. "Am I a child? I am an adult too."

"Yes, you are."

The Lord seemed bitter, his lips curving into a tight line, perhaps due to the coffee that was now bouncing up and down his throat.

"Anyway, was there anything you wanted to do before the fall term starts?"

"Oh..." Giselle suddenly realized. He hadn't been asking about her plans for the day. He was asking what she was going to do during the entire three months before she started at Kingsbridge.

"I don't know... I hadn't really thought about it..." She hadn't thought about it because she was too excited about meeting him.

"How about traveling?"

"Traveling? Wow, that's a great idea!"

"Is there anywhere you want to go?"

"Yes! I want to go to the ancient ruins of Athos, I want to spend a night camping in the desert and watch the sunrise and sunset and the Milky Way, I want to circumnavigate the Emerald Coast on a yacht like they used to, then stop for ice cream in Porto Cervo, then go back to the villa and take a long nap in the hammock. I don't know about anything else, but this is a must!"

Giselle rattled off the places she wanted to go and the things she wanted to do without taking a breath. She had accumulated a long list of things she wanted to do while waiting for him over the past four years.

"And again..."

This was only the tip of the iceberg, yet he was already looking at her like a man overwhelmed. Giselle decided to retreat a little.

"Er... that's all I can think of right now."

But she didn't say that was all she could think of. He would have understood.

"You have endured a lot, you glutton."

He rolled his eyes and smiled, as if he had just seen a puppy squirming for a bone bigger than itself. The smile was warm, of course, but the judgment was harsh.

"Dismissed. Sleeping in a tent in the desert is dangerous."

"That's ridiculous. ...." Giselle's mouth was about to retort that it wouldn't be dangerous because he would be with her, but his next words silenced her.

"Get some girl friends to go with you. Girls only. Don't worry, I will pay for their travel and security expenses."

...Did this mean he wasn't coming?

Giselle naturally assumed he would go with her; after all, she had always traveled with him.

'Why won't you go? If you won't go, I won't go.' She pouted just as she did as a child.

He used to think Giselle's tantrums were cute. Sometimes the unruly behavior of the orphan girl amused him. When Giselle was 11, he would say things like this:

"Giselle, my naughty puppy." "Sir, could you not call me puppy in the future?" "Why, my terrible puppy?" "Oh, come on.... I'm serious, stop teasing me!" "Look. You are cute like a Torajin puppy, why do you suddenly hate me?" "Because the children told me I was a puppy you picked up." "Smile at them as if they are being mean to you. They are just jealous that you are much prettier, cuter, and smarter." "No, I'm just saying they don't realize I'm just a puppy who will be thrown away again when my owner gets tired of me." "Who said that?" "No, Sir, I've changed my mind! I want to be a puppy—from now on, I'll be a good, well-mannered puppy who doesn't beg to play, I will always be grateful, so please don't throw me away." "Giselle, I am not abandoning you, I have never thought of you as a house puppy, but if you want to be a real puppy, I want you to be a spoiled puppy who is never grateful and who is always in her master's lap." "Why?" "Because it would make you happy."

It turned out that he was indeed happy whenever Giselle acted like a spoiled, proud, and cheeky puppy. It wasn't just an empty gesture to soothe the orphan's nerves; it was genuine.

But after last night, he might have changed his mind.

"I'll think about it slowly. And more importantly, when are you returning to Templeton?" Giselle asked, changing the subject instead of inviting him to travel with her.

"Well, I don't know. I don't know when I'll finish my work. Do you want to go to Templeton?"

"Yes."

"Why don't you go first?"

It sounded like he meant that if Giselle went to the Duke's home first, he would finish his work and follow, but it did not feel that way.

She had read somewhere that it is a survival instinct for a child to be monitored by their parents. She didn't want to call it something large and cold, but that's how Giselle was. She was always desperate to read his moods and thoughts. Her intuition had developed so sharply around him that she could feel it without even trying to read him.

'He won't go; he is trying to keep me away from him.'

...Just like that. And he tried it twice in a row.

Chapter 14 .
"I'll think about it."

Giselle parried his attempt with the same neutral words this time. Edwin offered his usual slight smile and nodded, but Giselle could sense he was struggling internally. Four years of unused intuition hadn't rusted in the slightest. He was not pleased in the least.

The dining room returned to silence, yet the noise in her head persisted. Her mouth, which had slowed its movements as a consequence, suddenly stilled when he asked:

"You're not eating well. Does it not suit your palate?"

There were many reasons, but only one could be spoken.

"Yes, it suits my palate."

Giselle's eyes flickered toward the maid and the butler, who looked relieved to hear that the household food was acceptable.

The Duke did not serve meals. As soon as he began eating, he would invite all his servants, whom he otherwise only summoned briefly when he needed something.

'But why isn't he inviting them today?'

And why was Loise, his personal aide, who had nothing to do with food, standing there?

"Then why are you not eating well?"

"Because...."

It's uncomfortable.

Giselle had spent her life pretending she knew what she was doing in front of him, but she truly did not know what she was doing in front of others. She was educated as a noble lady, but she was not a noble lady. She had never forgotten that she should not be sitting at the table and served, but rather standing and serving. That was why she wasn't comfortable being waited on.

"There are too many eyes on me; it's quite embarrassing."

Giselle quickly conveyed her wish for the staff to leave. No matter how much they treated her like a lady, she was only a guest, not the owner, so it was poor manners to ask for a direct dismissal.

"Really? Then..."

She thought he would understand and invite them to the table, as he always did....

"Take your time, enjoy your meal, and have a good day."

Edwin stood up and walked away.

"Uh...."

Giselle was so stunned by this unexpected turn of events that she didn't even bother to hold him back.

'I didn't mean that, you know that, so why are you doing this? What did I do wrong?'

He was the type of man who would tell Giselle what she had done wrong and correct her. He was not the type of person who would simply walk away.

'Then why is he doing that?'

She couldn't read it from the back of his head.

'Do they know?'

Giselle looked at the two men who followed him out the door. The butler clearly didn't know the answer, as he looked as bewildered as she did.

'And Mr. Loise... eh?'

But Loise looked at her with a bitter expression. He knew the answer.

'...Then why are you looking at me like that?'

She hadn't heard what he said, but at least she was cleared of the suspicion that it was her fault. Sensing her gaze, Loise turned his head toward Giselle, who smiled tentatively and made eye contact.

'...Do you feel sorry for me?'

That, at least, meant Giselle hadn't done anything wrong.

But it didn't make her feel better. Giselle dropped her cutlery and stared into the distance.

'You've been acting strangely since last night.'

From the moment he let her go after the dance and then abruptly grabbed her again, greeting her out of nowhere:

"Hello. You have no idea how long I have waited for this moment."

And then he tried to kiss her, which was odd.

'No, maybe it was my imagination that he was going to kiss me.'

"Giselle, what did I do to you before I left the hallway?"

'I don't know, but it was definitely weird.'

Last night, as soon as they returned to the townhouse, Edwin sat Giselle down with a very serious face and asked her this question.

'Why are you asking?'

Giselle didn't understand the question, so she returned the question to him.

"Don't you remember?"

"I must have had too much to drink. I don't remember much after we stopped dancing."

She was stunned and disappointed to realize that he had been drinking when he tried to kiss her.

'Wait a moment. He drank too much?'

But last night, she didn't smell alcohol on his breath when she was close to him. And as far as she knew, the only alcohol he had consumed was the flute of champagne Giselle was about to drink.

"So I'm asking you, can you tell me what I said and what I did?"

"Uh... you caught me falling, you squeezed your eyes shut like you had a headache..."

Now that she thought about it, perhaps it really was the alcohol that gave him a headache. He wasn't much of a drinker, so maybe one glass was too much for him.

'But you've lost your memory, as if you developed a barrier that you never had before.'

She wondered if this barrier was why she was told to run away and call Loise if anything suspicious happened. It was crazy to think it might be a residual effect of captivity. She felt pity for him.

He grabbed her again and said, "Hello." The greeting was careless, but his expression didn't seem to warrant such seriousness.

"It's not uncommon for people to get drunk and forget where they are and who they are doing it with."

"It's very kind of you, Giselle, to be so lenient about my mistakes. But next time, instead of being understanding, you are going to run to get Loise. No, you won't. I'm not going to create a situation where you have to run away."

He ran both his hands roughly over his face, then buried his face in his hands and let out a long sigh.

"I don't think I should run away...."

"Was that all?"

"You also said you were looking forward to it."

Edwin's expression changed, as if he were afraid to answer. Like a person in a sudden panic.

'...Is there something that scares you too?'

Even on the battlefield, the crucible of terror, he never looked like this.

'Why are you more afraid of that moment than when the air-raid siren sounded and a fighter jet flew overhead? Why, what is wrong with that moment?'

Giselle urged him to continue, even as he remained rigid as a board, like a man stunned by the shelling raining down on him from every direction.

"And?"

"Um... when it comes to looking at my face, you won't.... I think that was all you said, then you snapped out of it, because you asked me to go back, do you remember that?"

"Is that really all you remember?"

"Yes."

"And I didn't do or say anything rude to you?"

"You weren't rude at all."

The kiss must have been what he considered "rude," but Giselle lied. He touched my lips and then licked his lower lip. I think he was trying to kiss me. I couldn't say this where Loise was listening; if he doesn't remember, it's probably better to keep it that way. Especially if it was just a drunken mistake.

So she didn't tell him the most shocking part, but it seemed to hit him hard enough.

"Ha... I was a fool, it's my fault. I shouldn't have left you..."

"You..." She was about to reassure him once more that he had done nothing to warrant such self-blame, when he sighed and pushed himself up.

"Giselle, I'm sorry, but I think I'll go to bed soon; you must be tired too, so go to your room and get some rest."

"I know you went through a lot with me today too, so please get some rest. Thank you so much for coming to my graduation."

"Don't thank me; I am where I should be. If you call it a hardship, it makes me sad."

"Edwin..."

"Giselle, you are my joy; I was happy to see you again."

She saw in his eyes that he meant it. He patted Giselle's head and escorted her back to her room, just as he did four years ago.

"Good night."

"Good night to you too."

But why did she feel so empty after receiving his affection?

Standing behind the closed door, Giselle could distinctly hear him whisper to Loise in a low voice from beyond the wood.

"I'm afraid I'll have to keep my distance from her now."

Of course, she thought he meant keeping his distance from alcohol.

'Why is he keeping his distance from me?'

It wasn't Giselle's fault, but she was definitely the reason.

Giselle abandoned her food and wandered down the hallway until, in a dead end, she caught sight of a woman in the mirror.

'A woman.'

Now she knew why.

"You are not the girl I wanted to see. You have become a woman in my absence."

Because she had become a woman.

She was starting to look like a woman.

Whether yesterday's kiss was a momentary slip of the tongue or not, it couldn't be denied that he saw Giselle as a woman.

Chapter 15.

Last night, that single thought kept Giselle awake.

'He sees me as a woman.'

A woman he could kiss. A woman he could make love to.

…A woman he could make love to.

To fantasize isn’t a sin, but I never dared to imagine marriage. Not even at thirteen.

It wasn’t the first time Giselle had felt this strange fluttering in her belly. The first time was the summer she turned thirteen.

She was lying in a hammock in the shade of the backyard tree, taking her afternoon nap as she did every summer at their villa in the hills of the Costa Esmeralda. It was a moment of terrible, everyday routine.

'…Hm?'

Giselle was jolted from her slumber as someone gently lifted her. The familiar scent of his aftershave filled the air.

"Sir…?"

She slowly opened her eyes to the sight of a white linen shirt. The fine fabric, growing translucent, revealed the mature, sun-bronzed skin of a man beneath. It had started to rain.

"She must be in a deep sleep. I called for her, but she won't wake up."

Giselle closed her eyes again, listening to him speak to someone else. She loved this. She loved being held by him, just like this.

"Fetch something to cover her with."

It had been a sweltering day. Her body couldn’t bear the heat; she'd already showered five or six times.

"You're trembling."

But the warmth of his body made her shiver for some reason. It was like the first time he'd ever held her. Yet it was different. This was a shiver of pure, unfamiliar pleasure.

He laid Giselle down on the daybed in the drawing-room and draped a thin pareo over her. A large, gentle hand brushed a stray lock of hair from her forehead.

"Goodnight."

Then, a soft pressure on one side of her brow.

His lips lightly grazed the very spot his fingers had just touched, and then were gone.

Thud.

Her heart plummeted deep within her.

He sank back into his own hammock and returned to his book, utterly unaware that he had just stolen Giselle’s heart away.

It was all part of a familiar ritual. He would carry her inside when she couldn't be stirred. He would kiss her forehead before she slept.

Swoosh.

The ceiling fan spun on at its own lazy rhythm, humming a drowsy tune even as the rain beat a violent accompaniment against the windows. It was a chord held in mysterious harmony, even though each element sang to its own rules.

Creak.

The sound of a Lord’s fingertips turning a page with their own unique irregularity. From that rough, frictionary sound, she felt the profound relaxation of one who is the sole master of his own space and time.

He commanded the room not just with sound, but with scent.

As the bitter smell of rain carried on the damp air faded into the fan's gentle breeze, his own clean fragrance took its place.

The cool hint of mint left after a kiss on her forehead.

The persistent aroma of his aftershave lotion, lingering at the tip of her nose, making her feel as if she were still cradled in his arms.

His presence, felt through sound and scent.

Anon.

A quiet afternoon on the Costa Esmeralda, utterly dominated by all the sensations that formed the name 'Anon.'

This familiar routine first turned strange for her on a summer's day when she was thirteen.

That afternoon, Giselle had pretended to be asleep and secretly watched the Lord.

Watching his long fingers trace the spine of a book, seeing his dry lips part with a soft click… it made her face burn. It was the same searing heat she’d felt once, out of curiosity, when she’d dabbed a bit of his aftershave on her skin.

The burning didn't fade for a long time. It was like a fever. At thirteen, Giselle learned that love was a sickness, that this was more than just a metaphor.

An orphan, so ignorant of such matters, had dared to make a noble-born patron her first love.

But that first love did not survive the winter of that year.

Duke Eccleston had died. A presumed suicide.

When his brother died unmarried, he succeeded as the Duke.

The duty to produce an heir forced him to rescind his lifelong vow of celibacy. Women began to flock to him.

From the daughters of other dukes to the Grand Duchess of a certain duchy.

These women, worthy of being a Duchess, smelled so wonderful and looked so elegant, as if they were a different species altogether.

I, on the other hand, was nothing but a scrawny girl with a talent for gardening.

I used to read romantic novels and imagine myself as the heroine, with the hero feeling an intense attraction towards me.

Looking back, my face burns with shame.

It’s ridiculous that I ever thought of such a fierce attraction.

The daughter of a farmer, with a humble character instead of a dignity that still smells of the earth.

A poor war orphan who hasn't yet washed away the grime of burying her dead parents and brother with her own two hands.

The stubborn Roselle, who could only survive by clinging to someone in power, even if it meant shaving her head and facing death threats.

And the demon without blood or tears, who ate her own dog out of starvation.

How could he ever find me attractive as a woman?

From that day on, I swore I would never again have the audacity to think of him as a man.

But if he sees me as a woman, then it is no longer presumptuous.

So last night, I secretly took that old, fluttering feeling out from the depths of my chest and caressed it…

'I didn't think it through.'

I forgot how it wasn't always a good thing, for him to see me as a girl.

Thud.

The sound of a car door closing came from beyond the window. Giselle stood staring as the sedan pulled away from the house walls.

He had changed again. He never used to leave without saying goodbye to Giselle. Now, he had gone without a single word.

'I never asked for this.'

I didn't want him to distance himself from me, regretting that he had ever seen the girl he raised as a woman.

No, I never wanted him to see me as a woman again… not until last night.

'I wanted to show you the transcription when you got back. On the train ride back to Templeton, I just wanted to tell you about my day. Then we could have spent the rest of the day together in Templeton, like we used to.'

But Giselle’s simple dream would never come true, all because she had become a woman. The moment she got him back, she felt she had lost him.

'If I am to lose him for being a woman…'

Giselle decided then that for the Lord, she would not become one.

Now that I'm behind the wheel, I have to keep my eyes on the road…

'What the…'

No, his eyes were definitely on the road, but Loise couldn't help making eye contact with the blonde in the rearview mirror. He couldn't shake the image of her face from the restaurant.

The look on her face as she left, not knowing what to do, thinking it was her fault. He felt a pang of pity for her.

He wished he could have told her it wasn't Miss Bishop's fault.

He couldn't. He had been ordered not to take his eyes off the Duke from that moment on, and he honestly hadn't known what to say to Miss Bishop when she asked why he was keeping his distance.

'If only the Duke had created some distance more naturally…'

But there was no 'natural' way to create distance in a situation like that, he thought. He hadn't been able to come up with anything better.

Loise cut his own thoughts short as he observed his employer's complexion in the mirror.

Anyway, the last person I ever want to hurt is the Duke. He's the one who will suffer the most from all this.

It had been twenty-six years since Loise began serving the Ecclestons.

That meant he had witnessed firsthand the Duke's transformation from a boy to a man.

The history of his wounds.

It was why he had always given his affection to dogs, but never to people.

"Good day. This is Natalia Rudnik. She will be staying here from now on, so please treat her as my guest."

Until the day he suddenly brought home a war orphan.

It was a shock to everyone. No one understood. Not even Loise, who knew all of Edwin's story.

But as he watched, his thoughts began to change, and quickly.

'Perhaps this child can save our Duke.'

The Duke was compassionate by nature; it was a tragedy he'd had to suppress it.

What exactly made the girl pry open the Duke's locked heart was still a mystery, but Loise was sincerely grateful to Miss Bishop. In his heart, he had also begun to feel a flicker of hope.

Chapter 16.
'Perhaps one day you will feel something for other people,'

And then you fall in love, and you marry, and you have children, and you hope that one day you can fulfill the dreams that brought you to this point.

'If the war hadn't started again, I would have been here long ago....'

And now that the war is over, you will be able to fall in love and marry....

"Loise, there is something you ought to know about me."

The Duke was still fighting that accursed war, all by himself.

'Having to push away the only person I've ever felt connected to....'

As Loise struggled with the bitter taste in his mouth, an idea struck him.

"Duke, why don't we stop by the department store on the way back?"

"That's a good idea."

"Why?" he didn't ask. The only time The Duke ever went to a department store was to buy a gift for Miss Bishop, so he didn't need to state for whom he was stopping.

"Oh, that reminds me, it's time to buy her a birthday gift."

The Duke's face in the rearview mirror brightened noticeably, and for a moment, Loise felt relieved. But then his eyes narrowed again, as if deep in thought.

"What is it, Duke?"

"What should I get a girl who is about to enter university?"

That was his problem. Loise smiled so cheerfully that his glasses rode up.

"Don't worry about that; I know everything, don't I?"

"Ah, speaking of which, your daughter is in university; may I ask what you got her for her first day of class?"

"I bought her the ultimate gift for a girl who is starting to blossom into a woman—an ultra-light, ultra-fast Venta Model 38."

"...A handgun?"

"For any boy who bothers me, damn it!"

Loise pointed out the window and mimed firing the gun, then blew on the tip of his index finger as if smoke were wafting from the barrel. Edwin laughed, momentarily forgetting his worries.

"Making gifts isn't dangerous. The gifts are dangerous."

It was only a moment.

"I suppose I won't be able to give her what she truly wants."

The ancient temples of Athos, the desert nights, the summer on the Emerald Coast. Giselle must have told him about all of them, hoping he would join her. Her sudden change of heart about her desire to go to Templeton must mean she wanted to be with him.

He wanted it too, but he could only refuse.

"I must be a bad boy, if I don't want to be an evil one."

Edwin murmured his resolve to himself.

"You're not being a bad boy; everything is for Miss Bishop's good, so don't blame yourself."

"I should blame myself; I was a fool for not going to the graduation in the first place."

He had handed his angel over to the devil as a sacrifice.

"If you hadn't gone, you would be regretting it now. How sad Miss Bishop would have been. What a wide smile she had yesterday when she ran in and hugged The Duke. She was all smiles, and...."

Loise cut himself off and looked away, as if someone might be eavesdropping on their conversation in the lonely car.

"...he appeared, but nothing happened, right?"

Did truly nothing happen?

There was something Loise didn't know.

Edwin stared at the tip of his right thumb. It was clean now, but last night it was stained red.

'The same color as Giselle's lips....'

It must have been me—no, it must have been the devil—who wiped the lipstick off her lower lip. At least it wasn't on his lips. That is, I didn't get to kiss her, but even so, it was rude to touch her lips enough to remove her makeup.

"I didn't mean to be disrespectful."

Then why was Giselle lying?

It's unlikely she omitted it because she didn't think it was rude. Rather, she didn't tell me because she knew it was rude. I am the only family she has. It was clear that she was afraid of losing her family if she told them the truth.

'If I do this, she will hide worse things.'

If she likes him, everything is fine. As long as she had 'Sir' written across her face, she would tolerate any ugly thing the devil did and claim it was not disrespectful at all.

'This is not a small thing; it is a big thing.'

I can no longer trust him, not just him, but the child. Last night, he made a decision.

"I can't be alone with Giselle anymore."

No, I need to keep her away from me.

"You said you were looking forward to that moment."

"The day you look me in the face, you are going to...."*

As Duke Eccleston and commander of the army, there was no limit to the people Edwin could meet. If he wanted to, accessing the Commander-in-Chief would be no trouble.

But who would have thought that a man like him, a powder keg that could explode at any moment, would have set his sights not on the most powerful man in the world, but on the girl who had nothing? He had seen into his heart. He knew that to hurt Edwin the most, he had to touch Giselle.

'Why are you doing this to me? Why do you have to torment me?'

You don't get answers when you ask. The motive didn't matter in the first place. It doesn't matter what he plans to do to Giselle. Nor do I want to know if my ominous suspicions are correct.

I would not let the devil touch his angel again. That was the only thing that mattered.

Your angel?

How long do you think she will remain an angel?

And you?

How long can you continue to be an angel?

Kingsbridge University

The car carrying Edwin slowly drove through the campus, past the enormous gates emblazoned with the university's name.

There was no time to take a proper look at the campus that would be Giselle's home starting this autumn. Before even getting out of the car, Edwin took the trouble to put on his hat and sunglasses to ensure no one would recognize him.

"We have arrived, Duke."

The car stopped in the parking lot behind the medical faculty building. Edwin got out of the car with Loise and quickly headed into the building.

"Watch over me to make sure I don't do anything reckless."

"Of course."

Standing at the door of a laboratory on the third floor, he checked his wristwatch. He was fifteen minutes early.

Ding.

But that didn't stop Loise from knocking on the door. He was too much in a hurry to be discourteous.

"Who... Ah!"

A moment later, the door opened, and an elderly scholar peered out. It was Professor Fletcher.

"Come in."

The Professor smiled and opened the door wide. Edwin walked in without hesitation and apologized.

"I apologize for calling so early and asking to see you so soon."

"As I told you over the phone, it is a great honor for me."

Loise closed the door behind them. Seeing that Professor Fletcher was the only one in the private study, which was lined with bookshelves, Edwin took off his hat and sunglasses.

"Welcome to my laboratory. May I offer you something to drink? How about coffee, since it's morning?"

"This is going to be very long, so I won't say no."

The Professor blinked hard. A few moments later, they were sitting across from each other with a cup of coffee between them, the anticipation of what they were about to discuss radiating from their bodies.

Instead of taking out papers, Edwin looked at Loise. Loise pulled two folders from the brief case he was carrying and laid them out on the small table.

"This is...."

"It's a memorandum of confidentiality."

Professor Fletcher's eyes widened. The morning dullness that had remained in the corners of his eyes before the memorandum was handed to him vanished in an instant.

"I can only tell you if you promise not to tell anyone, anywhere, even anonymously, what you hear from me now."

"...Is it such a dangerous story?"

"It is not dangerous for you, Professor."

Only dangerous for Edwin.

An academic usually speaks well of his field of study whenever someone shows interest in it—Professor Fletcher had demonstrated that last night in Amherst Hall.

'I am not sure I trust him.'

So, for a while, I tried to observe him under the guise of being an interested supporter of multiple personality disorder, but when I realized the demons in my head were going after Giselle, I had no time to reconsider.

After all, Professor Fletcher is an authority on the subject. All other researchers in the country were his students. So there was no other choice.

Even so, I needed at least some guarantees—that's what I got: this memorandum of confidentiality.

Chapter 17.
"Let's take a look, then."

The Professor took a dry sip of his still-hot coffee and studied the memorandum.

"Hmmm...."

The stipulation that the data could not be used in papers or conference presentations elicited a thoughtful grunt of disapproval, but curiosity was a stronger force, and he stamped his signature without asking any questions.

Loise retrieved one of the signed memorandums. Now was the moment to disclose the secret.

"Professor."

Edwin raised the coffee cup in front of him and cleared his throat.

"I believe I have multiple personality disorder."

The Professor, who had just raised his own coffee cup after him, went completely rigid. He looked at Edwin in stark disbelief and then asked, still struggling with the idea:

"Then, don't tell me the patient you saw in the labor camp was...?"

"Yes. It was me."

"Are you certain?"

The Professor was immediately suspicious. He had encountered many fakes claiming to have multiple personalities, giving him ample reason to be skeptical.

'No. The Duke is already the center of attention; why on earth would he fabricate an illness to draw more notice?'

The Professor, quickly dismissing his initial suspicion, set down his coffee cup, opened the notebook lying nearby, and picked up a pen.

"According to the memorandum, you are not even supposed to take notes," Loise interrupted.

"Ah, of course."

The Professor immediately laid the pen down and smiled sheepishly.

"I apologize. I must have gotten a little carried away. It's not uncommon for that to happen in old age."

"You may ask me anything you wish, provided you adhere strictly to the memorandum."

Professor Fletcher paused before the opportunity, staring at Edwin with the eyes of a man unsure of what thread to pull first. He took a deep breath before formulating his opening question.

"You are currently the personality of The Duke himself, are you not?"

"Yes."

As expected of a true professional, the first question caught him off guard by its directness.

"How many other personalities have you experienced so far?"

"Only one."

"That is quite encouraging."

"You wouldn't find it encouraging if you knew how malicious and insidious that one is. Ah.... I'll have to warn my Professor."

He almost forgot this critical piece of information.

"He is a perfect imitation of me; I will warn you when he attempts to seize my body."

The Professor nervously swallowed, then asked in a more serious, weighted tone.

"Does this malignant personality have a name?"

"Lorenz."

'I must not elaborate beyond that. It is a name too well-known.'

"Lorenz.... Hmm...."

Purely from the non-Mercian name, the professor had already identified a very significant character trait.

"Tell me, then, when and how did Lorenz appear?"

"Approximately one month after I was incarcerated in the camp, strange occurrences began."

I started skipping time. When I would wake up, an hour or sometimes an entire day would have passed. I don't recall ever losing consciousness. I initially thought I had simply fallen asleep due to the exhaustion of my difficult life there.....

"The men I shared a cell with insisted I had been awake the entire time. I thought I was sleepwalking, but that wasn't it."

"How did you know you weren't sleepwalking?"

"They said I did something I would never do."

"Such as?"

"He told the guards in Constantinian that he was Constantinian."

I am Major Lorenz von Eisenhardt, Commander of the 3rd Fighter Wing of the Constanza Air Force.

I couldn't bring myself to tell the Professor what he had truly declared.

"He protested, shouted, and even threatened the guards for unjustly imprisoning their own people."

To be precise, he said: 'How dare you imprison a Steel Griffin.'

Steel Griffin.

The ace of the Constanza Air Force, a naturally gifted aviator who had shot down 100 Mercian aircraft in just one month. His own people called him the Steel Griffin, after the emblem of his family, the Barons of Eisenhardt, but the Mercian soldiers called him the Pale Raven. This was because he appeared in a combat plane camouflaged in a discreet, pale gray-blue, circling like a cemetery crow over the deaths he had caused, mocking them before vanishing.

This is not a fabricated tale of the 'Lorenz' personality. Lorenz von Eisenhardt was a real individual.

I am Major Lorenz von Eisenhardt, Commander of the 3rd Fighter Wing. Call sign Steel Griffin. Baron Eisenhardt.

I am trapped in an enemy body.

Get me out of here.

The words scrawled in blood on the cell's concrete wall were in Major Eisenhardt's own hand; the expressions and tone of voice were identical to his.

His father was Ernst von Eisenhardt. He died four years ago after falling from a horse.

His mother was Maria Louise, of the Römer Family. She was alive before he was incarcerated here, though she suffered from gout.

So she is still alive, isn't she?

Bring her in. She would recognize me.

I knew exactly who Major Eisenhardt was.

"I initially thought the enemy's spirit had possessed me."

But it wasn't until I had a cursed, one-sided conversation with the wall, treating it as letter paper, that I grasped the truth. The Lorenz von Eisenhardt in his head only knew what was already contained within Edwin's mind.

It is classified, so few people know, but Edwin commanded a spy unit in the Military Intelligence Service. His unit's mission was to eliminate enemy agents. In other words, assassinations.

It was no surprise that Lorenz von Eisenhardt, who terrorized the Mercian air force, was one of Edwin's targets. Consequently, Edwin knew a substantial amount about him. His background, all his relationships, every minute habit. The specific handwriting and common phrases were obviously collected by him through letters his agents had intercepted.

Edwin was so profoundly absorbed by the man he had mentally constructed, so intent on predicting his behavioral patterns, that he ultimately succeeded in assassinating Commander Eisenhardt. He mistakenly conflated the dead man's spirit with his own because the man was already gone.

But it was not the real Lorenz von Eisenhardt, only an impostor created in his own mind.

"Were you... tortured?"

"Yes, primarily psychological torture. They kept me sleep-deprived for entire days, or forced me to watch my allies being tortured, and maintained my solitary confinement for most of the time."

The Professor's face fell with profound pity.

"Normally, the disorder develops as a defense mechanism against extreme, overwhelming pain. I understand why he adopted the Constantinian identity, and I understand why you insisted on absolute secrecy."

For the very reason he had concealed from the Professor that he was not a mere civilian in an enemy country, but the persona of a ranking enemy military commander.

"But what persuaded you that this was multiple personalities and not a demonic possession?"

Edwin laughed bitterly. He remembered all the futile attempts he had made to exorcise the 'spirit of Lorenz' while convalescing at the Templeton mansion.

"I brought a priest to perform an exorcism, but it was useless."

"That is a story all patients tell."

"But the butler at the mansion had recently read your book; he pointed out that I had a case with symptoms similar to those you describe, which made him suspect multiple personalities."

"The butler is correct; you become an entirely different person, The Duke does not recall you at all.... Do you have any other symptoms?"

"None at first, but since the beginning of this year, I have begun experiencing symptoms when I transition between personalities."

"Which ones?"

"Hallucinations."

It begins as a whisper, but grows louder and louder, until it becomes utterly deafening—so loud that you cannot even hear your own voice. The bizarre, chaotic visions make your head feel ready to explode, and suddenly, you black out.

"You are experiencing conversion symptoms. Is it possible for you to initiate the personality switch yourself?"

"If I could, I would never have needed to come to you."

"But Lorenz, can he seize control of The Duke whenever he wants?"

Edwin nodded. 'Control' was the only accurate word.

"Can you communicate with each other?"

"Only through writing."

"You cannot speak to each other within your minds."

"Yes."

He does not answer Edwin's direct questions. Nor does he speak directly to him. When he switches personalities, he speaks, but it is more of a one-way whisper than a true conversation with Edwin.

"What does he say when he whispers?"

Chapter 18.
"He sings a song or...."

...or he simply sings a military tune, changing the lyrics to Giselle.

"He mutters angrily, but it's hard to follow because he speaks quickly, murmuring dozens of things at once."

"So, it is utterly impossible for you to recall what Lorenz was doing when he was awake, or to read his thoughts or feelings?"

"I cannot, at all. While he controls my body, I cease to function, as if a switch has been thrown: it’s like I am asleep."

"You say 'I cannot,' do you mean Lorenz can?"

Edwin had to nod, a look of profound regret on his face.

"He seems capable of searching through old memories. I sometimes get the distinct impression that I am being watched inside this head, even in my waking moments."

Last night, he had been watching Giselle at the ball; he had sung a military song with her name.

"Then Lorenz must be watching me right now."

Professor Fletcher looked deeply into Edwin’s eyes. It was as if he were throwing down the gauntlet to the parasite who was likely staring back at the man he wanted to kill from the center of his pupil.

"Mr. Lorenz, it is a pleasure to meet you. I am certain we will be seeing a lot of each other."

The Professor began speaking directly to the alternate personality.

"How does it feel to be here in Mercia, Mr. Lorenz?"

"......."

"Mr. Lorenz, you must be shy. Heh heh."

I thought he would lash out at the Professor's provocation, but there was no whisper.

"Then I must ask The Duke: what is Lorenz like?"

Edwin's teeth clenched at the unpleasantness of the very idea.

"He is the last type of man I would ever want to associate with: rogue, disloyal, petty, cunning, and frankly, vicious...."

"Hmmm... I would like an objective explanation, not one based on the subjective rage you feel toward a thief who steals another man's body."

"It is objective. That is the gentle way of putting it, Professor. I am certain you would agree if you ever had to deal with him."

"So you say Lorenz has committed evil deeds."

I had already resolved to speak, but it was not easy to open my mouth.

"What was it?"

Edwin confessed only after the Professor gently pressed him.

"I forced a guard to commit suicide at a prisoner-of-war camp."

"......."

"He truly killed himself."

I closed my eyes and opened them, still reeling from the shock of seeing the body hanging and swinging right in front of me. Being in solitary confinement, I was nearly blamed for murdering the guard. The cunning devil had tried to land Edwin in trouble by killing a man. Fortunately, the jailer was exonerated because someone had witnessed him entering Edwin's cell that day with a rope and a chair.

"My God.... Forcing a prisoner to commit suicide is certainly evil, but I cannot believe a jailer would actually go through with it."

This, too, is a doubt that stems from never having experienced the devil himself.

"Is it not possible that the guard was suicidal in the first place and merely gave in, not because of Lorenz?"

"That is not true."

He had just gotten married. I could always hear him over the window grate bragging about his wife to the other guards. Furthermore, he was far too religious to commit suicide.

"Then how did you make him take his own life?"

"The only weapon he possesses is words. He manipulates people with words."

Manipulating people with words.

It suddenly occurred to Edwin that perhaps 'Lorenz' was a side effect of the experiment.

Project Spectre.

An ultra-secret mind control experiment conducted by military intelligence. Its goal was to create an army of psychics, based on the theory that ordinary people could acquire psychic powers through training. Instead of the dangerous front lines, they would sit safely in their rear offices, killing and disrupting the enemy with their thoughts and securing victory. The intentions were good, but the methods were flawed, which is why it is no surprise the project never succeeded.

The program was top secret, and participants were selected from the military; Edwin had been a test subject for about three months. His training focused on telepathy and suggestibility.

The telepathy training was scandalous. A cartoon-mad scientist told him to match the frequency of his brainwaves with the brainwaves of the person next door, then told him he had no talent. It was Edwin's first failure.

Suggestibility was at least realistic. A psychological technique where you don't say what you mean, but convey it indirectly to get the target to do it. Edwin took his suggestibility experiments seriously, as it was a technique his spies used when approaching a target. But when what started as mild suggestion grew to the point where he was asked to sit across from a condemned man and induce him to commit suicide, Edwin stopped.

'The devil has completed the experiment I abandoned, all by himself.'

He could see where this view of humans as lab rats came from, a view the real Lorenz von Eisenhardt never held.

"The other guards saw him talking to 'Lorenz' for days on end; no one knows what they talked about."

The dead guard was the most sanctimonious and indifferent of them all. What horror it must have caused his colleagues that the most unshakeable man of all had been swayed by mere words and taken his own life. Since then, the guards feared Edwin like a monster and avoided him.

"You are a new and not very old personality, yet you have a personality and abilities clearly distinct from the primary personality."

Edwin knew why, but he pretended not to.

"The difference in symbols is also evident."

According to the aide, Loise, and the Templeton butler, who observed him out of the corner of their eyes, there were a few things he repeatedly requested. Cigars were one of them.

"He sometimes falls silent for a while after smoking a Constanza cigar."

"Cigars, ha ha, he is a very extravagant man."

And dangerous.

In the camp, I once told a guard that if he could get me one of those cigars, I would tell him the secrets of the Mercian Army.

"Do you like it? I will give it to you if you tell me the rest."

"...What did I say I would tell you?"

Fortunately, he only took the cigar and allowed Edwin to disseminate the secrets. Edwin also had to suffer the retribution.

How long would this luck last?

Edwin realized. A time bomb had been placed on the vault containing the most sensitive secrets of the Mercian Army. His mind held the identities of Mercian spies infiltrated in Constanza, or informants who were from Constanza; the enemy could scrutinize them at any moment. If he starts selling names one by one for a cigar, they will be eliminated, and Mercia's spy network will collapse. And then the front could potentially collapse.

It was at this point that Edwin first contemplated suicide, desperately trying to survive with only Giselle on his mind.

The only way to kill the demons in my head is to kill myself.

Even after returning home safely, Edwin remained worried. He knew he couldn't return to the military with a mole in his head, so he requested a prolonged leave of absence.

"But I never thought I would leave the army to get closer to Giselle...."

Edwin nodded, snapped out of his reverie by the Professor's words.

"And that's why you've skipped the parades since you got back."

"I can't be saluting my people with one hand and smoking an enemy country's cigar with the other."

The corner of his mouth, which had twisted into a gesture of bitter jest, immediately hardened.

"I don't want to keep hiding like this forever."

"I know how you feel. Don't worry too much, Duke. I told you that cases of cure are rare, but not non-existent."

"Let's hope I am one of those rare lucky ones."

"I will do everything I can to cure you."

"But how will you cure him?"

The Professor prefaced his answer by saying it is not an easy illness, which is why he recommended an early and aggressive, albeit somewhat radical, intervention to eliminate the personality.

"Have you heard of the frontal lobotomy?"

The Professor smiled and raised his hands when he saw Edwin's eyes widen.

"I am only informing you that it exists, but I do not recommend it. If the head of a ducal family and the hero admired by the entire world were to become crippled, I would have to take a room here at Kingsbridge myself."

"Then what remedy do you recommend for me?"

The Professor stroked his beard, paused, and then spoke.

Chapter 19.

"Compared to a frontal lobotomy, electroshock therapy is far safer and more effective."

"It won't work for me."

"You won't know until you try—"

"I've had it done. A dozen times."

It would be fair to say the professor was stunned.

"In a prisoner of war camp."

As a method of torture.

"Ah.... I see why you're reluctant. But don't worry, this is a much weaker current, applied only to the head for a very short time. They'll certainly administer it after anesthesia, so you won't feel any pain."

"It's not that it hurts. It's that it doesn't work. The electric shock didn't make him disappear."

"That's because the specialist didn't apply the current precisely where it was needed."

Edwin narrowed his eyes and stared at the professor wordlessly before asking a sharp question.

"Is there a single multiple personality disorder patient for whom electroshock therapy has worked?"

"Uhm... that is..."

The professor stammered, unable to give an immediate answer.

"It's a therapy still in development, and as you know, there are so few people with multiple personality disorder that we have no case studies..."

When he asked why the professor had mentioned lobotomy first—a procedure he didn't even recommend—it was to make the treatment he was about to propose sound less horrifying by comparison.

To test this experimental treatment on me.

Edwin was sick of being experimented on.

"Professor Fletcher, I do not wish to be used as your guinea pig."

The polite but severe warning was met with surrender.

"I didn't mean it that way, but I see. Let us first try the softer approach of hypnosis and drugs, then."

Edwin took the professor's extended hand, wishing him well in his future endeavors, but he did not smile as cheerfully as his opponent.

He is a man whose business is the human mind, so he has a gift for manipulating it.

But Edwin had no option left except suicide.

Parasites?

That's what the bitch you're raising should hear.

Demons?

You're being a bit harsh.

For a subject who hasn't yet encountered true evil.

"You're back."

Giselle, who had been spying out the window through a gap in the lace curtains, retreated to her seat as the car carrying the Lord stopped before the main door.

As she sank back into the armchair, a deep, husky voice carried from the floor below, resonating all the way to the second story.

"Where is Miss Bishop?"

"She's in the second-floor sitting room."

The maid's reply was followed by the muffled sound of footsteps on the carpet. Giselle listened as he ascended and quickly took the letter from its envelope on the side table, opening it.

"Alright, I'm ready."

Now all you have to do is walk through that door he deliberately left wide open. Then, pretend to greet him and hand him this...

Giselle held the letter in her hand in a way that made it visible from the doorway. Surely he'll have to pass by here to get to his bedroom, so the least he can do is say hello...

"Good afternoon, Miss Bishop. I was wondering if I might have a few minutes of your time."

"Huh?"

Something happened that hadn't been part of Giselle's calculations. The Lord had entered her sitting room.

"My, my, my. For a grown woman, you have quite a temper."

Unlike this morning, he seemed playful, almost teasing.

Why, suddenly?

She blinked, confused by his unusual mood, and forgot her plan entirely.

"What was that?"

He asked, tilting his head at an angle as he approached. Giselle snapped out of her daze, folding the letter and slipping it into her pocket.

"Nothing."

At Giselle's blunt response, the Lord made a face as if his faithful puppy had bitten his ankle.

"Loise, did you hear that? She's already at the age of keeping secrets from me."

"I was keeping secrets from you long before I was this age."

"Well, Giselle Bishop, you've deceived me. I shall repay you for today's humiliation."

I can't believe he's making a big deal out of this. I wonder where he's been and what he's been doing that he's not the same person he was this morning.

"Where have you been?"

"That's a secret until you tell me what you've been hiding."

She didn't really need to ask. The paper bag Loise had placed on the side table had the name of a famous department store printed on it in fancy lettering.

"What's this?"

"A gift. For a certain person."

"A gift?"

"Open it."

He sat on the sofa and patted the seat beside him.

"Do you mind if I sit next to you?"

She hesitated to do something that had always been so effortless. It wasn't her fault.

"Weren't you trying to distance yourself from me?"

she asked, confused by his contradictory attitude.

I don't know. You told me to sit down.

Giselle cautiously approached and sat beside him, opening the gift box. Then...

"Cosmetics?"

Her eyes widened at the unexpected present.

Why cosmetics?

Giselle was struggling so hard to be a girl, so why would he give her a gift that would make her more of one?

"Don't go to your friend's house for this anymore."

"Oh..."

After forgetting about the hairdresser and makeup yesterday, Giselle had stopped by Elena's to get made up before the ball.

I can't believe you knew. After 4 years of seeing this seemingly careless person be so attentive, it moved me to see it again.

"...."

And after 4 years apart, she had forgotten how much she hated saying thank you.

"I'll manage."

She smiled while hugging the box containing the cosmetics set. His eyes crinkled with satisfaction.

"I didn't know what you needed, so I got everything they recommended. But if I missed something, tell me, and I'll bring you another."

"Actually, I don't know what I'm missing either."

The two amateurs laughed and opened the boxes one by one, looking at them like children faced with a toy they'd never seen before.

"Why is there shoe polish here?"

"It's not polish, it's mascara."

At least he wasn't as ignorant as Giselle.

"Mascara?"

"It's something you put on your eyelashes like this, to make them longer and fuller."

"Oh... why did they put it in a shoe polish tin? I'm confused."

"Are you sure you're confused? Didn't you know what mascara was?"

She bit her lower lip hard and gave him an ironic smile. His hand moved towards the lipstick lying neatly to one side of the box.

"That's not a rifle cartridge."

"I know that, Miss."

He picked up a lipstick, opened it, twisted the base, pushed the stick all the way up, and murmured.

"This looks like a colored pencil to me."

He brought the red lipstick close to Giselle's lips. She looked at his lips, then his eyes, and her mouth curved into a soft smile.

"It's pretty."

"......."

"......."

In that moment, Giselle's cheeks flushed the color of her lipstick. The Lord's smile faltered. He cleared his throat loudly.

He hurriedly put away the lipstick as if he had accidentally touched something hot. His gaze shifted away from her lips, and with it, his eyes.

Giselle's heart skipped a beat.

He's thinking about last night, too.

From the way his eyes wavered and then shifted away from her like a guilty man, Giselle was sure.

What am I going to do?

She had resolved to never be seen as a woman by him again, but there was nothing she could do to stop him from remembering it himself.

Is he going to distance himself from me again?

Just as she swore to herself that this time she wouldn't let him pull away like she did at the breakfast table...

"No!"

Giselle involuntarily grabbed his hand.

"Sir, you're ruining my lipstick!"

"Oh, sorry."

He blushed, realizing he hadn't retracted the lipstick and was only trying to close the cap.

Giselle pushed his hand away as she snatched the lipstick back. He laughed heartily, undoing and redoing the cufflinks that still hung intact at the ends of his sleeves.

"Next time, I'll have to buy you a pistol to make up for today's defeat."

"Then I admit defeat in advance."

It was just as well that he was the consummate expert when it came to firearms, and she was a terrible shot.

"Anyway, I'll put it to good use."

As she packed the cosmetics from the table back into the box, he pulled up the cuff of his shirt sleeve and checked his wristwatch.

Oh, not yet.

Thinking it was a gesture that he was about to leave, Giselle opened her mouth to finally accomplish her momentarily forgotten goal, but...

"Just in time..."

"I heard you were going to have breakfast."

He didn't leave. Instead, he spoke up abruptly. He must have asked the maid.

Chapter 20.
"I apologize for being out so early. I forgot I had an appointment today, and then I remembered."

I knew he was lying, but I was happy he was deceiving me. It was enough for me to know he cared about my mood. Now I understood why he had bought me a gift without warning. He was remorseful. The fact that it was cosmetics meant nothing to him.

"What about the trips?"

"What?"

"Did you find any friends to go with you?"

"Everyone has their own plans."

"Really? Well, you are leaving it quite late."

No, I didn't bring it up.

"...You can't go, can you? I don't mind you coming for a few days...."

"I don't think that will be possible."

He was still trying to push me away.

Aside from feeling pity for her, his resolve didn't seem to have changed.

"What if we go to Templeton?"

"I have to go alone, don't I?"

He gave me a worried look instead of an answer.

But it was better to be ashamed once than to go through it again and again. Giselle made up her mind and asked the difficult question.

"Duke, does my presence make you uncomfortable?"

"Of course not."

Just as Giselle had expected, the man was caught off guard by the sudden question and revealed his true feelings.

"I just feel sorry for you."

I feel sorry for you, not that you make me uncomfortable—that was unexpected.

"I'm sorry to have you stuck in this small house because I'm so busy. You have three months to create memories that will last a lifetime."

"If that's the case, you don't have to worry. I already have things I want to do in Richmond."

Giselle pulled the letter she had been pretending to hide from her pocket.

"Do you remember Mr. Boswell, the man I danced with last night? He wrote to me."

"Oh...."

The Duke stared at the letter with a puzzled expression and then murmured to himself:

"The one he disqualified?"

"What?"

"Do you like him?"

Giselle smiled broadly and nodded her head vigorously, but inside she was thinking the exact opposite.

"No, I don't like him. I'm just grateful."

Giselle was grateful enough to invite him out for a few more dances.

"You said one day you didn't like him because he couldn't dance, but you never know what a girl feels. So, are you going out with him?"

Giselle nodded again, this time enthusiastically.

It wasn't a lie. She would indeed meet him. Maybe once or twice? After that, she was going to politely decline and keep up the pretense in front of him.

Look, Duke. I am with another guy; I am not interested in you.

Because it's a spectacle to prove to him that I'm not interested in him.

Giselle received the letter, reflected, and had an epiphany. She tried acting like a child to prevent him from seeing her as a woman, but that had a limit. No matter what she did, if he saw her as a woman, as he did before, everything was in vain.

But pretending that Giselle doesn't see you as a man, pretending she is already another man's woman—that has no limits....

"Should I have bought you a pistol after all?"

I blinked hard, startled by the sudden sound. He looked at the item in Giselle's hand.

"The letter, may I see it? You don't have to show me if you don't want to."

"You can look."

Without hesitation, she handed it over. The letter was formal and contained nothing that could be construed as rude or overly personal.

So I thought I was safe.....

"He's asking out a girl he just met yesterday in a very seasoned, aggressive way, like a flirt who has asked out this girl and that girl many times."

That's how Giselle felt. In fact, I think that's what she liked about him—he didn't know that.

I don't need to feel sorry for an exhausted guy who isn't going to be serious about me after one or two dates, do I?

Giselle quickly replied, afraid the stranger would accuse her of flirting.

"I like experienced men."

His narrowed eyes opened wide and snapped toward Giselle. He looked shocked, like a man who had just heard a one-year-old spit out its first swear word.

"What has Fullerton done to my innocent girl? I'm going to sue the headmistress."

He continued reading the letter with an impassive face, his brow suddenly scrunching into a severe line.

"What is it?"

"A scoundrel."

"Ah...."

"Should I allow this cripple to marry my fine young woman?"

Giselle, genuinely afraid he would object, glared at him.

"You said I didn't need your permission."

"...True."

It sounded like an answer spoken through clenched teeth.

"So I'm going to stay here."

With that, both my problem and his were solved.

"...Alright."

But why does he still look worried?

Edwin woke up.

He looked up and did not see the familiar ceiling, but a familiar face.

"...Is that you, Duke?"

He hadn't fallen asleep; another personality had taken over during his psychotherapy session with Professor Fletcher.

Edwin nodded and checked his wristwatch out of habit. Twenty-six minutes had passed since he last looked at it.

"Twenty-two minutes, according to my stopwatch."

The exact answer came from the Professor, who was already aware of his obsessive habits.

"Apparently, Mr. Lorenz didn't have much to say today."

The first consultation with Professor Fletcher a month prior had resulted in the meeting with 'Mr. Lorenz' that he so eagerly anticipated.

"Call me as soon as the other personality reappears."

The Professor had even written his home phone number on the back of his business card, saying that a more precise diagnosis and treatment plan would be possible if he could meet the other personality.

"Anytime is fine, even the middle of the night. Please don't hesitate to call."

Despite the Professor's willingness to sacrifice sleep, the first encounter with Lorenz was surprisingly easy and refreshing. The man who had since been deathly silent presented himself for his first therapy session.

"Instead of being wary of me, he was glad to have someone listen to him."

To my astonishment, he was so pleased that he spent an hour talking about me to the Professor. I wondered if he just wanted to talk to someone. He had been popping in and out of my life for a year without warning or regularity, but now it seemed he only looked forward to counseling sessions.

There was another unexpected behavior.

'I thought he was going to tell him he was Lorenz von Eisenhardt....'

Apparently, the man who enjoyed stating his 'name' and 'identity' in the camp had not yet told the Professor. Edwin felt both relieved and suspicious, as he had been prepared for the Professor to discover his alter ego.

'Why isn't he telling him?'

However, it didn't seem like a good idea to ask the Professor why; he might have forgotten, and reminding him would be even worse.

Today, Edwin asked the customary questions as soon as he regained his strength.

"What did he say today?"

"He complained that he spends too much time asleep. He wants to wake up, but his body won't listen to him."

Both men smiled with satisfaction simultaneously.

"If you take the sleeping pills, you won't have to worry about other personalities waking up and wandering around while you sleep. With this quantity, no matter how many personalities take over your body, your body won't listen to them."

The Professor was right; the sleeping pills were working to keep those demons at bay.

"And he wants to go out and see Richmond's streets instead of staying home."

"You can tell him he can explore Richmond to his heart's content whenever he wants by searching through my memories."

The Professor laughed bitterly at Edwin's firm refusal.

He was being too inflexible.

I didn't want to show any flexibility or mercy to a parasite I would be willing to lay on the operating table to kill if I could just rip him out of my head. But when a parasite knows how to manipulate his host's mind and body, one must compromise.

"He could wander around the city for an hour a day, as long as he doesn't take over my body along the way."

The Professor's bitter smile somehow did not fade as he took a flexible step backward.

"It's not like that."

 Chapter 21.
"Then what is it about?"

The Professor let out an embarrassed squeak before answering, and with good reason.

"Mr. Lorenz wishes to enjoy the city at night, not during the day."

He wanted to meet a woman. In a bar, or a club, perhaps somewhere much worse.

"From what I have heard, Mr. Lorenz is a womanizer who cannot live without women, so why does The Duke have none?"

"If I cannot live without them, I would rather die without them."

The Professor burst into laughter at his sarcasm. Edwin laughed too.

It was ridiculous.

'What? A homosexual?'

Lorenz von Eisenhardt was a womanizer, of course. But was the parasite in his head who was impersonating him also a womanizer? Edwin had no experience with women, so there was no 'Lorenz' in him. It was absurd that he should claim to know the pleasures of the female body so well that he could not live without it.

"I suppose a woman could be a good leash."

But the Professor was not amused.

"Let's use that as a carrot-and-stick approach to keep him in check. We can strike a deal whereby, in exchange for living as The Duke desires during the day, Mr. Lorenz will have the woman of his choosing at night."

The Professor must have seen the answer on his face, but he dared to ask.

"What do you think? I don't think it's a bad deal for The Duke."

"That would never...."

I was about to draw a firm line in the sand, but then a thought struck me.

'Perhaps if there is another girl, he won't go after her.'

It turns out he was born in a prisoner-of-war camp and never saw a woman during his entire incarceration. He hadn't even spoken to a woman until the day of the ball, when he was sent back to the camp. So Giselle may have been the very first woman he ever encountered.

"He said he was looking forward to it."

He wasn't looking forward to meeting Giselle; he was looking forward to meeting a woman.

Perhaps he wasn't planning to harm her, but only reaching out to her because she was the nearest female to him. If so, that's good. Another girl would mean Giselle would be safe.

"...That sounds like a good idea."

I was tired of turning down matchmakers; the position of Duchess had been vacant for over a decade. I should get married.

Edwin thought he had made a breakthrough, but just as his thoughts reached this point, he was perplexed again.

"But who would want to meet and marry a multiple personality?"

What woman would want two husbands? What woman in the world could endure a husband who occasionally turned into a sordid lecher?

'What if one of them turns out to be an evil hero from an enemy nation?'

It would have to be a woman who loved him enough to take that secret to the grave, but love is never easy. The thought of handing the woman he loved over to a demon who treated humans as toys horrified him. At his core, it wasn't a good idea at all.

"Ah.... I see you are thinking about a serious relationship, Duke. I am certain Mr. Lorenz would be satisfied with a bit of flirting with the women of the night."

"...I suppose so."

The Professor had hinted from the beginning that he wanted me to purchase a woman. But such scandalous behavior was not in Edwin's lexicon; his mind had been limited to normal relations, like dating and marriage.

"That would never occur to me."

It goes against his deepest beliefs.

"You are a soldier, you have been on the battlefield for so long, I thought you would have no objection to this, but I suppose not."

Professor Fletcher was surprised by The Duke's aversion.

"I have always honored the pre-marital vow of chastity I took at the age of 13. I will be faithful to my future wife."

So unlike Eccleston.

The Duke's words reminded the Professor of his old nursery rhyme taunt. What is the Eccleston boy made of? Above the waist, a noble gentleman; below the waist, a humble relief. It was a mockery of the Eccleston family's history of men who fell short and caused scandalous, nation-shaking affairs.

When you add the fact that The Duke's father and older brother were also the subject of gossip over their liaisons with women, The Duke's condemnation is hard to understand. Oh well....

"This is going to be a difficult cohabitation."

Two completely different personalities sharing one body.

"I am being cautious, but there is a theory that separate personalities are an expression of repressed desires."

One of The Duke's eyebrows arched at an angle.

"The idea is that you repress your sexuality, which all humans have, so thoroughly that it turns into a second self. And what would a self created by repressing your sexuality think about?"

"Only women."

"I wonder if that is why he developed a personality so different from The Duke's, one with an inclination for the fairer sex. Perhaps if you release him from his desires, Lorenz's character will weaken."

"Are you telling me that this disease is not a sequela of the war, but something I have been too patient with?"

The Duke, who had been listening with his index finger pressed against his temple, frowned as if he had heard something preposterous.

"I say it could be, but it's not that ridiculous."

The Professor did not back down when The Duke's expression became uncomfortable. He expected that a man who had lived his life with abstinence as a defense mechanism would not readily accept this theory.

"Man is a kettle on the fire."

He lifted a kettle in the center of the small table.

"If you tightly cap it, the pressure of the steam overcomes you, and the boiling water overflows through the spout. But if you leave the lid off... the steam escapes, and the water does not boil over."

"Professor, I have never held it in."

Professor Fletcher was completely wrong.

"I am the type of person who gets fed up before I feel the need."

My mother had a nervous breakdown after his father's infidelity, which had been constant since they were newlyweds. A father who seduced and took up with his lovers, from the aunt who cared for him and his brother in place of his mother to the tutor Edwin secretly admired. His older brother, who despised his father and went on to do things far worse. It was only natural that Edwin, who from a young age had been forced to witness man's degradation into a beast by his own lust, would distrust pleasure before ever knowing it.

"And if that is what you say, then all the priests who have to repress their libido throughout their lives should be like me."

"How many clergymen do you think truly repress their sexuality?"

Edwin brought up the story that had made the Professor laugh bitterly.

"Anyway, I am certain 'Lorenz' is not the only one with a sexual impulse, but you seem to be obsessed with it."

It wasn't the first time he had revealed his sexuality; he had long since indulged in far more dangerous pleasures. The suicidal guard had not been the only one in the camp the demon had played with, Edwin suspected that the shootouts between guards that had occurred earlier had also been caused by his estrangement. The demon, toying with the human mind, getting pleasure from it.

Edwin had no such desires. This persona was not an expression of repressed desire. It is the twisted product of a mind-control experiment.

If he could have told him this, the Professor would not have been so lost.

"Well... many more mental problems stem from lust than The Duke believes. If 'Lorenz' is a sequela of the war, I don't think it's too impossible to extinguish him."

The Professor picked up the empty kettle and stood, changing the subject.

"You have only been treating him for a month, and you seem to have him under control already."

Edwin could only nod.

"He appears less and less frequently and occupies my body for shorter periods. This week he has only appeared during the counseling sessions."

"Mr. Lorenz also has some complaints, but overall, life doesn't seem to be going too badly right now. It will still be tough to return to the military, but if the current balance continues, I think you'll do well seeing people."

"That is good to hear."

Still, word of his stay in Richmond has spread; he has been receiving requests to meet here and there, and it has been difficult to turn them all down.

"You don't think he's going to try to manipulate and harm anyone, do you?"

Chapter 22.

"You don't need to worry about that. Lord Lorenz only becomes excited when the conversation turns to the camp. His aggression was likely a temporary stress response to a dangerous environment. Now that he is in a much more comfortable setting, there is no reason for him to harm others."

The Professor, who had returned to his seat, paused as he tilted the teapot over his cup, as if a thought had just occurred to him.

"By the way, does Lord Lorenz still murmur angry words when the personality switches?"

"Yes, that is still the case."

The Professor narrowed his eyes, seemingly disturbed.

"Why is he so angry?"

"When I was in the camp, I believe he was angry about his situation, angry about having to suffer while trapped. But now, he is neither trapped nor suffering, so I don't know why he remains angry."

"That is... somewhat concerning. When I counsel him, he doesn't seem that furious. Well... perhaps as we get to know him better, we will learn directly from him."

Hot tea flowed into the empty cup.

"Now, it's time for you to tell me how you've been. You look tired today. It has been a month, so the side effects of the sleeping pills should have subsided by now."

"There may be new side effects."

"What side effects are you referring to?"

"These days, I have trouble sleeping due to the same recurring nightmare every night. Could that be a side effect of the sleeping pills?"

"Hmm... What kind of nightmare?"

Edwin hesitated. It was a dream he didn't want to recall, and he felt uncomfortable discussing it with anyone.

In the dream, Giselle, whom he had met at the farm, was lying in a pool of icy blood. This time, there were no other corpses beside her. Only a pool of blood gathering beneath her. It was not someone else's blood; it was Giselle's blood.

"Giselle! No, stay with me!"

Rushing to hold her in his arms, Edwin saw the bright red blood flowing between the girl's pale legs. Who would dare do this to her? His heart broke, and rage boiled within him. Edwin woke up in a fury, wanting to kill whoever had harmed his child.

"It is a dream where something terrible happens to a girl like my daughter." He offered the Professor only this explanation.

"I have thought about why I keep having this dream... I believe it is because that girl has recently started seeing a man."

"Ah."

"I worry that something bad might happen."

"That is a concern every father with a daughter has."

The Professor, whose youngest daughter was Giselle's classmate, nodded profoundly in understanding.

"Sometimes worries manifest themselves as dreams. And nightmares are often caused by sleeping pills. It's quite normal, so there's no need to fret."

"I see...."

While his anxieties about the nightmare were somewhat relieved, the worries that caused the nightmares still weighed heavily on him.

"You said her name was Giselle Bishop, correct? The prodigy who recently graduated as the top of her class at Fullerton?"

"Yes, that's right. In fact, I came to see you today partly because I am concerned that my other personality might harm her."

"Has he ever threatened the girl?"

"He hasn't threatened her, but he presented himself to her at the debutante ball."

Edwin wasn't sure if he should mention the anecdote of later finding her lipstick on his fingertips.

"Ah... I see. Does Miss Bishop know about your condition?"

"No, she does not."

It is already difficult for adults to accept such a story, let alone telling it to an adolescent.

"Fortunately, they have not met since. But I am still anxious, so I tried to send her away, but it hasn't been easy. I wanted her to travel, but she said she wanted to stay because she is dating a man."

"Haha, you must have been in quite a difficult spot."

He had tried to move out of the townhouse himself, but that plan had also failed. He had tried to rent a house or stay in a hotel, but......

"She got angry when I told her, 'You're so wrapped up in your man that you won't even stay home....'"

"You're saying the very same things I say to my daughter! Hahaha!"

The Professor roared with laughter, slapping his knee. Edwin, with a frustrated look, picked up his teacup. His ears were red, as if he felt embarrassed.

Although the Professor was the leading authority in his field, socially he was still below the young man seated across from him. Perhaps because of his noble birth, or perhaps simply his nature, Edwin was always polite, but not particularly warm. If someone mistook his courtesy for kindness and crossed a line, they would likely experience his cold rejection despite his politeness.

He is a man with clear boundaries. However, he was not one to let others know where those limits lay. He didn't trust people enough to give them that much information, so only those shrewd enough to figure out the boundaries for themselves stayed around him. Being the top authority in his field was not a position one earned easily. The Professor, having analyzed countless personalities, had already figured out what kind of person Edwin was.

Despite knocking on the Professor's door for help, Edwin did not fully trust him. That's why he was always difficult to deal with. But when the conversation turned to the child, he became an ordinary father.

"You truly must think of Miss Bishop as your own daughter. Since what age have you been raising her?"

"I have raised her since she was ten years old."

"Then you have practically raised her as your own parents did."

"Well, I was away at war, so we only spent four years together. Parents who have raised their children from birth to adulthood might laugh at me, but still, I have raised her as my own."

"Who could laugh at you? It is one thing to be responsible for your own daughter, but to take in and raise someone else's child, a war orphan with no connection to you, is a true act of sacrifice."

"Sacrifice..."

That was a word he heard often. Edwin deeply disliked that word. What had he sacrificed for that child?

"I've never thought of it that way. In fact, she has always been a great source of comfort to me."

"Hmm... In what way does she comfort you?"

"When I regret becoming a soldier."

The Professor tilted his head, as if unable to believe what he had just heard. And it was understandable. To the world, Edwin was known as the model of the devoted soldier, someone who willingly gave up the comfort and security of his ducal title to serve his country.

"After experiencing the war, I have always regretted becoming a soldier. But when I see her smile so innocently, I think that perhaps becoming a soldier wasn't such a bad choice after all."

At least I saved you.

Giselle was the proof that his decision had not been in vain. Seeing her grow gave him a tangible sense of the purpose of a soldier's duty: to fight to protect. It also reinforced his faith in humanity's resilience. Whenever Giselle directly proved to him that his rushed conclusion was completely wrong, Edwin was happy to be mistaken.

"Growing strong in both body and mind, even dating like everyone else, is something to be proud of...."

Edwin offered a bitter smile. This was because he had never forgotten the worry that led him to talk about Giselle, despite having come to resolve the issue of 'Lorenz.'

"I thought there would be no worries once she grew up, but that was not the case."

"A father's worries never end. Even when the world sees them as grown, in my eyes they still look like naive children. It makes my nerves fray to send them out into the world alone."

Edwin nodded deeply, remembering the fight they had when Giselle first started meeting men.

Flashback
⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

"Giselle, I told you not to go meet that scoundrel without a bodyguard!"

"Duke, I am not a child."

"Your birthday is a month away, so legally, you are still a child."

"Then should I throw a tantrum like a child?"

"That would be a sight to behold. Loise, bring a camera right now!"

"...Duke, I hate you."

"The Duke likes you."

Chapter 23.

Edwin was an expert at comforting Giselle. Since he hadn't used this method in four years, it worked even better. However, she had also grown more skilled in those four years, and after a two-hour argument the following day, it was Edwin who finally waved the white flag. She even threatened him that if he tried to give her a chaperone, she would stop eating.

That shameless brat; she doesn't even understand my heart.

He had bitten his previously smooth lower lip so hard it had become uneven, then he confided his feelings to the Professor.

"I have seen too many women hurt by despicable men. I cannot shake the worry that my daughter might be hurt too."

That must have been the reason he had started having those dreams.

"Lately, I've found myself thinking, 'I am not happy that Giselle is growing up.'"

He wished she could forever remain the happy child, always with dirt on her toes from vigorously running through green fields and grass stains on her fingers. Instead of becoming an unfortunate woman who hides her tear-stained face behind heavy makeup and smiles brightly for men.

"I thought the same thing, but you cannot stop growth. You cannot keep children within the safe enclosure of their parents forever. After all, they cannot live their entire lives within that fence."

Edwin understood this intellectually. Not long ago, he thought the exact same thing as the Professor. But lately, watching the girl take her first steps into the dangerous world beyond the fence made him feel that, if possible, he wanted to keep her inside that fence forever.

"Getting hurt is part of the growing process, isn't it? A parent's job is not to prevent all wounds, but to help their child build the resilience needed to recover from them."

"That is true, but bad men do not fit that logic."

When Edwin had ordered an investigation into the man Giselle was dating, he wondered if he was being overprotective. However, when he received the results, it was clear he was not. If he had left things as they were, it could have been disastrous.

"The boy is only 20, but he is already a regular at the Golden Orchid Club."

The Golden Orchid Club was a luxurious club that served as a brothel in disguise.

"My goodness... What a rotten fellow. Did you tell Miss Bishop?"

"Of course. Still, she won't listen to me and continues to see him."

Could she have said she liked experienced men without knowing what that truly meant? Experience has its levels.

As Edwin downed his tea in one gulp to quell the fire inside him, the Professor looked at him with pity and murmured.

"The more you object to boys at that age, the more they rebel. As someone experienced in raising children and as a psychiatrist, my advice is to leave her alone for now. Do not oppose her."

Edwin's brow furrowed deeply at advice contrary to his own thoughts.

"If you oppose her, she will start hiding things. Then, even if something truly bad happens, she won't tell you."

The Professor suggested it was better to be an adult the girl could talk to about anything, so no trouble would slip past him.

"Even if you find out about a problem, do not solve it for her. You cannot scare off every bad man she meets for the rest of her life."

"......"

"What you need to do is help her develop the wisdom and ability to handle these situations herself. In that sense, this is an opportunity for both Miss Bishop and you, Duke. Make good use of it."

"Hmm..."

Edwin rubbed his chin, lost in thought. The Professor, thinking Edwin was meditating on his advice, watched him with expectant eyes.

Well.

Edwin twisted his lips into a bitter smile and confessed.

"To be honest, I've already failed that test."

"What do you mean?"

"She didn't want to break up, so I made them break up. But she doesn't know I caused it."

That fellow, Boswell, had not yet completed the mandatory six-week military training required of every young man in Mercia. Edwin had called an old friend from the military academy who was now at the army training center. A few days later, Boswell was dragged off to training. He wouldn't be out until the end of summer.

"I'm not proud of what I did, but I don't regret it."

The Professor, who had been listening in astonishment, chuckled.

"I can't say it was right, but I can't say it was wrong, either. As a doctor, I should dissuade you, but as a father of daughters, I can't help but envy you for having the power to do that."

As the Professor refilled Edwin's empty teacup, he asked,

"Did Miss Bishop take it badly?"

Recalling Giselle's reaction, Edwin scoffed. He had separated them, thinking it was better for her to be briefly hurt now than to suffer long-term, but had she really worried about her pain......?

"She is pretending she is still seeing him in front of me."

The Professor raised his eyebrows, surprised. This morning, Edwin had to tense his face muscles to avoid showing the same expression in front of Giselle.

"She left today saying she had a date."

"What?"

"So I tested her."

"That inconsiderate fool must not even know basic courtship manners. In my time...."

"Sir, women are no longer criticized for walking alone."

Giselle turned him into an old-fashioned man and rushed off as if fleeing.

"Why do you think she is hiding the breakup?"

"She's probably embarrassed that her first romance ended after only a few days, haha."

"Why should that be something to be ashamed of near me...?"

He couldn't understand the girl's heart at all.

Summer afternoons at Kingsbridge were distinctly different from those at Fullerton. It wasn't just because the male students were lying on the grass between buildings of very different architectural styles, covering their faces with books. The students passing Giselle, unlike those at Fullerton who seemed cut from the same mold, proudly displayed their individuality with their diverse fashion choices.

They look cool.

What were the students sitting between the grand columns—men and women—discussing? They held thick books in their hands, debating passionately as if they were as heated as the sunlight. They all looked like adults. Even though they were at most four or five years older than her, they seemed more suited to be with The Duke than she was.

Sir....

Until now, she had only been to Kingsbridge University for exams or interviews. So today was her first time calmly exploring the campus, which she would be entering and exiting as if it were her own home starting in the autumn. Everything caught her eye, but her thoughts were distracted by things that had nothing to do with it.

Flashback Continuation.

"That inconsiderate fool doesn't even know basic courtship manners. In my time...."

Did Sir also go on dates when he was my age? Of course, he did! She didn't understand why she had such silly doubts. It wasn't as if she hadn't seen him dating when she was younger. As soon as he inherited the title of Duke, he began meeting young women suitable to be the future Duchess. But soon after, the war broke out, and none of the engagements materialized....

But now, the war is over. Does that mean he will marry soon?

Now that she thought about it, he has been going out frequently these days. Perhaps he is already seeing someone.

...Who could it be?

Her steps grew heavier as she walked along the open path through the grassy fields.

If the future Duchess dislikes me, will Sir distance himself from me?

Of course. That is the proper thing to do.

She knew it was the right thing, but.......

Then, I will end up moving away from Sir anyway.

Her shoulders drooped. She was only pretending to have a man in her life so she wouldn't lose him, but it was all a useless, meaningless effort.

"I'm so stupid. What am I doing here?"

No, if things might turn out this way, this is not a useless effort at all.

Haah.

Giselle let out a long sigh and grasped the crank firmly as she pushed. The wheels, which had been stuck on something, began to roll again.

The whole world is clear, but it seems I am the only one walking with a dark cloud over my head.

Just as she thought that, a large, thick shadow actually fell over her.

Wait, this isn't a cloud.

Clouds couldn't be solid, nor could they grab her by the shoulders. And they certainly didn't smell like mint. Startled, she stopped dead in her tracks....

"You said you were going to meet a man, so why are you alone? Did he stand you up?"

Chapter 24.
Giselle shivered upon hearing the familiar voice. As soon as she lifted her head, she found a tall gentleman standing behind her, looking down at her from a short distance.

"...Sir? What are you doing here?"

Just as surprised as Giselle, the man quickly shifted his gaze from her to the baby carriage in front of them.

"Is that your date?"

"......"

"I wondered why he hadn't come to pick you up."

He let out a bitter laugh as he looked at the baby sleeping soundly in the stroller.

"It turns out he couldn't make it."

Giselle was caught completely off guard. She wasn't dating a man; she was working as a nanny. She had thought he would be pleased that she was no longer seeing the man he so detested. Instead, he looked irritated.

"Why were you out earning money behind my back?"

She didn't want to waste time pretending to be with a man. Unable to reveal the real reason, she ended up prolonging the pretense, which led him to misunderstand and scold her.

"If you wanted something, you could have asked me to buy it for you. If you needed more allowance, you could have asked for more. Why would you do something like this to hurt me?"

At his words about being hurt, Giselle was momentarily dumbfounded. I mean, it's not like I was selling matches or my body on the street...... Working part-time as a nanny for a wealthy family—he was making it sound like an unforgivable act, as if she were driving nails into his heart.

"It's not about the money. I'm an adult now. I need to work someday, so I'm gaining experience."

Her rushed excuse didn't seem to convince him, as he looked at her with eyes that seemed to say, 'Don't be ridiculous.' I forgot that he knows my past....... She had already gained more than enough experience raising children and working before she turned ten. Why would she need to go through that again?

"Giselle."

The man in front of her gripped her arm with his large hands. Whenever Giselle had been stubborn or refused to talk as a child, he would grab her like this and coax her.

"Be honest with me."

Giselle swallowed, her throat dry, and looked at the expression of the man in front of her.

"Are you doing this because you are worried I will stop supporting you when you become an adult?"

He understood her. That was, in fact, part of the reason she had accepted the nannying job.

"I know you will support me. I mean, I know it's not a given."

"Why wouldn't it be?"

"Because I'm not your daughter."

Giselle hurried to try to explain to the man who looked hurt, his brows furrowed.

"I know you raised me like a daughter. And I know you will support me until I can stand on my own two feet."

"Then why?"

"That's why I want to become independent as soon as possible."

"If you know all that, why don't you understand that you don't have to feel bad about it?"

"But I can't help it. I don't like it."

"Why don't you like it?"

Leech.

She swallowed the repulsive word lingering on her tongue and stammered.

"It's not my money; it's yours. And..."

As she swallowed the word 'leech,' the word that replaced it on her tongue tasted just as bitter, like the dirt she had put in her mouth as a starving child.

"When you get married... I will make your wife feel pity for me."

Even after saying it, the bitter sensation didn't disappear, as if she truly had dirt in her mouth.

"So, I think it's better to prepare to stand on my own........"

"I will take care of that. You don't have to worry about it."

So, he is not saying he won't get married.

Why had she expected that in the first place? Realizing this, her face flushed, and she couldn't bear to look at him.

"You know the money I spend on you is really nothing to me, right? You've even made it so I can't pay your expensive tuition since you have a full scholarship. Why do you feel guilty?"

The annual tuition at Kingsbridge was equivalent to the price of a three-bedroom apartment. By the time she graduated, it would be like shelling out the equivalent of four houses. Even so, she knew it wouldn't make a dent in his seemingly endless financial resources.

So she wasn't trying to become independent to avoid burdening him financially. Why didn't he understand that?

"Since I lost the opportunity to make a show of spending money on you, if you want to feel guilty, feel guilty about that."

Listening to his exaggerated words, Giselle couldn't help but let out a small laugh.

"Do you want to become independent so fast because I'm too overbearing, even though you're grown up now? Do you want to get away from me?"

"No, no, it's not that."

She hadn't expected him to feel hurt by her decision to become independent. It turned out the misunderstanding was mutual.

"Independence doesn't mean I'm leaving you."

She didn't want to leave him. To do that, she needed to find a different role by his side.

"I can't remain a spoiled puppy forever, can I?"

"Why not?"

"...What?"

"Giselle, honestly, I don't care if you never become independent. You can live doing whatever you want—I will support you. Whatever it is. As long as you don't get involved with bad men or dangerous things."

While she blinked in surprise, he lightly pinched her nose with his thumb and index finger and shook it, just as he used to do when she was a child. His smile and his gaze were filled with the same affection as back then. That's why his next request felt even more heartbreaking to Giselle.

"My spoiled puppy, please never grow up. That is my request."

In the past, she would have been overjoyed and loudly promised him that she would. But now she couldn't.

Sir, this puppy is so spoiled that she only wants to sit in your lap. Do you know what she wants to do if she does that?

Oblivious to her inappropriate thoughts, he smiled innocently. Contemplating that smile, Giselle sighed inwardly. She had resolved not to become a woman in front of him. If she hadn't wanted to become a woman for him, she wouldn't have needed to make such a resolution.

If I try to become a woman, I will lose him.

But at the same time, she didn't want to remain just a puppy. In his eyes, she might be an adorable puppy, but to everyone else, she was just a clinging leech. I won't be a leech. Giselle's dream was to proudly stand by his side as an adult who could be helpful to him. Not as a leech living off his kindness.

But is that what Sir wants for me?

Unaware of her feelings, he made another absurd proposal.

"If you had your own money, would you feel less guilty? Then it wouldn't be my money, but yours; you could use it without feeling burdened. Although I suppose... having to explain how much you need and what for every time would be annoying."

The only place Giselle could get her own money was from him. In other words, he was suggesting giving her some of his wealth.

"I am more burdened by what you are thinking right now."

"No, it's also necessary for your education. At your age, you should learn how to cultivate and manage wealth. So, where do you want to start? Real estate? Stocks?"

If he were a typical father, he would be teaching his child to save their pocket money. Not giving her a large sum and teaching her about real estate or stock investments. In moments like this, no matter how much Sir raised me as a daughter, I can't help but feel there is a river of status between us that I can never cross.

"Why don't we go to the bank since we are out?"

"I am working right now."

Giselle quickly turned and grabbed the stroller handle.

"Ung..."

"Yes, yes, it's okay."

She pushed the stroller while calming the child, who had just woken up and was starting to whine. Feeling him staring at her, she expected a scolding, but silence fell. When she looked back, Sir was rolling up his shirt sleeves and looking at his watch.

Does he have an appointment here? With whom?

No, I don't need to know. I don't want to know.

Edwin lifted his eyes from the watch and looked at Giselle, who had already moved ten steps away. She nodded slightly, assuming he was about to leave.

But his eyes sharpened, and in just five strides, he closed the gap she had created. Moreover, he even snatched the stroller handle from her as if it were his own and began pushing it.

"...Huh?"

Giselle blinked in surprise at his back. Isn't he busy? And he hasn't had a long conversation with me lately. Giselle, who had been standing in a daze, only snapped back to reality after even Loise walked past her and followed after Edwin.

"Aren't you leaving?"

"If you want to order me to get lost, you should at least have a Colonel's rank on your shoulder."

Chapter 25.
"I didn't mean to rush you out."

Giselle looked at the large hand grasping the stroller handle.

"I just saw you checking your watch and thought you had somewhere to be."

He rolled up the edge of his sleeve again, looked at his watch, and then made another strange request to Giselle.

"If I say something strange to you or touch you, run and call Loise."

"...Why would you say that?"

"I've been drinking."

"In broad daylight?"

You don't drink when the night falls, but you're drinking when the sun is high in the sky?

Giselle was startled by his unusual words and, without thinking, sprang into action. She rose onto her toes and brought her nose close to his set lips.

'He doesn't smell like alcohol.'

The lips parted slightly; the breath that escaped was only a faint scent of mint.

"Ugh."

It was only when he pulled away from Giselle's shoulder and took a step back that she realized what she was doing. He must have thought she was going to kiss him.

"I was wondering if you smelled like alcohol."

She tried to reason with him, but he did not soften his stony expression.

"It's real, trust me."

I wasn't trying to steal a kiss.

"Giselle Bishop."

But he was angry for a completely different reason.

"Why do you have such a problem sticking your face into a man's face, even if it's a damned man...."

"What are you talking about? You are not a damned man."

She retorted with a quick, rapid thought. It worked; he paused, his eyes crinkled at the corners, and he laughed out loud.

"So you are the top student at Fullerton."

He ruffled Giselle's hair with his large hands, as if petting a puppy.

"That's right. I'm not a man to you; you are smart to know that."

Giselle thought that was what she meant, but Edwin was simply admiring her quick wit.

"Hmph...."

Edwin picked up the conversation where he had left off when the baby started babbling again.

"Anyway, I didn't drink enough to reek at the ball. If you ever feel that I am not myself, like last time, just call Loise."

"Alright."

Giselle asked, keeping pace with him.

"Then, why are you here, anyway?"

"I had an appointment."

"......."

He shrugged unnecessarily, as if he had misunderstood her silence.

"I wasn't following you, or I would have known you were lying to me."

He still thinks it's a betrayal that Giselle is nannying.

"Where are we going?"

"I don't have a destination; I was just going for a walk to take a nap."

The stroll along the street led them off-campus. He passed a commercial street in front of the back gate. Something caught Giselle's eye as she walked past the shops.

"Do you want some ice cream?"

"Yes."

"What flavor?"

"Lemon flavor."

He parked the stroller in front of an empty table by the roadside, told Giselle to wait while sitting down, and headed to the ice cream stall himself. Giselle sat at the table, rocking the stroller so the baby wouldn't wake up, and watched him buy his ice cream. She wasn't surprised to see the server standing between the stalls. The woman, who looked to be in her early 20s, was scooping ice cream and chattering away as if she had a lot to say, until she rolled her eyes.

'You are nothing but flirting with him.'

Giselle, who had been around him enough times to know how a woman can manipulate a man she likes, was not mistaken. Are you flirting with you? A woman flirting with him always felt offensive. But today was for a different reason.

'I'm just saying I don't think I'm your lover.'

She quickly put the cone holder in front of him and held it out directly. He tried to pull it out of her reach, but she pretended to move her hand away and brushed her fingertips against his.

The hand that had been rocking the stroller stopped.

I wonder what face he made.

She had never seen him fall for a woman's flirtation. Perhaps it was because he had a daughter, Giselle, to care for. Still, Giselle envied all the women who had been rejected by him. She felt like a 13-year-old girl again, standing opposite a potential Duke.

"Back again."

Giselle hadn't moved from there.

"Here, lemon flavor."

The man returned and handed her an ice cream cone. He placed a pile of coins in front of her, stacked in order of size.

"This increases Miss Bishop's fortune by 96 pennies."

Bobby didn't like coins, so whenever he had them, he gave them to Giselle. When she was younger, she was always happy to receive them. But now she doesn't like being treated like a child. It's enough.

"Do you want your change too?"

The baby, now awake, looked at the coin with horse-like eyes and reached for it. He slipped his long fingers between the baby's small hands and smiled.

"Go ask your parents for it."

A lady passing by them must not have heard him.

"My goodness, how beautiful the little angel is, just like her mom and dad."

Giselle smiled at the baby, who had been affectionately rejected by The Duke, and then she froze.

'...Do you and I look like a couple?'

She wanted to give the stranger all her fortune to thank her, but at the same time, she felt ungrateful. Giselle studied the man's expression. He looked as if he had been told something he didn't want to hear.

'He might feel uncomfortable by the misunderstanding and make an excuse and leave. I don't want that.'

Impatient, she quickly pulled a hand mirror from her purse and held it up to her face.

"Did I put on too much makeup?"

He stared at Giselle and tilted his head, not knowing what she meant.

"Do I look that old today?"

"What, old? Would you call that looking older? If you call yourself old with that face, you should be in a coffin."

Laughter erupted, and the atmosphere around the table eased. Crisis averted, Bobby didn't get up and stayed, watching the baby while Giselle ate her ice cream.

"We should go."

She started to stand, but he didn't move. He kept staring at Giselle, one hand playing with the baby and the other cupping his chin.

"What... is wrong?"

"Did you enjoy it?"

"Yes."

"What about the lipstick?"

"What?"

With that, he pulled out a hand mirror. Her face was stained bright red in the mirror, the light pink color in the center of her lips even more pronounced. I don't wear lipstick. She hadn't gotten the hang of it yet, so she ate the lipstick off with the ice cream. She was so inexperienced she didn't even think it might have rubbed off.

How ridiculous her lips looked in his eyes, red at the edges and pink in the center.

'You are a terrible person too.'

A lady should be informed that her makeup is off without delay, for it is the indispensable virtue of a gentleman to speak without embarrassing the listener. But you informed Giselle bluntly, with a hint of mischief. He had just confirmed to her that she was a child, not a woman.

"One moment...."

She was about to get up to go to the coffee shop bathroom when she realized that, no matter what she thought, she was a lady, and ladies do not reapply lipstick outside.

The tip of a finger brushed her lips. The tip of his index finger, wrapped in a silk handkerchief, to be precise.

"I know it's funny to say this when you buy lipstick...."

He rubbed the edge of Giselle's lips with the handkerchief, removing what was left of the lipstick.

"Don't try to be a woman yet."

But Giselle had already become a woman; there was no going back. I can't be a spoiled puppy forever, she wanted him to know.

"What kind of job would help you?" Giselle asked him as they walked toward the house where she worked as a nanny.

"A lawyer or an accountant?"

"Any job that would make you happy."

"And how does that help you?"

"It gives me peace of mind to look after you. Speaking of which, if you want to be useful to me, can you work as my eye?"

"What's so good about being an eye....?"

Giselle was about to retort, but then she remembered the word 'man' and fell silent.

Chapter 26.
"Why do you ask how? Giselle, not even a blind woman would choose such a rotten man. She wouldn't miss that rotten stench. Sure, it might have been a mistake the first time. But once I tell you he's rotten, shouldn't you have tossed him out right away?"

His vocabulary and tone were much harsher than usual, possibly due to his lingering anger about the incident.

"And yet you trusted him over me?"

He was understandably furious.

When Giselle first found out the man was a regular at the Golden Orchid Club, she initially feigned surprise....

"I asked Lord Boswell, and he said he had never been to the Golden Orchid."

The next day, she used this excuse while still pretending to be seeing him.

"I am truly disappointed in you this time."

There is nothing more terrifying than him being disappointed in her. Eventually, Giselle confessed the truth.

"The truth is, we had already broken up. Actually, we hadn't even broken up, because we only met twice and just had coffee. I just needed an excuse to sneak away to work."

Sensing it was now her turn to listen to Edwin say he was disappointed in her lies and secret work, Giselle quickly changed the subject.

"Besides, my standards are very high. They are at the peak of the world's highest mountain."

For the best man in the world. That is, Edwin.

That's why most men her age don't even catch her eye or meet her standards. The level of manners and composure Edwin possesses comes with age, making it impossible to expect that from someone her age.

But do men The Duke's age, with that level of maturity, catch her eye? No, not either.

Can you imagine a man Edwin's age trying to kiss her? In her imagination, Giselle had already kneed those men between the legs.

Besides, how can you fall in love just because someone meets your standards? Would there be anyone else in the world who could offer her that magical moment she experienced when she fell in love with Edwin? That strange feeling at an ordinary moment.

It was an unexpected disaster even for Giselle. Natural disasters are not something humans can create. Giselle believed she would never have a moment like that again.

"Then, you don't need to worry."

"I'm glad to hear that, but I've already changed my mind. From now on, ask my permission before you meet anyone."

"Alright."

Edwin, walking beside Giselle, looked at her and asked.

"Why are you so sad? Are you already worried I won't give you permission to meet anyone?"

"No."

It's because the person I really want to meet won't be given permission.

"More importantly, do you never date, Sir?"

What kind of answer would come? Giselle nervously awaited Edwin's reply.

"Well... Who would want to date a man like me?"

She hadn't expected such an incredible answer. Giselle involuntarily let out a small giggle, even revealing her internal thoughts.

"Where would I find a man as great as you, Sir?"

Edwin raised his eyebrows, as if he had heard something he shouldn't have.

Has he realized I like him?

Alone, Giselle's heart beat anxiously, waiting for his next reaction. But he merely looked at his watch and smiled bitterly as he replied.

"You think I'm a great man? I appreciate the compliment, but I am far from a good man."

This time, it was Giselle's turn to look as if she had heard something she shouldn't have.

"Hello, Giselle."

At that moment, someone walking past her greeted her. Giselle quickly erased her strained expression and smiled.

"Hello, Mrs. Anderson."

It was an elderly lady from the house next door, where she worked as a nanny. The lady was walking her large dog. Giselle hesitated for a moment.

"Please go ahead."

The sidewalk was narrow. Edwin parked the stroller by the roadside, politely clearing the way for the lady.

"How thoughtful, young man."

Even after greeting Edwin, the old lady did not take her eyes off him. Despite knowing it was impolite, she stared at him with a surprised expression as she approached. Edwin's face was not widely known, so it was unlikely she recognized Duke Eccleston. She was probably just curious about the handsome, mature man taking a walk with the neighborhood nanny.

Please pass by. Please, quickly. Please, please, please.

There was no need to satisfy her curiosity. But there was also no reason not to. Still, Giselle silently prayed for the old woman to pass by. Although her face wore an uncomfortable smile, her hands were clasped behind her back, her fingers nervously clasped together.

"Woof!"

But, as if to spite her, the child in the stroller cried out towards the passing dog, stopping them dead in their tracks.

"It seems Roddy wants to greet Vicky."

The elderly woman, apparently pleased by the interruption, stopped and spoke to them both.

"I know Giselle, but I don't think I've seen you around the neighborhood before, Sir."

"I am Giselle's Sir."

"Ah, I see."

The woman, who seemed to have lost interest after this lackluster answer, was about to move on, but her dog stubbornly sat down. The dog, wanting to greet every person it encountered, was now sniffing both the child and Edwin, wagging its tail.

"What a cute dog."

As Edwin said, it was a very gentle dog. But Giselle was paralyzed with fear.

Please don't come any closer. Don't come any closer.

It was a useless plea. From the moment she saw the dog, unsettling memories began to flash before her eyes.

Think of something happy, something cheerful.

She tried to banish the terrifying memories by imagining the cold sweat running down her back was actually Edwin's hand gently stroking her. Sir is touching me like this. It would be wonderful if he really touched me like that. Before she knew it, she had forgotten the true reason for her indecent fantasy and was completely lost in it. Suddenly, the dog turned its head towards her.

Heuk....

At that moment, her eyes met both the real dog and the dog from her memories. The real dog was wagging its fluffy tail. The dog in her memories had waved its thin, dry tail.

To its master, who was trying to devour it.

Giselle remembered tying a ribbon around the neck of a dog she had begged for food. She hung it in a barn, out of sight so no one could take it away. She slit its throat, drained its blood, and skinned it. She disemboweled it, removed the inedible parts, and threw it all into a boiling pot. The taste of that dog, whom she loved so much but was made mad by hunger to eat, was eerily vivid on her tongue.

Ugh.

She felt sick to her stomach. If she could vomit up that dog she had eaten and bring it back to life, Giselle would have done so countless times.

"Giselle?"

The moment Edwin called her name, the memory vanished from her eyes.

"Why are you so pale? Are you feeling unwell?"

But the nausea lingered like an aftertaste; she could only shake her head weakly, unable to open her mouth.

"Oh... Are you afraid of dogs?"

The elderly woman asked apologetically, still defending her dog, which was still happily panting, wagging its tail.

"You don't need to be afraid of our Vicky."

It was a pointless defense, as the dog was not the problem.

"She may be big, but she's very gentle."

Yes, the dog may be gentle. But I am not.

"It was a pleasure meeting you. Have a good day."

Edwin quickly assessed the situation and led Giselle away. Once they had distanced themselves from the elderly woman, he removed his hand from Giselle's waist and asked,

"Were you afraid of dogs?"

"No."

Giselle was not afraid of dogs. Rather, she was terrified of herself, remembering the moment she devoured a dog that had wagged its tail at her.

If there had been no dog, what would I have eaten?

The unsettling curiosity followed her closely. Was it a divine punishment for betraying the dog that trusted her? Giselle often tormented herself with this strange question. If the starvation had prolonged endlessly and she had ended up eating a person, would the memory of consuming a human have tormented her, instead of a dog?

It was thanks to Edwin that she remained simply a person who ate a dog, and not a person who ate another human.

Sir is an angel.

"Sir......."

Giselle stopped walking and rested her head on Edwin's shoulder. He hesitated momentarily, but he did not push her away; instead, he welcomed her into his embrace.

"Are you dizzy? It must be the heat."

Though his assumption was wrong, Giselle nodded.

She hoped he would never discover the truth.

She had always regretted telling him that she had eaten the dog she raised because she was too hungry. From the very first moment, she wanted him to see her not as a pitiful war orphan, but as a bright, radiant woman.

Chapter 27.
So Edwin had to remain ignorant that the shadow of the past still lingered dark beneath the feet of the radiant 'Giselle Bishop.'

That wasn't the only reason she had to hide her shadow from him.

"We've arrived."

They reached the front of the house where she worked. Lifting the large stroller up the stairs to the front door seemed effortless for Edwin.

"Thank you."

"You're welcome. It's an honor to assist you, Miss Bishop."

The playful gentleman quickly reverted to the serious Duke.

"Are you truly alright?"

"I'm fine. I don't feel dizzy anymore."

"Still, you never know, so don't push yourself."

"Feeding a seated baby applesauce doesn't seem like much effort."

He looked as if he wanted to insist that it was, but he merely closed his mouth with a bitter smile.

"Well, better a handsome boss than a bad one."

Edwin had already grown fond of the baby; he grasped its tiny hand with his index finger and shook it as if playfully saying goodbye.

"If you want to work, I will support you, but if it is just for money, I am completely against it. However, if you want to find something more meaningful, I will wholeheartedly welcome it; I would be even happier to assist you in the search."

Following his advice, he only turned around when Giselle nodded her head to show she had taken his words to heart. As he walked down the stairs, he looked back, feigning the lifting of a non-existent fedora in a farewell gesture.

A faint smile formed on her lips at his playful gesture, but a flood of complicated emotions threatened to overshadow her face. She quickly turned to the door, just as she was about to press the doorbell.

"You may know this already, but........"

Her head snapped instinctively toward the low, soft voice. He was standing at the foot of the stairs, one hand in his pocket, looking at her.

"When I first met you, I never thought I would worry about you so much."

His blue eyes shone with joy, as if admiring something he was proud of.

"Back then, you looked like a broken sapling; I worried you would never grow straight or bloom again."

The rush of emotions at his gaze passed quickly.

He still sees me as the 'dog-eating war orphan.'

Suddenly she felt as small as a 10-year-old child.

"But now, you have grown into a strong, healthy tree that yields beautiful flowers and makes me ashamed of my former worries."

As if to illustrate, his fingers lightly brushed the petals of a blooming pink rose beyond the fence.

"You will never know how happy it makes me to see you prosper."

But Sir, you do not know that this tree is rotting from within.

"I may have scolded you today, but I only wanted to thank you for allowing me the luxury of worrying about you."

"Sir..."

"I consider myself fortunate to have walked through that hell, because I met an angel like you."

Sir, I am not an angel. Angels die first in hell. Only demons survive.

"You are the true angel."

The angel who saved me, who was turning into a demon in that hell.

"I am not an angel."

With a bitter smile, he glanced at his wristwatch before walking away with the final word that they would meet at home.

Giselle continued to stare after him, long after he disappeared from her sight. His gaze—the one that had looked at her moments before—remained in her mind.

He had looked at her as if she were something to be proud of.

Something to be proud of. That would be his medal.

Orphans like her knew how to read a room to survive. So she was not ignorant of it: to Duke Edwin Eccleston, Giselle Bishop was his most proud medal. He had the shining proof that he joined the slaughter of war not to kill, but to save.

A medal must shine without blemish. The moment he knew that the shining gold was rotting from within, the light in Edwin's eyes when he looked at her would vanish.

This was also why he had to remain ignorant of Giselle's shadow.

Edwin's Nightmare
⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

"Giselle!"

Edwin knelt on the cold ground, cradling the girl in his arms, letting out a heavy sigh. Why had he had this dream again? He hadn't had it once since he knew the girl hadn't been seeing that man.

Even though he knew it was a dream, Edwin was once again consumed by the urge to kill the man who had wronged his daughter.

"Giselle! Wake up!"

"...Ugh!"

In the dream, Giselle opened her eyes. The dream always ended here, but why wasn't it ending today?

"N-No. I can't do this anymore. Please, just, heung, kill me."

Giselle was trembling, her face pale with fear, just like the day they met. She tried to escape his embrace, but Edwin held her firmly and forced her to look him in the face.

"Giselle, it's me."

At first, he thought she was trying to run away because she didn't recognize him, but the terror in her clear, focused eyes was unmistakable.

"Let go of me! You are going to hurt me again!"

"What are you talking about? I've never hurt you."

At that moment, her struggles ceased abruptly.

"Liar."

Her bloodshot eyes looked at him as she pointed downward.

"You did this."

Following her gaze, he saw the blood running down the pale inner side of her thigh.

Is this... what I did?

Was I the man I wanted to kill so desperately? Edwin had suspected every man but himself. He had never harbored a perverse thought about this child, not once.

The shock of realizing the truth sapped all his strength. In that brief instant, Giselle pushed him away and scrambled through the pool of blood, trying to escape.

A sudden, mocking sound filled his ears.

"No!"

His hand shot out on its own, grabbing Giselle by the ankle. As she was dragged back, her bloodshot eyes looked at him, spitting curses.

"You are a demon. I will tell everyone."

"They will say Edwin Eccleston raped the orphan he raised on the battlefield. He pretended to be an angel, but he was always a demon. That man was just another of Eccleston's dogs—a savage beast."

The whole world would condemn him like this. How cruel, how tragic....

Then an invisible voice mocked him, asking: Aren't you afraid?

He didn't fear the world's judgment. What terrified him was the look of betrayal in Giselle's eyes.

The whispers became unintelligible, and soon Giselle's gaze faded. Everything went black.

"Ugh..."

He felt his body losing control, but then his eyes snapped open. The familiar ceiling of his bedroom greeted him. Edwin let out a sigh of relief, but then a thought crossed his mind, making him sit up in a panic.

What if that man has taken over my body and is only pretending to sleep?

There was a way to check. Edwin called out towards the firmly closed door.

"Paul, did you hear me try to leave or make any noise from inside?"

"No. I didn't hear anything, Your Grace."

The servant, one of those who took turns guarding his bedroom door every night, believing his employer had developed sleepwalking, answered.

"Haah..."

He let out a sigh of relief and wiped his face with one hand. Instantly, his palm was drenched in cold sweat, becoming damp.

When Edwin looked at his hand, he suddenly realized his hand wasn't the only thing that was wet. When he lifted the area below his waist, he muttered a curse under his breath.

"Disgusting bastard, leech."

Edwin realized this dream was not born of his worries; it was created by the devil in his mind.

If you don't satisfy my desires, I will take it out on the child you care for.

It was that kind of threat.

Tick-tock, tick-tock, tick-tock, tick-tock.

The ticking of the clock's second hand was especially irritating. Was it because his nerves were frayed, cornered by a situation with no way out? Or was it because even the wall clock in this cheap hotel was of low quality?

The sound of a nearby train whistle swallowed the irritating noise. Edwin shifted his gaze from the wall clock to the window, hidden behind frayed curtains. Opposite the hotel was the central station.

A cheap hotel opposite the central station. A place frequented only by vagrants, where no one would bother to remember a new face. In the slums, right in the heart of the city, where he wouldn't run into anyone he knew.

Despite this, he removed the glasses he was wearing to conceal his face, rubbing his aching temples, likely due to the incessant ticking that grated on his nerves.

Knock, Knock

Someone knocked on the hotel room door.


Chapter 28.
It must be Loise.

As he stood up, the old armchair groaned like an elder. He suddenly wondered if the bed, which looked as worn as the chair, would also creak loudly. Perhaps the only comfort was that he himself didn't have to endure hearing such terrible noises.

As soon as he confirmed it through the peephole, he opened the door.

"Ah, hello."

The person standing opposite him was not Loise, but a young woman he had never seen before. Yet, Edwin was not surprised, as this was the woman Loise had searched for. A foreigner, who didn't even know how to greet in Mercian and was also blind. There was no chance she would recognize Duke Eccleston's face from a newspaper or TV and gossip about the man who had bought her.

And she was likely free of venereal diseases. Although Edwin hadn't explicitly given such instructions, Loise was unlikely to bring a woman who might spread disease to the heirless Eccleston Family. As the Duke's personal aide, he would have closely observed the previous Duke.

The previous Duke, who was also Edwin's brother, Charles Eccleston, led a life of debauchery, as was typical of the men in the Eccleston Family. In his late twenties, he seemed to have finally found true love and put an end to his reckless wandering. But then he put a pistol in his mouth and pulled the trigger. No amount of money could cure the syphilis he had contracted as a result of his profligacy, and the woman he loved rejected his marriage proposal because of it.

Edwin did not pity his brother. Did he commit suicide out of despair over his situation? But wasn't that situation his own making? Edwin, who never looked kindly upon prostitution, came to utterly despise it in the wake of this incident.

"Come in."

Nevertheless, he let the prostitute into the hotel room.

In the end, he had surrendered to that wretched leech.

It wasn't as if he hadn't fought against it. He had consulted with Professor Fletcher, tried medications believed to suppress sexual desire, and even resorted to folk remedies. Yet, nothing could stop the repugnant threats of that vile being. As the dreams continued, Edwin sensed the danger.

"I must send Giselle away, where he cannot reach her."

Just as he made that decision, the parasite in his mind scoffed. It seemed to suggest that sending the girl away would solve nothing.

"It doesn't have to be her specifically."

It had targeted Giselle because she was the most easily accessible. This demon, if Edwin did not satisfy its desires, would grab any woman within its reach like a dog in heat and rape her.

Becoming a sex-crazed lecher who buys women was preferable to becoming a rapist. In the end, Edwin chose the lesser evil to avoid the worst.

Click.

He closed the door and turned around. Not knowing what to do, as it was his first time, Edwin stood awkwardly. It was common sense that he should guide the blind woman, but he hesitated because the destination was the bed.

While Edwin wrestled with his reluctance, the woman, aided by her cane, tentatively moved around the room until she found the bed. She seemed accustomed to this situation. She sat quietly on the edge of the bed with her gaze fixed blankly forward. She was waiting for him.

"Haah..."

With a deep sigh, Edwin walked toward the woman and reached into his jacket. When his hand emerged, he was holding a square tin. This time, it wasn't mints.

"Use this."

Although she didn't understand his words, she seemed to grasp the meaning. The woman took the tin, opened it, and felt the three rolled latex pockets inside. She counted them with her fingers and nodded.

I would trust a strange prostitute over him.

Still, misunderstandings were inevitable when communication was impossible. The woman, misinterpreting his intent to let her do everything, placed her hand on Edwin's thigh and began to grope upwards.

"Stop."

He pushed her hand away and turned his back.

Crack.

The old armchair groaned as it held his sturdy military frame. Startled by his sudden retreat, the woman blinked in confusion.

It wasn't his job, nor was it hers.

"It's your turn now."

As he rested his forehead in his hand, Edwin looked at the prostitute sitting on the bed and whispered internally.

"My body is yours tonight. Do as you wish."

The humiliation of having to offer his body to an occupying force was even more bitter because he was a soldier. Edwin closed his eyes tightly, like a prisoner awaiting his execution.

He had sworn to end the infamous legacy of the Eccleston family during his time, determined not to follow in the footsteps of his father and brother. He had never struggled or wavered in upholding that vow. But in the end, forced by an external will, he had descended to become the very lecherous Eccleston dog he so despised.

Crack.

Edwin clenched his fists as he heard the sound of the woman undressing. From now on, he wouldn't be able to hold Giselle's hand again.

How could I touch her with these filthy hands?

Hehehe.

A mocking laugh cut through his mind like a bullet.

"You finally came."

Edwin sighed as he waited for the whispers to begin.

Back at the Townhouse
⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

Late into the night, a taxi pulled up in front of the Eccleston townhouse.

"Is this the right place, miss?"

"Yes, thank you."

When Giselle paid the taxi fare, a servant hurried out of the house and opened the door for her.

"Welcome back, Miss Bishop."

"Thank you."

As she stepped out of the taxi, another pulled up and stopped behind her. The servant strained his neck to see who it was and rushed to open the door. The passenger was Edwin.

"Sir."

Although she had seen him that morning, Giselle felt a surge of joy upon seeing him again at night and quickly greeted him as he got out of the taxi.

"Did you have a good trip?"

She had no idea where he had gone.

"Ah... Giselle. Um... yes."

Was it really so surprising that they returned home at the same time? Edwin seemed unusually nervous.

"Did you just get back?" He asked, watching the taxi she had arrived in drive away.

"Yes."

"Why are you so late?"

"I lost track of time chatting with friends."

Giselle had just returned from a party hosted by a fellow heiress she had attended Fullerton with. The girl had never spoken a word to Giselle during their time at Fullerton. But after graduation, she called and sent invitations almost daily. In fact, this wasn't the only girl who suddenly became desperate to befriend Giselle after Edwin showed up at the graduation ceremony and ball. Thanks to that, Giselle didn't need to date or look for a job, as she could easily play the role of someone 'too busy to worry about Edwin.'

"There were no men. Don't worry."

"Isn't the taxi driver a man?"

"..."

"From now on, when you return after dark, call the butler and have a car sent for you. Don't take a taxi alone."

"Alright."

The path leading to the front entrance was wide enough for three people to walk side-by-side. Edwin motioned for her to go ahead.

"...Miss Bishop?"

As soon as she stepped through the wide-open doors, she came face-to-face with Loise in the foyer. He also looked surprised to see Giselle.

"How is it that you two returned together?"

"We met outside." Edwin, who had followed Giselle inside, replied.

But where had Edwin gone? Where could he have gone to appear so different from usual?

Even at home, he maintains a neat appearance; when he goes out, he always slick his hair back with pomade, elegantly and neatly. But today he looked as if he had run his hand through his hair, without applying anything. Moreover, the jacket he was handing to the servant was one she had never seen.

Giselle adored Edwin, but she wasn't so obsessed as to memorize every item in his wardrobe. However, she could bet her Kingsbridge degree that this was the first time she had seen it. It was much more modest than what he usually wore.

"Where have you been, Sir?" Unable to contain her curiosity, she asked.

Clatter.

A tin fell from the jacket the servant was holding. As it hit the floor and opened, what spilled out was not a handful of small mint candies.

...Condoms?

Seeing three rings of latex among them, the four people in the room froze.

"I am sorry, Your Grace."

The first to speak was the servant; the first to move was Edwin. He quickly picked them up with one hand and silently headed toward the stairs.
Chapter 29.
"Sir... no way..."

Giselle couldn't take her eyes off his back as he headed to the second floor. His steps seemed calm, but the back of his neck was intensely red.

"You met a woman? In bed, too...?"

The corners of Giselle's lips, which had been turned down, suddenly turned sharply upward.

One. Two. Three. No empty spaces.

It was because she remembered the moment that awful ring had spilled from the aluminum.

The damned aluminum strip crumpled in his hand. The moment Edwin stepped into the bedroom, his hand, which was about to toss it into the corner trash can, paused in mid-air.

Thud.

Finally, the crumpled condom strip disappeared into the nightstand drawer beside the bed. Edwin collapsed onto the bed, burying his face in both hands.

"Ha... goddammit..."

Loise, who had followed him into the bedroom, couldn't hide the pity in his expression as he watched him. Wasn't he a man so demanding of women that he could be described as obsessive-compulsive? Moreover, he had always looked at prostitutes as if they were filthy scum, a strict ascetic. But now that he had done that disgusting thing, how dirty must he feel about himself? To make matters worse, it was Miss Bishop who had caught him red-handed. It was impossible for him not to be tormented.

"Your Grace, Miss Bishop probably doesn't know what that is."

"No. She knows exactly what it is."

It was when she had stayed with Edwin's unit. One day, the army distributed contraceptives to the soldiers; Giselle had asked for one, mistaking it for chewing gum after seeing only the box. Apparently, she had opened one that a soldier had carelessly left lying around. For a while, she was afraid of the soldiers who had received them and wouldn't leave Edwin's side. She had said there were things like that scattered all over the village she lived in. The girl knew what they were for.

"But Miss Bishop is an adult now. She will understand."

Even if she was surprised. Even if she was naive, Loise wasn't worried. Miss Bishop would probably assume The Duke had just met a very attractive woman and had a pleasant date.

What concerned him more was whether they should further silence the other woman. Having served the previous Duke, Loise was sadly an expert in cleaning up his patrons' nocturnal escapades. He just hadn't expected to have to use that skill on Edwin Eccleston.

"Was there any trouble?"

"No, nothing happened."

"...I beg your pardon?"

Something unexpected again.

"The person didn't show up."

Edwin roughly ran a hand over his pale face and let out a hollow laugh.

Am I supposed to do this myself?

That was the last thing he wanted to do. So he had spent the entire night staring at the prostitute, only to return without doing anything.

After that first failure, Edwin visited the cheap hotel a few more times and called the woman. But the man who had been blackmailing him never showed up. In the end, it wasn't Edwin but the woman who gave up first, much to his bewilderment. The pimp had told Loise that the woman said she couldn't stand how unnerving and terrifying it was to be watched all day by a man who never did anything. Well, the feeling was mutual.

What the hell does this lunatic want?

One day, Edwin couldn't hold back anymore. He cut a new wound on his forearm, where the old ones had long since healed.

"Tell me what you want."

Edwin's Internal Struggle
⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

"They will say Edwin Eccleston raised an orphan from the battlefield, only to assault her. He pretended to be a saint, but he was a demon. He was the most beastly of all the Eccleston dogs."

"The whole world will curse him like this. Oh, dear, oh dear..."

"Aren't you afraid? You have to silence Giselle Bishop, don't you? There are many ways to silence someone, but only one that is truly foolproof. Kill her."

There was no response to the message carved into his arm. Edwin had tried to ask Professor Fletcher about it, but now, the presence that tormented him didn't even appear during his sessions.

"I know it sounds absurd, but do you think he is avoiding me?"

In his fourth session without the intrusive personality making an appearance, Edwin asked the professor.

"There's no reason for that, is there? Hmm... maybe, when he finally met a woman, he was embarrassed and his pride wouldn't let him admit it? That happens a lot with inexperienced men."

The professor took a few puffs from his pipe, lost in thought, before offering another theory.

"Or perhaps Lord Lorenz just wanted to mess with you. He might have been enjoying watching you struggle behind the scenes."

"That would be a relief..."

If only that were all it was. Edwin had the persistent suspicion that the man's desires were not so simple.

"I find it hard to believe, but if he continues not to appear, that would be ideal. We could break the record for the fastest dissipation of a personality in history."

The professor didn't bother to hide his excitement.

"Although, as a researcher, it is a shame not to know how it was done."

All Edwin had done was give up fighting the demon and let himself be swayed.

Unlike the professor, who was already preparing to celebrate, Edwin remained vigilant. But the man had become silent, as if he had been erased. He no longer had nightmares where Giselle cursed him as a demon, and the uncomfortable sensations that had woken him up at night were gone. More than that had disappeared. He no longer heard the meaningless whispers in his head, the irritating military songs, or the mocking laughter that used to scoff at his thoughts. A month passed in silence.

The summer, spent in cautious anticipation of the worst, slipped by without incident, leading him to the cusp of autumn. Naturally, his meetings with the professor became less frequent, and Edwin gradually began to reclaim his place. He started meeting people again and didn't go out of his way to keep Giselle at a distance.

Edwin still regretted being cold to Giselle; now, as the opportunity to make amends approached, he couldn't help but feel fortunate that the demon had fallen silent.

"You will be an adult soon. How do you want to celebrate this birthday?"

It was a special birthday marking her coming of age, so he expected her to want something more extraordinary.

"I want to spend it in Templeton."

But Giselle's wish was surprisingly modest.

"With you. Is that too much to ask...?"

It was Edwin who had made her dreams so humble. She still remembered that time he had told her to go alone.

"Of course, I have to go with you. How could I celebrate your birthday without you?"

Giselle's face blossomed like a flower in the sunlight; her bright smile dispelled the lingering shadow of unease in his heart. With the professor on summer vacation, there was no reason for Edwin not to leave Richmond. Besides, he had business to attend to at the Templeton estate.

"But Templeton, of all places?"

Too late, Edwin considered taking her on the trip she had once spoken of with sparkling eyes. But it was too late; there were only ten days left until her enrollment at Kingsbridge.

"Anywhere is fine, as long as I'm with you."

"Same for me."

And so, Edwin took the train towards the Eccleston family's Templeton estate, the one place he called home, to celebrate Giselle's birthday. Bringing this child into his home had been one of the least regrettable decisions of his life.

But he didn't know then that the decision made that summer, as the girl came of age, would be a mistake he would regret for the rest of his life.

Templeton: The Birthday Trip
⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

The small rural train station had a tin roof, and the sign that read 'T'mpleton' was barely rusted, just as it had been four years ago. The picturesque village seen from the moving train car and the vast, golden waves of wheat fields stretching widely were also exactly as Giselle remembered Templeton.

As they passed the wheat fields, a cluster of sunflowers, jutting out at the roadside at different heights, stared intently at Giselle.

The Watchers' Path.

When she was younger, Giselle had whimsically given that name to the road from Templeton village to the Eccleston estate. This was because, after traversing the messy militia of sunflowers, the gigantic plane trees stood in rows, like the Queen's royal guards, neatly aligned. The loyal trees cast a green canopy over the road. The late summer heat, which hadn't cooled even with the open window breeze, finally retreated with the scorching sun.

"Careful with your hat."

When Giselle stuck her head out the window, the man sitting next to her, resting his chin on his hand, reached out and grabbed her straw hat. That was another thing that hadn't changed in four years.

Chapter 30.

Sir didn't scold me for not keeping my head inside. There was no need.

When we traveled by carriage instead of a car, gentlemen had to watch both sides of the enormous vehicle. In other words, the road was wide enough for four horses to run abreast, so even if I leaned out to my waist, there was no danger of colliding with anything. The only risk was falling out.

"If you fall from the carriage, you'll have to walk the rest of the way on your own."

At Edwin's warning, Giselle obediently pulled her shoulder back inside the window. The reason she kept peeking out, despite the caution, was that the destination was about to reveal itself at the end of the road.

I see it!

As soon as they emerged from the deep shadows of the plane trees, the northern face of a magnificent edifice appeared on the horizon, rising like the very head of the sun.

It was Templeton Estate, the seat of the Eccleston family.

The Duke of Eccleston owned over twenty mansions and villas across the continent, yet the only place Edwin truly called 'home' was Templeton Estate, where he had been born and raised.

Perhaps that was why Giselle, too, only ever felt this specific place was her true home.

The imposing gate, seemingly to cleave the sky itself, slowly swung open to receive its master. Just before crossing the threshold, Giselle fully retreated her head into the carriage.

She couldn't allow the servants, who were lined up from the main gate to the fountain square, to see her still looking like a ten-year-old girl.

As the carriage circled the fountain, Giselle passed a large number of staff members who were bowing to her with respectful reverence. It was always a breathtaking spectacle.

Even now, but especially the very first time she saw it, she had gaped at her surroundings, utterly oblivious to how embarrassing she looked.

She had nearly fainted from shock at what Edwin had told her back then:

"From today on, this is your home too." "...This is my home?"

This isn't a home, it's a palace.

Even the day the news of the armistice had just arrived and the entire garrison was enveloped in a festive atmosphere, she had never imagined Edwin's house would be a palace.

Giselle still remembered that day vividly. Even the static from the old radio broadcasting the armistice declaration still resonated clearly in her memory.

She had looked out the window at the soldiers celebrating the ceasefire with their gear and then looked at Duke Edwin beside her. When Edwin, who had been gazing out the window, turned his attention to her, he asked,

"What?"

In that short syllable, there was a pure, unadulterated joy. It seemed Edwin was as delighted as the soldiers outside, simply exultant over the news that the war was ending. Giselle felt she was the only anxious one.

"Don't you have something you want to say?"

Swallowing her anxiety, Giselle mustered her courage and asked Edwin in a bold voice,

"Sir, where are we going now?" "We're going home." "To... home?"

In that moment, she had feared he meant taking her back to the abandoned house in her original ghost-village, and her heart had frozen over.

"You don't want to? In my's house, you'll never have to go hungry again. You'll never have to shiver from cold or fear." "Oh, Sir's house?"

Another incredible stroke of luck had crossed her path.

Even now, when she thought about how she had stammered in disbelief, her face flushed with embarrassment.

Edwin must have thought she was asking because she disliked the idea. He kept adding more, as if offering more than enough wasn't quite enough.

"Sir's house is enormous, with many rooms, there are horses, and... What do girls like? There are lots of beautiful flowers. There's a fountain, a piano, you can eat delicious food whenever you want..."

Then, he suddenly stopped talking and frowned. She thought he had bitten his tongue.

"...Saying it like that, I sound like a kidnapper. Anyway..."

He had knelt down to meet her at eye level and, like a true gentleman, extended his hand and asked her,

"Natalia, will you come with Sir?" "Yes! Yes! Anywhere!"

She remembered how excited she was, jumping like a little puppy before launching herself into his arms.

And a few days later, holding his hand, she had arrived at his house, nearly swooning from the sheer shock.

Was Edwin really this rich?

Even among soldiers wearing the same uniform and receiving the same rations, the difference in rank was visible, but the difference in wealth was not always so obvious. Still, Edwin had always stood out, and not just because of his dazzlingly handsome face.

"Didn't you know the Major is unbelievably rich? You can tell by how he shines. That's the gleam of wealth and nobility, girl."

When the other soldiers said that, she had simply thought, Oh, he's rich. But she had no idea how wealthy he truly was.

"Wow, Sir, are you going to stop the war? That's amazing!"

Even when Edwin was included in the Mercian side's armistice negotiation team...

Since he's the hero who stopped the massacre at Rozel, he must be able to stop the war too.

That is what she had simply thought at the time.

"Kid, the Major is an Eccleston. An Eccleston." "You don't even know what the Eccleston Family is, do you?" "Eccleston is the Major's last name." "...You really don't know how important the Major is, do you?" "I know a Major is more important than a Captain!" "...No, that's not what I mean. Wow, this girl really snagged a big one without even realizing it, huh?"

At the time, she hadn't understood what they were trying to say.

"The Eccleston family is a ducal house, girl."

Having grown up in a rural area where the landlord was as poor as the tenant farmers, Giselle had never even heard the name Eccleston.

"Wait, so Sir is a noble?" "He's not just a noble! He's from an ancient royal line—the most noble of all nobles!"

It was only after hearing that from the other soldiers that she learned the Eccleston Family had once been royalty and still held enough power and influence to sit at the armistice negotiation table.

Knowing something and truly understanding it are two separate things.

There could never have been a noble in a remote area where even the landowners were as poor as the tenant farmers. To Giselle, therefore, nobles and royalty were no different from dragons. They were fictional creatures that only appeared in the fairy tales her grandmother used to tell her.

That's why, even when she learned Edwin was a noble, she couldn't grasp what it meant or how significant he was.

As expected, seeing something once is faster to understand than hearing about it a hundred times.

Ah, Sir was truly someone from a completely different world, wasn't he?

The near-fainting episode in the palatial house was only the beginning. Experiencing a life completely different from anything she had ever known, Giselle constantly felt the shock of being dropped into a brand-new world.

Why does every person have their own room? Why do they sleep alone in a bed? Can I really use this bed all by myself?

As a farmer's daughter who was used to sharing a two-person bed with her three younger siblings, it took her quite a while to adjust to using an even larger bed all alone.

There's someone who washes the laundry? And someone who takes care of the garden? The maid even helps me dress? And brushes my hair, too?

It was astonishing to discover that there were people who took care of every single chore she previously had to do all by herself.

And is there also someone who spoons-feeds you soup?

No, there wasn't anyone for that, but there was someone to open doors for her.

"Your Grace, Miss Bishop, welcome back."

When the carriage drew to a halt in front of the mansion's entrance, a footman opened the door, and the butler greeted them with a respectful bow. Giselle stepped out of the carriage, taking the hand of a footman wearing immaculate white gloves.

The servants in the ducal mansion were better dressed than the wealthiest landowners in Giselle's village; their faces seemed to shine.

At first, that was why the servants seemed intimidating to her. In her eyes, they appeared more dignified than her village's gentry, and yet, these grand people treated her, the farmer's daughter, like a princess.

Don't they know I'm from Rozel?

That wasn't it. It was because the world inside the Duke's estate followed different rules than the outside world.

The moment you step inside the walls of the ducal mansion, your status from the outside becomes irrelevant. Within these walls, the only thing that determines one's status is how the ducal family treats you.

"Welcome, Miss Bishop."

Upon entering the main building, Mrs. Sanders, the head maid, greeted her courteously.

"Welcome."

A nearby maid with an excited face handed Giselle a bouquet of flowers as a gesture of welcome, and familiar faces gathered around, waiting for their turn to greet her.

"It's been a long time, Miss Bishop." "Hello, everyone. It truly has." "When you left, you were just a child. When did you become such a fine young lady? At first, I thought His Grace had brought back some other lady, not Miss Bishop." "Oh, it's been almost four years, hasn't it? You have no idea how lonely it's been without you, Miss Bishop. We thought you would visit during the breaks, but why didn't you?"

Because without Sir, Templeton isn't my home.

Chapter 31.

"One step into heaven and you'll never want to return to the hell of chores and failures, will you?"

Giselle chose the correct answer, not necessarily the truest one.

"Did you manage well at the boarding school?" "Thanks to all of you! The cookies and cakes you sent on special occasions were always shared with my friends, and we were so grateful."

The kitchen maids clasped their hands with proud smiles. The head maid, who had been observing silently from a step back, glanced at the Duke's expression and subtly joined the conversation.

"Congratulations on being admitted to Kingsbridge as the top student, Miss Bishop."

Hearing those words, all the servants gathered around Miss Bishop gasped, covering their mouths. At the same time, the Duke's smile noticeably brightened.

Although Edwin ’s demeanor was cold, he was not an inherently somber person. However, since returning from the Second War, he had seemed like someone plunged into darkness.

What has he brought back from the battlefield this time, if not a child?

This war was different from the Swan Lake Incident. It wasn't a local skirmish but escalated into a full-scale war that lasted four years.

The shift in power in Constanza had turned the political landscape upside down. The powerful figures who had previously sat at the negotiation table during the Swan Lake Incident were all united by blood and marriage, to the point that they could be considered one large extended family after a few degrees of separation. However, those who replaced them were complete strangers.

Constanza’s new leaders ignored the mutual respect and decorum that had been maintained among the ruling class for centuries, even in times of war.

The most egregious example was when they captured the head of the Eccleston Family—who was linked by marriage to royal families and major houses across the continent—and refused to release him until the very end.

War also paralyzes the heart.

What scars did the Duke's captivity leave on his spirit? Upon his return, the Duke abandoned the main residence where he had lived his entire life and confined himself to the annex.

The number of servants allowed in and out of the annex was severely limited, as were the hours they could access him, so even as the head maid, Mrs. Sanders often went days without seeing the Duke.

"There was a mad doctor in the Constanza army experimenting on prisoners, didn't you hear? They say he was draining animal blood and injecting it into people... Do you think one of those blood types was vampire blood?"

The young maid who spread the ridiculous rumor that the Duke had become a vampire and was hiding for that reason was severely reprimanded, ensuring no one else repeated such nonsense.

Although she pretended to maintain her composure, as the head of the Templeton house staff alongside the butler, Mrs. Sanders secretly worried about the Duke's change.

"Kingsbridge... that means you'll be a student of Her Majesty the Queen. That is incredible." "I heard it's harder to get in there than threading a rope through a needle, and you got in as the top student?"

The Head Maid's spark was fanned by the other maids, and the Duke's face lit up even more. Since he didn't want the admiration to fade, the Duke added fuel to the fire himself.

"She also graduated as the top student from Fullerton Academy." "My goodness!" "She's a genius!"

Mrs. Sanders, who would normally have scolded the maids for their commotion, watched them this time with a sense of relief.

She is playing her role wisely.

This was not simply flattery directed at the maids, but admiration for the girl the Duke cherished.

The one who brought light to the Duke was, after all, this girl.

"I knew from the beginning that Miss Bishop was a genius."

An elderly maid wiped her tear-filled eyes with her wrinkled hand and sniffled.

"She was always so sharp and intelligent. I knew she was destined for greatness from the moment she arrived."

Although she claimed it was no surprise, her tears didn't stop because she had been the one who first found the ten-year-old girl, smiling when she left for school but crying alone when she returned.

At least within the walls of the ducal estate, the child was not hated for being a "Rosena." It wasn't just because the Duke had ordered that she be treated as his guest.

Even servants trained to follow their master's orders like machines had hearts. The pride they felt in having served the Eccleston Family for generations kept their noses higher than most nobles, but they were not immune to compassion for a parentless child, the innocence of a young girl, and the loveliness of a young lady.

This is only my thought, but the Duke must have fallen for her in the same way.

After Duchess Roxworth, no daughter was born into the Duke's household. In fact, no child, male or female, had been born for over thirty years.

The previous Duke had wandered the world for a long time without marrying. Following the death of the previous Duke and Duchess, only the then-young Lord Edwin, now the Duke, remained at the estate.

Although there was a time when the Duke had been a child like any other, it hadn't lasted long. Even during the turbulent emotions of adolescence, which often turn households upside down, he barely showed a ripple of feeling.

He wasn't someone who lived, but someone who was simply alive.

Like a withered old tree that remains in one place without moving forward, just as his mother-in-law, the former head maid, had described him.

During Lord Edwin's years of solitude, the estate was as silent as a monastery...

"I feel like a museum curator."

And when the Swan Lake Incident broke out, the estate's only resident departed for the battlefield. The servants joked among themselves that the house had become a museum. But Mrs. Sanders couldn't bring herself to laugh.

What if that joke someday became reality?

At the time, the estate was at the mercy of a reckless master. It wasn't impossible for the astronomical fortune to vanish overnight, buried under a mountain of debt.

And the family line being cut off in a single night was even more plausible.

At that point, both the Duke and his only heir, his younger brother, were bachelors. If they died without heirs, the estate would pass to a distant branch.

Would a stranger care about the history and tradition of Templeton Estate?

The mansion is like a pet lion. It is magnificent but useless, and it costs a fortune to maintain. If there is no affection, it will eventually be sold.

Even if it is put up for sale, who would want to buy it? The owner, who loses more the longer they bear this burden, would be desperate to get rid of it as quickly as possible.

Therefore, it wasn't entirely unlikely that this mansion would be donated to a charity and become a museum that anyone could enter for a few pennies.

Mrs. Sanders was consumed by despair, realizing that the space she had protected for half her life might not avoid becoming an obsolete relic of the past.

"Greetings. This is Natalia Rudnick. She will be staying here from now on, so please treat her as my guest."

However, the master returned alive, with someone else in tow.

"Oh, hello, I'm Natalia."

The change brought by the little girl, small enough to hide behind the Duke and be unseen, was truly immense.

What does it matter if she is not a child of the Duke's family? As this life, which grew day by day, took root, the hands of the mansion's clock, which had seemed frozen in time, began to move again.

Here, everyone is strictly divided into master and servant, each abiding by their own rules.

"Mrs. Sanders, where should we seat Miss Rudnick at tomorrow's dinner table?" "...I will go ask the Major, so please wait."

However, the girl, who belonged nowhere and had no rules, often created new irregularities, and these small irregularities frequently caused large waves of change.

"The Major has decided to open the garden to the neighbors for Miss Rudnick's eleventh birthday and hold a festival. He also encourages all of you to bring your children or grandchildren as a reward for your hard work."

The only thing that does not change is death. This premise was valid even for human groups. The mansion, which had been as silent as a tomb, began to buzz with life.

Just like an ancient, withered tree, believed to be dead, began to stretch out its branches.

The Duke's routine, once immutable, became unpredictable; his emotions, which previously showed no highs or lows, now fluctuated, following the girl who rarely stood still.

"Bringing prostitutes into a house with a child! Charles Eccleston, have you given up on being human? I don't want to hear your pathetic excuses. Get out right now with those women and go to the Golden Orchid."

Although he was often seen laughing heartily with others, this was the first time she had seen him get so furiously angry.

At this rate, someday the old tree would flower and bear fruit. Mrs. Sanders could finally envision the day when the mansion's time, no longer in the hands of others, would flow toward the future, following its new owner.

All thanks to the girl.

The maids adored her for being a happy child with flowers and cookies, but the head maid, who judged people by their utility and abilities, cherished her because the girl encompassed all those qualities.

Chapter 32.

The girl had played her part splendidly, becoming a light for a withering tree.

It was not merely a fortunate accident that she was a child. She was a sharp, intelligent girl, a survivor of a massacre. She understood her role and executed it perfectly.

In this mansion, there were only two classes: master or servant.

The girl must have struggled the most to find her place, as she was neither master nor servant. Without belonging anywhere, she could lean on any place.

The Duke cherished her as if she were a princess; the employees, initially unsure how to treat her, gradually began to revere her as one. Watching all this unfold, Mrs. Sanders grew cautious.

If she fails to understand her place and dares to covet the master's seat, there will be trouble.

But the girl cleverly carved out her own position and, impressively, adhered strictly to that boundary.

Furthermore, she was precocious. She possessed just the right amount of childishness to draw a clear line and prevent her guardian from realizing it.

Her playful nature was a product of maturity. Mrs. Sanders admired this quality of hers—of 'not being a child.'

But now, even her body is no longer that of a child. And that is a significant problem.

⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

“When His Grace brought Miss Bishop, I thought he had brought a young lady, not a little girl.”

When a maid had said this before, Mrs. Sanders felt her heart drop, thinking she must remind them to be more careful with their words.

Now that she is no longer a child but a woman, what will Giselle Bishop's place be?

The girl would have to confront the same question she faced when she first became a member of this household.

Astute decisions will cause problems. I hope she makes a wise decision, as she did when she was younger.

The difference between 'wise' and 'astute' is a single syllable, but the difference in meaning is vast. Just as the small changes she introduced back then had significant repercussions, the same could happen now with her decisions.

The changes brought by a wise girl are welcome, but the turmoil caused by an astute woman is nothing short of frightening.

⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅∙∘☽༓☾∘∙•⋅⋅⋅•⋅⋅⊰⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅⋅•⋅

“The room has been kept just as it was back then.”

Just as the maid had said, Giselle’s room remained exactly as it was four years ago, save for the overwhelming abundance of flowers decorating every surface—so many that one might fear suffocating from the fragrance.

“My goodness…”

As Giselle entered the room, she noticed the expectant gazes of the maids fixed upon her.

“It’s so beautiful. It’s as if I’ve walked into a greenhouse by mistake.”
“Do you like it?”
“Of course.”

Her admiration for each floral arrangement delighted the maids.
In this great mansion, perpetually adorned with fresh flowers, the men paid them no mind and never recognized the effort involved.

“Wow… even the chandelier is decorated with flowers. It’s like a rain of blossoms. You must teach me how to do this.”
“Oh, it’s a family secret, but I’ll tell you, Miss Bishop.”

Acknowledging their efforts and giving them a sense of purpose had always been Giselle’s role.

“The room is the same as when you used it as a child, so before your arrival, we asked His Grace if it should be redecorated. He said to show it to you first and then do whatever you wished.”

Giselle turned her gaze from the flowers to observe her room.
The walls, decorated with friezes, were sky blue.
The furniture, all white, still shone as if new.
From the carefully laid sheets on the bed to the canopy, and even the lace curtains protecting the tall windows from the summer sun, everything was a soft pink. Not just pink, but adorned with abundant ruffles and sky-blue ribbons.
At thirteen, she had been obsessed with pink and ribbons…
Everything looked new, likely due to meticulous care, but now Giselle understood why the maids had suggested a makeover.
This was a little girl’s room. It no longer suited the Giselle who was nearly an adult.

“I like it as it is.”

So what if it was a little childish? While she was here, she could allow herself to be thirteen again. She was only staying for a week before returning to Richmond, so a renovation was pointless.
To tell the truth, the suggestion to redecorate had pleased her, even more than getting a new room would have. It was reassuring to know that, even as an adult, Edwin had no intention of casting her out of his home.

But then, why does he want me to leave the townhouse in Richmond?

Caught once more in the thoughts that had been troubling her lately, she was interrupted by a maid’s question.

“Do you still drink jasmine tea with honey before bed?”

In truth, she had abandoned the habit after moving to the residence, finding the cleanup bothersome.

“Well…”

But how could she say no to the maid, whose eyes shone with anticipation at the chance to attend to her again?

“Yes, of course.”
“I’ll be sure to bring it for you.”

Just as expected, the maid was delighted.

“Do you need anything else?”
“No, nothing.”

With her small luggage unpacked and organized by the maids, Giselle found herself at a loss for what to do. Feeling awkward just standing there, she asked:

“Where is His Excellency?”
“I believe he went to the photography salon, but let me confirm…”
“No, it’s alright. I’ll check myself.”

Edwin was indeed in the photography salon.

“You came straight here, so there's no need to confirm if you're a fake double or not, right?”

The man seated at the large desk in the center of the spacious room, sliding photographs into an album, let out a dry laugh.

Is he feeling shy?
Surely everyone in the kingdom knew he loved cameras more than any woman he had ever loved, so it was no secret.

Edwin was passionate about photography, so much so that he had a dedicated studio in his home.
The walls of this room, decorated like a gallery, were adorned with black-and-white photo frames of various sizes, hung like paintings. One entire wall, reaching up to the ceiling, was filled with shelves crammed with albums.
All of them contained photographs taken by Edwin.
The other half of the wall was occupied by cameras. Every compartment in the glass display cases held a different camera; Edwin cherished them as if they were jewels.
Between the wall of albums and the shrine of cameras was a small door leading to a darkroom. His affection for photography ran so deep that he had a darkroom at home and developed his own photographs.

Is he organizing new photos? What has he photographed this time? I should take a look.

I approached the desk and leaned over it from the opposite side to peek at the pile of photos he was sorting. The photos came into view, and I squinted.

“These aren’t your photos, Sir. They’re mine.”

Blurry, poorly framed, with strange composition, and, above all, filled with awkward and ridiculous poses of myself.

“Use this to take pictures for me every day. When I return, show them to me. If you send them to me by letter, I’ll be even more grateful.”

When he left for the war, Sir had left a camera with me as a gift. For the past four years, I had photographed myself whenever I had the chance with that camera.
From staged poses, like sitting primly under a leafy tree and reading a book, to moments of pride, like holding a trophy from a tennis tournament, and even ridiculous ones, like standing in front of a mirror with Elena, dressed in theater costumes.

“Why are there so few photos from last year and this one?”

He must have been sorting the photos chronologically, to ask me this.

That’s because I couldn’t take any pictures after you were captured, Sir.

Every time I stood before the camera, I imagined the lens was Sir’s eyes, and I would smile. After he was taken prisoner, it became impossible for me to smile into those eyes, even in my imagination.

When I didn’t respond, Sir, who had been staring at the desk, looked up and met my gaze. As soon as he did, he quickly averted his eyes, picked up a photo frame from the edge of the desk, and held it under my chin.

Why? Oh!

It was then I realized he had probably seen something through the opening of my blouse while I was leaning forward.
Startled, I immediately straightened up. Even without looking in a mirror, I knew my face was bright red.

“You aren’t like this.”

Ah, no, I wasn't trying to seduce Sir or anything…

“Why are your photos so demure?”
“Ah…”

He meant that the Giselle captured in the photos from the last four years seemed unusually well-behaved.

“I’ve always been demure.”
“Ha!”

Edwin laughed derisively, as if he'd heard a joke. He stopped sorting, stood up, and walked over to the shelves. I wondered where he was going, but he soon returned with an album in hand.

Giselle Bishop, 12 Years Old

The title was written on the cover. He opened it in front of me and flipped through the pages, pointing to specific photos as if presenting evidence to a culprit.

“Look closely.”

A photo of me tying my skirt up like a pair of trousers, hanging upside down from a tree, with a smile so wide you could see all my teeth.

“……”

A perfectly timed shot of me falling backward while ice-skating.

“……”

An extraordinary capture of me biting into an ice cream so hard the whole chunk fell off.

And so on.

Chapter 33.

"Even now, are you still going to insist you were always perfectly demure?"

Giselle gritted her teeth, unable to continue denying it.

"...When you're not looking, I'll destroy all of them." "Even if you do, I still have the film."

Thud.

The sound of him closing the album, as if urging her to look at it, and his mocking smile, as if taunting her, were both utterly exasperating.

...What should truly be locked away in a frame is that smug grin of yours, Sir.

How awful. Truly.

With the composure of a victor, he walked away. After returning the album to the shelf, the next place he headed was the cabinet where his cameras were displayed.

"Which one should I take out today?" "Are you planning to go out and take pictures?"

Edwin, who was fiddling with a rangefinder camera he had bought the moment it hit the market but never used due to the outbreak of the war, nodded.

"The weather is fine, so I thought I could finally take some photos of you..."

But he didn't finish the sentence, instead letting his brow furrow.

"Pictures that shouldn't be taken."

It was because Duchess Roxworth's words suddenly rushed back to his mind.

Last week, he had been invited to a party hosted by the Duchess. While mingling with the guests, he was asked a question.

"Duke, are you going to organize another war photography exhibition this time?"

Even on the battlefield, Edwin never let go of his camera. Whether moments of pride or agony, he relentlessly captured the life and death of the battlefront on film.

Every moment was too precious to let slip away. The photos he took might also be the last images of his comrades.

Although the Swan Lake Incident ended in less than half a year, he had used as many as thirty rolls of film during that time.

Any that might violate military security were either sent to the army or destroyed, while the remainder were kept as personal archives. The photos of his comrades were sent to them or their families.

Shortly thereafter, the Department of Veterans Affairs contacted him.

"Major, how would you feel about holding an exhibition with us?"

The idea was to hold a war photography exhibition to raise funds for injured veterans and their families.

"That's a great idea."

There was no reason to refuse the proposal. And so, the exhibition was organized.

At first, only a few attended, drawn by the 'Eccleston' name, but later, more people came to see the unfiltered hope and despair of the battlefield captured in the photos.

As word spread and the media praised the exhibition, the venue became so crowded there was no standing room. What was initially planned as a ten-day event was extended into a six-month national tour.

In the first week, the donations raised accounted for 80% of Edwin's contribution. By the event's close, the total had increased to over a hundred times the amount he had initially donated.

It was a resounding success.

For Edwin, the exhibition remained a gratifying memory where his photos received acclaim and helped his comrades. If another opportunity arose, why would he refuse it?

"Of course, another one is planned this time, too."

In fact, he had just received another proposal from the Department of Veterans Affairs. Although his camera had been confiscated when he was taken prisoner, the films he managed to send home were more than enough for a new exhibition.

"This year, it will be on a larger scale to coincide with Veterans' Day." "That's wonderful news. I look forward to it." "Four years of photos must be enormous. Classifying them must be quite a task." "It is rewarding work."

While most people welcomed the news, Duchess Roxworth wore a look of deep displeasure. The reason became clear when she pulled him aside later.

"Edwin, I hope you won't display any photos of Giselle Bishop in this exhibition."

During the first exhibition, Edwin had obtained Giselle's permission to display her photos. The goal was to raise awareness about the Rozel massacre and encourage the sponsorship or adoption of war orphans like Giselle.

A photo of the little girl clutching a can of biscuits, her cautious eyes fixed on the camera when they first met.

The cold ground where the child pretended to be dead.

The girl, who had lost her entire family, gathering her few possessions in an empty house.

The series began with such poignant images and gradually transitioned to her rediscovery of her smile, concluding with a large, radiant photo of her holding a bouquet of flowers in the summer fields of Templeton.

The message: Other war orphans, too, could find happiness, with your help.

That meaningful exhibition, which spread this message nationwide, was apparently something the Duchess disapproved of.

Setting aside her reasons, Edwin thought the request was quite unexpected.

"Why would I display photos of Giselle? She wasn't even in this war."

The girl had remained at a boarding school in Fullerton, far from any battlefield.

Even if she had appeared in a photo, Edwin no longer intended to exhibit them. Giselle was now an adult with her own social life and reputation. No matter how noble his purpose, he didn't want her to be a symbol for any campaign again.

"It's true. I only say this to prevent strange rumors." "...What kind of rumors?" "That you are taking pictures of her." "Why would that be strange...?" "Pictures that shouldn't be taken." "......." "Taking them in secret and keeping them." "...Are they insane?"

For the first time, Edwin couldn't restrain himself from uttering harsh words he hadn't even used for the worst troublemakers in the military.

How can anyone look at a child and think such things?

Damn scoundrels.

Because they view things with a singularly shrewd eye, they firmly believe they don't overlook the absurdities that others miss. In reality, it's just that their filthy perspective makes the pure lives of others seem stained.

The world is full of lunatics who believe themselves sane and, worse, accuse truly sane people of madness. Edwin was starting to question his profession, which required him to risk his life to protect even those types of people.

"Why are you insulting me?" "I am not insulting her, Your Grace. Wait, if this is an old rumor, why tell me now? I hope you haven't been harboring such beliefs." "...Aren't you also an Eccleston?"

To hear such words from his aunt, of all people.

The betrayal Edwin felt in that moment rivaled the time in his childhood when he witnessed his beloved, virtuous governess becoming involved with his father.

"If that is how you see it, then 'Eccleston' might as well become synonymous with incest from now on." "What a repulsive thing to say!" "Giselle Bishop. Think about why I gave her that name in the first place."

The Eccleston family had a tradition of assigning specific names to their daughters. Giselle was one of those names. The surname Bishop was his mother's maiden name.

In other words, it was a name he gave her because he thought of her as a daughter.

"Well, it's true... You are more of a Bishop than an Eccleston."

The Bishop family was famed for producing distinguished military leaders. Loyalty ran in their blood; the men of the Bishop line were known not only for their allegiance to the homeland but also for their unwavering devotion to their wives.

Edwin had chosen the military path because he resembled his mother more than his father. For the same reason, Duchess Roxworth had always favored Edwin among her nephews.

And yet, now she suspects me of being a lustful brute...

The betrayal cut deep.

"I know, Edwin. That's why I was certain no one would believe it, and it wouldn't spread. And it didn't. The fact that I completely forgot about it until now proves that, doesn't it?"

But she said the mention of the photo exhibition had refreshed her memory.

"People who stand out often attract slander. You cannot fight every battle, so it's better to let some things fade away on their own. I'm sure you understand. I only gave you this advice to avoid unnecessary trouble."

It was unsolicited advice, but Edwin appreciated her concern. Even if her persistent worry tended to undermine his gratitude.

"But this is mostly your fault." "What do you mean?" "It's because you haven't married yet! That is why strange rumors pursue you. Just get married already."

In the end, it had all been an elaborate way to nag him about marriage.

"I will marry when the time is right."

When I am certain the demon is completely gone.

Of course, this outward answer did not satisfy his aunt, who could not hear the deeper meaning.

"You may be innocent, but the world does not know you. People will believe what they want." "No one lives without being misunderstood."

Give up what I want to do out of fear of being judged by those who do not know me? That would be complete foolishness.


Chapter 34.

"Let's go."

Edwin picked up the camera and film roll and led Giselle out to the garden.

Famous people are not criticized because they make mistakes; they are criticized because they are famous. If they have no flaws, people focus on their achievements. Sometimes, the mere act of existing becomes the target of scorn.

It wasn't as if he was going to die just to satisfy them.

So he chose to live boldly, taking the criticism as it came.

Usually, he would follow this defiant streak within himself and live accordingly...

"But a single leaf is far less lethal than the tongues of a hundred. You might be accustomed to enduring infamy and shrugging it off, but do you think Miss Bishop will feel the same?"

If Giselle became the subject of gossip, it would be an entirely different matter.

After reviewing the glances he had felt during the ball, Edwin concluded that it would be better to maintain a physical distance—not for his status, but for Giselle's reputation.

If we continue to live together in the town house, more strange rumors are sure to arise.

Lately, the topic of conversation between the two of them had been Giselle's university plans.

"Dormitory?"

The overly capable girl had gone ahead and not only enrolled in the university but also applied for a residence hall while he was away.

"I think... it would be better for me to move into the university dormitory."

It was only after his conversation with his aunt that Edwin realized she might have noticed the strange looks cast their way and was trying to leave because of it.

"What do you think, Sir?"

At the time, he had replied, "Let me think about it," but he later concluded that he had no choice but to side with Giselle. However, how could he send her to a cramped, shabby university dorm?

"I've thought about it. How about I give you a house nearby? You could live there while you study."

It turned out there was an empty small house in a residential area near Kingsbridge. It was a quiet and safe neighborhood, mostly inhabited by professors—perfect for someone living alone.

"You mean... lend it to me for free?" "Yes." "Then I won't accept it." "Why? Are you worried that the maid I send will report your curfew?" "That's like a soldier revealing strategy to the enemy."

He downplayed her objection with a joke, but it occurred to him that perhaps she was refusing because she feared the gossip. If he gave her the house, people would definitely whisper about his motives.

I should have given it to her when she was younger.

But would she truly have escaped the rumors then? No matter when he gave it, people would talk. In that case, he might as well give it to her now.

Better to have a house and endure bad rumors than to have neither.

As Edwin strolled through the garden, looking for scenic spots to photograph, he asked her,

"Are you really going to the dormitory?" "Yes."

Her firm answer gave him a sharp pang, as if a knife had been driven in.

"The dormitories are more comfortable for me."

Compared to a house given with motives she couldn't fully comprehend.

Does Sir find it inconvenient to have me in the town house?

That thought had prompted Giselle to ask if moving to the dorm was better. His answer meant, in essence, that he wanted her to leave the house, which was no different from admitting he found living with her inconvenient.

Then why is he offering me a house?

If she couldn't stay by his side, a spacious, beautiful house was no better than a small, worn-out dorm.

When he suddenly brought up the topic, she thought he would try to convince her again, but...

"You know it's polite to accept birthday gifts without refusing them, right?"

What was he getting at now?

"Giselle, being a well-mannered girl, would happily accept if someone like me offered her a house as a birthday gift, wouldn't she?"

Against her will, Giselle laughed. Under the rules between her and Edwin, laughing meant conceding. She had no choice but to hoist the white flag.

"How could you ruin the surprise by telling me beforehand? That's not fun." "Don't worry. There are still nine more surprises left." "...Nine more?" "How about over there?"

He stopped and gestured toward a spot to their left. Following his gaze, Giselle's eyes widened.

"Do you mean that?"

He was pointing to a small island in the middle of the lake. Amidst the sprawling branches of a massive weeping willow stood a glistening white structure inspired by an ancient temple.

The Pavilion of the Naiads.

Accessible only by rowing a small boat, it felt like a sacred, secret space, sealed off from humans. The marble pillars were draped with blooming wisteria, and beyond the vines was an inner chamber with glass walls. You could see outside from within, but from the exterior, it was nearly opaque—a perfect refuge for hiding and daydreaming.

Inside was a white grand piano. Playing it made her feel, if only for a moment, not like a penniless orphan but a muse of music living by the lake.

It was, unsurprisingly, Giselle's favorite spot on the estate.

"You said it's polite to accept gifts, right?"

she said, ready to accept it without hesitation. But Edwin's expression was strange—part surprise, part suppressed amusement.

"What's wrong?" "Giselle." "Yes?" "I meant we could take pictures there." "Oh..."

Her face flushed crimson. She quickly spun around and ran toward the lake, as if fleeing. Edwin sauntered along behind her, laughing.

"Where are you going? Wait for me."

The teasing lilt in his voice sent a shiver of foreboding through her. Knowing Edwin's ruthlessness when given an opening for mockery, Giselle decided to go on the offensive.

"You should have been clearer. Language depends on context! If you start talking about gifting me a house and then ask, 'How about over there?', it's only natural to assume you're offering that too!" "Oh, so you're saying the three-story house wasn't enough, and now you want a mansion?" "No, I was just..."

Asking for that.

...was something she couldn't bring herself to say. That would have crossed the line into absolute madness.

Finally, Giselle clamped her mouth shut and quickened her pace along the lakeshore toward the small dock where the rowboat was tied. Behind her, she could hear his unhurried steps crunching on the gravel.

"Giselle." "..." "Beautiful Miss Giselle." "..." "Would the top student of Fullerton please answer? No? Then how about the future top student of Kingsbridge?" "..." "Then, could the person Edwin Eccleston likes most on this lakeside estate please stop walking?"

Giselle did not stop.

There is no one here but me!

Not just on the lakeside estate—no, in the entire world, there was only her.

If I were someone he loved, I wouldn't hesitate. I would run into his arms and embrace him.

Love? Truly, I must be nothing more than a spoiled, foolish puppy.

Creak, creak.

When she didn't take the bait, the sound of his footsteps quickened.

"Ah..."

Just as she felt he was about to catch up, she sensed Edwin behind her. The moment his presence overtook her, two hands appeared in front of her. Thinking he was about to embrace her, she stopped in surprise.

"Got you."

Edwin's large hands cupped Giselle's cheeks as if to swallow them whole. His long fingers slid under her chin, pressing up as if to claim their place. Her head naturally tilted backward.

"Giselle."

The man's face, looking down at her from a distance close enough to feel his breath, came into view. At that moment, her already flushed cheeks grew even hotter, and she hoped he didn't notice.

"Are you angry?" "No."

She had never been angry with Edwin. She was merely embarrassed to face him, ashamed of her constant yearning for what was out of reach.

And when she was confronted with his teasing yet kind behavior like this, she felt that the culprit was not her for being too greedy, but him for making it impossible to contain her immoderate desires.

"Thanks to you, I've learned that my little puppy likes the Naiads."

Edwin was skillful at both calming Giselle's untamed emotions and, at the same time, drawing clear boundaries. Did he know what he was doing, or was it involuntary?

"How about holding your wedding there someday? What do you think?"

In either case, it was exasperating.

Although we rowed over to the island, we couldn't get inside. The door was locked.

"What about a master key?" "Ah, well..."

The Duke had the key that could open every door in this residence. But Edwin, who only intended to stroll through the garden, hadn't brought the key.

"Another time, then. How about we take a picture of Giselle in the lake for now?"

He was no swan, nor was the lake frozen. 'Giselle in the lake?' What could that possibly mean...?

"Smile a little." "Do I look like I'm in the mood to smile?"

Little did I know, he had meant that he would sit behind me and take a photo of me struggling to row while I was sitting in the bow of the boat.

Chapter 35.

"Imagine the entire universe speeding forward for tens of billions of years just for this precise moment. We arrived here through a series of countless coincidences spanning billions of years. Doesn't that make you happy?" "Are you telling me the universe sped forward for tens of billions of years just so I couldn't play the piano because you forgot the master key, so I could row the boat alone while you were busy taking photos... just to capture this sulky expression for eternity?"

Click.

"Exactly."

Edwin didn't miss the moment her cheeks puffed out with irritation and pressed the shutter.

"For the vast universe to culminate in such an ordinary moment? The universe must be very lazy."

Click.

"Ordinary? Every moment is unique."

Similar moments may happen, but you can never relive the exact same one. As time passes, both the world and the people in it change irreversibly.

The universe only expands; stars continue to drift further apart from each other. According to the laws of thermodynamics, everything in the universe moves from meaningful order toward meaningless chaos. Lost meaning can never be recovered.

Cells constantly die and are replaced by new ones, meaning we are no longer the same people we were yesterday.

In her younger years, she had tried to rationalize her anguish by using the scientific theories she once loved. She had told herself that the fact that the people she cared about changed beyond recognition was an inescapable law of the universe. There was no need to mourn it.

But the pain didn't go away. Human emotions do not follow the laws of the universe.

Everyone changes; if nothing can stop it, at least capturing their immutable version to keep forever seemed worthwhile. That is how Edwin found solace in photography.

Click.

And that is why he imprints Giselle onto film.

Even if he tells her not to become a woman or an adult, the universe will inevitably change her.

"That side with the water lilies is prettier. Row over there. No, not that way, row left." "Wouldn't it be faster if you picked up an oar yourself instead of just giving me orders?" "How long do you think I can keep rowing for you? True love isn't about rowing for someone; it's about teaching them how to row for themselves." "...Isn't that about fishing, not rowing? It's not like not knowing how to row is a matter of life and death..." "Slowly now. Keep the oar upright to reduce speed."

Though she grumbled, she rowed according to his directions and soon found herself near the carpet of water lilies. She stopped the boat and dropped the oar.

"Ugh...."

It was late August, a ripe summer day.

Following Edwin's persistent urging, she had rowed the boat until she was under the shade of the willows, but she was still drenched in sweat.

"Giselle."

Just as she raised a hand to wipe the sweat from her forehead, he called her name. With the back of her hand still plastered to her brow, she turned to look back....

Click.

He pressed the shutter. She thought he wanted to photograph the water lilies when he suggested moving closer to them, but instead, he had taken a picture of her sweaty face.

Click.

Even the moment she shot him a glare of hatred was caught by the camera.

"Why are you taking pictures of me looking like this?" "Because you're pretty."

Through the upright camera, his half-hidden lips moved to utter those teasing words, drawing a slight curve as they met. For a fraction of a second, her breath hitched.

A soft breeze blew. Light filtered through the willow branches, dancing in patches.

Click.

Her vision, focused on his lips, zoomed out, engraving his radiant face, as vivid as a stained-glass window, onto her heart.

As if fleeing, she pulled her gaze further back and saw him leaning carelessly against the edge of the wooden boat, his sleeves rolled up past his elbows.

Sunlight tracked his relaxed figure. When the breeze ceased for a moment, an intense beam of light poured straight onto him through a gap in the dense trees.

The finger on the shutter paused. His straight eyebrows furrowed, eyes squinting against the sunlight hitting his face, which he shielded with his hand. The shadow of his fingers trailed across his features.

Zoom in one more time. Then zoom out.

Click.

A magical moment, one she believed would never visit her again, had arrived once more.

And again, click.

But this time, it was from the man himself.

When that first moment came, she regretted not having a photograph to preserve it, thinking the memory, revisited too often, would fade and blur with time.

If only I had captured the moment I fell in love in a photograph, she had thought.

Now, the moment had returned. If she snatched the camera from Edwin's hand, she could record it.

Click.

But Giselle did not.

"A photo captures not only the subject but also the heart of the person taking it."

According to his words, a photo capturing the moment one falls in love would preserve not only the beautiful subject but also the pain of being unable to claim them as one's own.

Let it flow.

Click.

As the shutter flickered like an eyelid, Giselle closed her eyes too.

"Too bright?"

The light was with him, not her.

"Don't close your eyes."

So petty, truly.

Now, she acknowledges it.

Edwin is far from a good man.

"Incorrect! Incorrect."

The head dangled from the gallows. But it wasn't dead; it was still incomplete, as the body hadn't been drawn yet.

Giselle, who had been drawing circles on a notepad placed on the tall table behind the sofa—not for playing Hangman—looked at Edwin.

"What's the next letter?" "The next letter is..."

Edwin, sitting across from her on the sofa, replied nonchalantly while glancing at his watch. He was clearly someone who wanted to leave this place.

10:11 PM.

These days, Edwin goes to bed before 10:30 PM. Even knowing this, Giselle refused to let him go just for this night.

"If you can't guess, you can't leave." "After midnight." "Ah, after midnight, you can leave whenever you want."

By then, Giselle intended to willingly let him go, after spending her first adult moment with Edwin .

"No, I mean the phrase you wrote. After. Mid. Night."

How did he guess with only two letters revealed?

Despite Edwin guessing correctly, Giselle pouted and scribbled a laughing face onto the Hangman figure she had brought back to life.

Pak.

She tore off the page, drew a new set of blanks on a fresh page, and declared, "Let's play one more round."

She had to detain Edwin until midnight. Because today was a special day.

Although she could have simply asked him to wait, she went to such lengths because she had already been refused once.

Four, five...

As she counted the blanks to check if they matched, he leaned close to her ear and whispered,

"Do you want me to guess?" "We haven't started yet... but can I drink alcohol?" "...Continuing the previous round: after midnight, can you drink alcohol?"

His meticulousness, even remembering to add a question mark, was infuriating. This relaxed decisiveness.

"My answer is no."

Edwin took the fountain pen from Giselle's hand and wrote "No" in large, clear letters.

"Why not? I'm an adult now." "Because your first drink has to be with me. Don't you like that?" "...No, I like it." "Then you'll wait until I wake up, won't you?" "Then why can't you wait until midnight for me tonight...?"

Although Edwin wanted nothing more than to celebrate the moment Giselle became an adult at midnight, it was impossible.

Because of the sleeping pills.

The later he took them, the groggier he would feel the next day—far worse than a hangover.

Furthermore, having entrusted the pill bottle to Loise for safekeeping due to his own lack of trust, the longer Edwin stayed awake, the more he would inconvenience Loise by delaying her evening departure.

Exceptions could be made for tonight, but celebrating at midnight would require more than just a bland toast before turning in. They would need a proper drink.

"It is prohibited to consume sleeping pills after drinking alcohol."

The professor had issued a warning:

"If you have been drinking, it's best to skip the sleeping pills entirely."

For Edwin, that was an absolute no. Skipping the sleeping pills for even one night would be equivalent to leaving the door wide open for the monster inside him.

Therefore, Edwin did not give in to Giselle's persistent attempts and stood up.

"I will wake up early tomorrow and be the first to congratulate you." "If you are not the first person I see when I wake up tomorrow morning, I cannot guarantee what will happen." "Loise, issue an order throughout the mansion. No one is to congratulate Giselle Bishop on her birthday before me." "You are so petty. If you were a king, you would be a tyrant." "Also, place an alcohol consumption ban on Giselle Bishop, effective immediately until I revoke it."

His tone and voice instantly shifted to that of a severe military commander.

"If only the sleeping person doesn't know, it's fine. While you sleep, I'll have a celebratory party with everyone else. I'll even empty all the liquor in this mansion." "You really talk a lot, even though you ask for juice after one sip."

He reached out to return the fountain pen he was holding to Giselle but, noticing the name engraved on the smooth black surface, he withdrew it again.

"Ah... that's..."

Please give it back.

Giselle didn't dare say it. After all, it was Edwin's .

"Don't forget that wherever you are, I am always with you."

It was the fountain pen Edwin had left with Giselle when he went off to war.

"You must return it when I come back."

That is what he had said... Even though she knew it was quite meaningful to him, as it was a pen he had received along with his comrades upon graduating from the military academy...

I never thought he would actually want it back.

To think she would now have to say goodbye to the days of finding comfort by caressing Edwin's name engraved on the pen. Her heart already felt empty.

"Oh, you like this?"

Even as he registered Giselle's sullen expression, Edwin casually and lightly capped the pen and slid it into the front pocket of his jacket.

"Don't feel bad. Tomorrow morning, I'll bring you a brand-new one that will suit you much better."

Edwin didn't understand why Giselle treasured that old pen so much. He didn't realize her desire to possess at least one of his treasured, irreplaceable belongings if she couldn't have him.

"Now, off to your room." "I'm not a child..."

Muttering complaints about being treated like a child, Giselle stood up.

"You are still a child. For at least another hour and a half."

So, just for that hour and a half more...

Though she wanted to plead desperately, it didn't seem like begging would work. Giselle gave up and followed him into the hallway.

"Come to think of it, today is the last day I can treat you like a child. I should take advantage of this opportunity before the day ends." "I know you'll still treat me like a child even after midnight."

Edwin smiled, his eyes crinkling as if he'd been caught red-handed.

"Still, this will be the last time I say goodbye like this tonight."

Standing in front of Giselle's bedroom door, he began the goodnight greeting he used to give to the little girl who was once afraid to sleep alone.

"I've chased away the monsters under the bed, the ghosts in the closet, and the bad men at the door. So sleep peacefully tonight, my dear little lady."

He said he would make the most of this last chance, but he omitted the most important thing: the kiss on the forehead that always accompanied the goodnight.

"Good night..."

As Giselle watched his cool silhouette retreat down the hallway, she quietly repeated the words she had secretly added to his goodnight greetings since she was thirteen.

My dear Sir.

If he was saying goodbye to the little lady, she, too, would have to say goodbye to her dear Sir.

When it came to the Duke of Eccleston's bedtime, strict rules had to be followed.

[Rule Number One]

While the Duke sleeps, a guard must remain outside his bedroom. If the Duke attempts to leave the room, the guard must lock the door and immediately call the head butler or Loise.

Under no circumstances, save for emergencies like fire, must the Duke be allowed to leave, no matter what he says.

If any noise is heard inside, the guard must listen carefully and record it.

The rule that someone aware of the Duke's condition must always watch him while he is awake had been lifted after a month with no appearances from the 'demon,' but the nighttime rules were still rigidly enforced.

Loise confirmed that the servant assigned to this night was stationed in the hallway before entering the Duke's bedroom. The Duke, who had just finished preparing for bed, was stepping out of the dressing room.

"Here you are."

Loise handed him a glass of water and a pill.

[Rule Number Two] Sleeping pills can only be handled by Loise. Even if the Duke commands it, the container must never be handed over. If the Duke attempts to return pills he has taken from the container, he must be stopped. The demon might impersonate the Duke and switch the pills.

And one more thing.

Loise must verify that the pill has been swallowed down the throat. She must check that no pill remains in his mouth, not even under his tongue, that the glass of water is empty, and that the Duke's hand is empty after taking the pill.

After completing the inspection, Loise nodded, and the Duke gave his permission.

"Good work today. Go rest." "Have a peaceful night, Your Grace."

Loise switched off the lights and closed the door as she left. Edwin lay down on the bed and relaxed.

Once again, the demon had not appeared. One more day closer to a normal life.

May it not appear tomorrow, either. May the day come when even the sleeping pills are no longer necessary.

As he waited for the sleeping pill to take effect, he closed his eyes.

Click.

The door was locked from the outside.

Flash.

His eyes snapped open.

"Good night, Miss Bishop. I hope to see you tomorrow, all grown up." "Good night."

Tonight, Giselle again mixed a spoonful of honey into the jasmine tea the maid had brought, drank it, and lay down in bed.

A hot, sweet cup of tea, combined with a bed as soft as a cloud, usually relaxed both her body and mind, letting her fall into bed in the blink of an eye.

But tonight, no matter how she shifted her posture, her mind remained wide awake.

Why does he go to bed so early?

It was because thoughts of Edwin still wouldn't leave her.

He used to stay up late.

Even later than Giselle herself, who, as a child, hated going to bed early, full of energy and reluctant to miss anything, good or bad, while she slept.

But since returning from the battlefield, he always retired early.

Has a curse fallen upon him like Cinderella? Will he turn into someone else if he stays up past midnight?

Whimsical thoughts often came to her in bed...

Perhaps he calls his lover at a fixed time every night.

Sometimes, when her mind was unusually sharp, she came up with things that would not have occurred to her otherwise.

She wanted to dismiss it as fanciful imagination rather than sharp reasoning, but...

That must be why he heads to his room at the same time every night.

The more she thought about it, the more sense it made.

It's that woman, isn't it?

Giselle recalled the item that had once fallen out of Edwin's jacket.

A woman capable of compelling him to carry such a thing—what kind of woman was she?

She wanted to know, but at the same time, she didn't. Especially not on her birthday.

Giselle, happy birthday. Ah, let me introduce you. This is my...

An inconsiderate man, oblivious to her feelings, might think her special birthday was the perfect occasion to introduce his beloved daughter and his lover.

That's why I suggested we celebrate quietly, just the two of us, at Templeton...

On her birthday, she wanted Edwin all to herself. But the thought that he might be sharing sweet, or even passionate, words with another woman every night?

Fwoosh.

Overwhelmed by a sudden surge of emotion, Giselle threw off her thin summer blanket and sat up abruptly, only to...

Fall.

...slump back onto the bed.

What good is being jealous? Do I even have the right to be angry? No matter what, I can never be Sir's woman, not even when I grow up. So stop thinking about it.

Her imagination spiraled, picturing Edwin sharing sweet or even passionate words with a lover in the bedroom not far from her own.

She groaned inwardly, trying to banish the thought, until...

Ding. Ding. Ding.

The faint chime of a clock echoed from afar. It was midnight. Giselle whispered softly beneath the covers.

"Happy birthday..."

She hesitated, unsure what name should follow.

Tap. Tap.

Just then, amidst the heavy ticking of the clock, came the faint sound of rapping. Too soft to be sure, she thought she might have imagined it.

"Giselle."

But no matter how quiet and restrained the voice was, she couldn't mistake Edwin's  tone calling her name.

Could it be? Could he have changed his mind and come to be the first to wish me a happy birthday?

Giselle quickly rose from the bed and hurried toward the door, but she froze. She couldn't present herself to him in her thin, translucent nightgown.

She grabbed the light cardigan the maid had draped over the bed railing, swiftly slipped her arms into it, and, as she rushed to the door, called out to him not to leave.

"One moment."

Tap. Tap, tap.

The rapping outside grew more insistent, urging her to open.

Why is he in such a hurry?

His impatience was unlike him.

Giselle didn't bother to button the cardigan and hastily pulled the door open.

On the other side of the door, an imposing silhouette towered over her. The darkness obscured his face, but the tall figure was unmistakably Edwin .

"Ah...."

He must have forgotten to turn on the light.

Just as she reached for the switch by the door, a dark hand abruptly shot out from the gloom and grasped Giselle's wrist.

"The light..." "Shh."

He released her wrist and raised his index finger, gently pressing it against her slightly parted lips. Startled, Giselle stopped mid-sentence.

The cool fingertip slowly slid across her lips, slightly parting her lower lip, and then withdrew.

What?

Edwin's  unusual touch reminded Giselle of the dimly lit hallway at the ballroom that night. Could Sir be recalling that night, too?

Why did he do that? What should I do now?

In the darkness, his expression was unreadable. She couldn't tell what he wanted, let alone what the most sensible response would be. She held her breath, waiting for him to speak.

Did he forget why he came to see me?

He remained motionless and silent where he stood. Even though she couldn't see him, his gaze was palpable, intense enough to make her skin prickle beneath her clothes. He was staring at her.

Can he really see me?

She hastily pulled her cardigan tighter and began to fasten the buttons.

Grind.

The sound of grinding teeth startled her, and she paused mid-button. It unequivocally came from him.

It was only when his long exhale released a strong minty scent that she realized it was the sound of him chewing mint. The pungent aroma mixed with his deep, resonant voice.

"Aren't you going to invite me in?" "Invite you... in?"

It was not unreasonable for Giselle to repeat the question in surprise. Not once had he ever entered her bedroom.

"Or do you expect us to drink out here in the hallway?"

A hand that had been out of sight behind his back suddenly appeared before her eyes.

"Wow..." "Shh."

If he hadn't shushed her again, Giselle might have exclaimed out loud, her voice ringing in the silent hallway after midnight.

In his hand was a bottle of champagne and two champagne flutes.

"Please, come in." "Then I won't decline..."

When Giselle stepped aside, he entered her room.

Click.

He gently nudged the door, which Giselle was still holding. Then, without a word, he scanned the room. Giselle watched his silhouette in the darkness and swallowed hard.

Even in the gloom, he moved without hesitation, heading straight for the sofa and setting the bottle and glasses down on the side table.

Click.

The side table lamp came on, finally illuminating the sight of him standing in the middle of her bedroom.

The first thing that caught her eye was his appearance.

Familiar yet unfamiliar.

Although his clothing was the same as before, he was no longer wearing his jacket or tie. The waistcoat, snug against his broad chest, was fully buttoned and seemed almost constrictive, while the top two buttons of his dress shirt were undone.

He was also missing the gold wristwatch that never left his left wrist, even when he dressed casually. Instead, she noticed his sleeves were rolled up past his forearms, the cuffs unbuttoned.

His black hair, neatly styled and slicked back with pomade before bed, now fell naturally in soft waves, brushed aside by his hand.

So he really did shower.

The faint scent of soap she had caught as he passed was not an illusion.

To Giselle, who had observed him closely for years, everything about him was familiar, yet everything seemed strangely different, perhaps because of the setting.

"What are you doing over there? Come closer."

He gestured toward the champagne. Both the drink and Edwin  himself were temptations she couldn't resist, but Giselle did not move.

"It's your first time in my room." "Is it?"

He answered as if it were nothing. Giselle, however, could not take it lightly.

He was in her room for the first time—this late at night, on the night she became an adult.

No, he wouldn't possibly have come here with those intentions....

Her fingers anxiously fiddled with the tightly fastened button through the buttonhole of the cardigan.

But he just touched my lips.

The deliberate, slow tracing of his fingers could not be called an accident.

Even if he saw me as a woman, he wouldn't do anything.

Even if he wanted to, she believed he would suppress such desires until the end, for a good reason.

Edwin is not like the Eccleston hounds.

If anything, he despised those hounds more than anyone.

He wouldn't stoop to their level, taking advantage of an orphan he raised as soon as she came of age.

Sir is an angel.

So Giselle scoffed at her own irrational thoughts and approached him, asking,

"Did you intend to surprise me all along?"

Was that why he had insisted on waiting until midnight, refusing her repeated pleas to meet earlier?

It reminded her of how he had pretended to miss her graduation only to appear with a surprise.

"You are too much, Sir. I was genuinely so upset because I truly believed you wouldn't come."

Giselle, forgetting that she was now an adult, pouted like a child as she drew near. When she was within a step of him, she unfolded her arms, which had been crossed over her chest, and asked,

"I'm the first one, right?"

Yes, Sir, you are the first.

With flushed cheeks, Giselle nodded, a round smile blossoming on her face.

"Congratulations on becoming an adult, my..." "Heuk...."

She couldn't hear what he called her because his words trailed off into a murmur. But to Giselle, those details didn't matter right then.

Sir simply hugged me.

He had held out his hand to Giselle, congratulating her. She thought he was going to pat her shoulder or her head, as he usually did.

He wrapped one arm around her waist, pulled her in, and embraced her. Their bodies pressed tightly together.

Since returning from the battlefield, he hadn't hugged her like this, in such intimate contact. Even on her graduation day, she had been the one to run into his arms, not the other way around.

Bump. Bump.

His warmth always made her heart race. But this time, it wasn't just a flutter of excitement.

Why... why is he doing this?

He hugged her so tightly that her chest not only touched his but was pressed against it. If she could feel it, surely he could too. Yet, he didn't loosen his grip.

The hand on her shoulder slowly slid down her arm. His hand, which had been resting on her lower back, moved upward, slipping beneath her cardigan.

What do I do?

Her face was burning. While the knitted fabric cushioned his touch on her arms, his hand on her back seemed to be touching bare skin, given the thinness of the material. Goosebumps rose on her skin.

This... this is strange.

It wasn't just the proximity or the way he was touching her; it was the duration of the embrace, much longer than usual.

He buried his nose in her hair, inhaled deeply, and exhaled slowly, repeating the action several times. At first, it felt affectionate, like a tender embrace. But...

Is this really just affection?

It began to feel unfamiliar. The thought caused her body to move before her mind could process it. She tried to push him away.

"Giselle, I am no longer your guardian."

At that sudden comment, her hands, which had been pressing against his shoulders, lost their strength.

...What does that mean?

She understood the literal meaning. Now that she was of age, he was no longer her legal guardian.

It was the last thing she wanted to hear today, even though it was an undeniable fact.

What perplexed Giselle was why he felt the need to mention it at that moment. What could he possibly be trying to say?

Especially as he released her from his arms.

Especially by pulling away from her first.

As if to make it clear that they were now strangers.

"Sir..."

Giselle urgently hugged him again.

"Uh, Giselle? What's wrong?"

This time, she clung tightly to him, preventing him from pulling away.

Even if you touch me in a way that feels unfamiliar or suspicious, I don't care. Just don't abandon me.

At some point, he stopped trying to push her away. She felt his gaze on the top of her head. He remained silent, looking down at her.

What is he thinking?

She waited anxiously, as if expecting a death sentence, for him to break the silence.

"That's not right."

After a short pause, she heard a murmur that sounded like he was speaking to himself. She thought he was scolding her for acting so desperately, but...

"M-my puppy."

Edwin gently stroked her back.

"Did you think I would kick you out of my house now that I am no longer obligated to care for you?" "...Isn't that the case?" "I've already told you that would never happen. Why are you acting like this when you know better?" "Really? It's not true, is it?"

Only then did Giselle relax the arms that had tightly encircled him. She looked up and met his eyes, catching the slightly disheartened expression on his face.

"I'm not your daughter, after all."

It was the same look he had given her when she had spoken those words not long ago.

"What I meant was, now that I am no longer your guardian, don't you dare think you'll get out of my nagging. Drinking and staying out past midnight will only be permitted tonight." "Oh..."

Giselle flushed and quickly slipped out of his embrace.

"Sit down before this stubborn and narrow-minded gentleman takes offense and goes back on his word." "I'm sorry."

She felt utterly mortified. She had doubted him, clung to him thinking he might abandon her, and even decided to accept any form of contact just to avoid being discarded... when he had no such intentions at all. Unable to meet his eyes, she lowered her head.

Wait a minute...

As she quietly took a seat next to him, something suddenly struck her.

Then what was that earlier? The hugging and touching?

Had she overreacted again? Perhaps he had simply been caught up in the sentimentality of seeing the child he raised become an adult, which prompted a longer, more affectionate embrace than usual. Could it be that her impure perspective had made it seem inappropriate?

Ugh...

That unsettling feeling was soon drowned out by the effects of alcohol. As Edwin sat down cross-legged, watching Giselle experience her first sip of champagne, he asked,

"Miss Bishop, how does the champagne taste? Is it what you expected?"

It's disappointing.

It was bitter, sour, astringent, and spicy. Although it was sweet, it wasn't the kind of sweetness Giselle had imagined.

It wasn't the first time she had tasted alcohol. During her time in the barracks, the soldiers had given her a sip of hard liquor.

They hadn't forced her; rather, she had begged them out of curiosity until they relented. Unfortunately, those soldiers had been severely reprimanded by the terrifying commander and placed under arrest.

After that, no one offered Giselle alcohol again, and she herself stopped asking.

It had been absolutely horrible.

It had been so bitter and strong that she initially suspected they had given her poison.

Why do people drink such things?

Since then, she had sworn off hard liquor.

But wine and champagne—grape-based drinks—were a different story. Watching women savor them and marvel at their taste at parties and in books had always piqued her curiosity.

She thought champagne would be sweet.

Tap, tap.

Edwin drummed his fingers against the back of the sofa, urging her to answer.

"Well? Is the taste worth the challenge of defying me and secretly trying alcohol in the past?"

See? It's not good. Yet you still didn't listen to me...

She could already hear the scolding he would unleash. She wasn't about to give him the ammunition herself.

"It's delicious." "Is that all? How exactly is it delicious?" "...Wait a moment."

Out of stubbornness, she took another sip, holding it in her mouth before slowly swallowing. She thought perhaps she would discover a pleasant flavor she had missed the first time. Instead, the unpleasant tastes became even more pronounced.

Giselle barely managed to suppress a grimace and looked around. From Edwin's perspective, it must have looked like she was savoring the taste. In reality, she was frantically searching for words.

How to describe the taste of champagne?

She recalled being taught in school how to express her thoughts on music and art. But no one had taught her how to express the taste of alcohol.

"Well..."

After much deliberation, she concluded,

"It tastes... grown-up."

It was her way of admitting it didn't taste good.

Edwi chuckled knowingly and took the glass from her hand.

I thought he would tell me to stop drinking...

Instead, he poured some of the leftover honey from her jasmine tea into the champagne glass, stirred it well with a teaspoon, and handed it back.

"How about now?" "Now it's drinkable."

Drinkable, not delicious. Still, Giselle did not let go of the glass. Not out of stubbornness, but because of the price.

This single bottle costs more than the allowance I earned as a nanny!

Although she was raised like a wealthy young lady, she was the daughter of poor peasants. She wasn't going to waste something this expensive.

I have to finish it because it's too valuable.

So one glass led to another, and another, but the bottle was still far from empty. It didn't help that Edwin wasn't drinking with her.

Although he had poured himself a glass of champagne, he only used it to clink glasses with her and never took a sip.

"Sir, why aren't you drinking?" "I brought it for you to drink."

The more impossible it became to let it be. However, as she continued drinking, her tongue must have adapted: what was previously only tolerable champagne with honey could now be drunk plain.

Or maybe I'm just so drunk my taste buds have gone numb...

It was her first time being drunk. Everything seemed overly sharp and blurred all at once. Watching Edwin  explore her bedroom felt even more dreamlike than before.

"This is my first time here, isn't it..."

Edwin  murmured to himself as he pulled the thick curtains over the window. The already drawn lace curtains were enough to block the glaring morning sunlight.

"You've never seen anything like this, have you?..."

This time, he muttered as he wound the cord that tied the thick curtains around his hand. Giselle's cheeks flushed.

The curtains, with their sky-blue background embroidered with large red rose vines and thick pleated ruffles, looked so dated and garish.

Edwin had surely never seen anything like this anywhere.

She wanted to grab her thirteen-year-old self, who had once thought they were pretty, and shake her until her thoughts straightened out.

I should have listened when they suggested redecorating.

Even if redecorating the whole room hadn't been possible in a few days, she could have at least replaced the childish and tacky bedding and curtains.

I didn't know Sir was coming.

If she had known he would end up idly looking at the pink, ruffled bedding, she would have gotten rid of it sooner.

Creak.

Giselle's eyebrows shot up. Edwin had perched on the edge of the bed.

"What's underneath this room?" "The gallery." "Ah, right. The bed is quite flimsy. It might make noise."

But the bed had never creaked when Giselle used it. It must be because Edwin 's build was exceptional.

Creak.

Even when he rested his elbows on his knees, leaning forward with his chin in one hand, the bed groaned under his weight.

"Hmm...."

Edwin's gaze fell on the bedside table. His fingers reached out to something and picked it up. Giselle paled as she realized it was one of the books perfectly aligned on the table.

My romance novel!

It was one of those painfully predictable romances she had devoured when she was about thirteen.

What were you thinking?

She wanted to question her younger self one more time. And her current self, who hadn't put it away, deserved a reprimand too.

"Sir...." "You read this sort of thing before bed?" "Well... I used to, but... not anymore." "What's wrong with it?"

Edwin frowned deeply as he leafed through the book, scrutinizing its contents.

"Is there anything inappropriate for children in here?" "There is not!"

At most, there might be a kissing scene; it was a young adult book, after all.

Well, except that midway through the story, the female lead, carrying the male lead's child in her womb despite their forbidden relationship, runs away. So, although it's clear they did more than just kiss, none of it was shown to the reader.

He threw her onto the bed. The next morning, she woke up alone. Her body ached from being overworked by him the night before.

That was it—a vague hint.

But Sir, as if convinced she had secretly bought an indecent book, began to pore over the novel with a serious expression.

Please... don't....

Although she knew snatching it away would only make her look guilty of buying something inappropriate, Giselle almost tore it from his hands.

It's the book I imagined with Sir and me...

She was incredibly grateful that she hadn't developed the habit of doodling in books. At least she wouldn't be discovered, so she would only have to deal with her embarrassment privately. But why was it so hard to bear?

Flick.

But then, why did he suddenly smile? Giselle poured more alcohol down her burning throat.

Thud.

Edwin flipped through the book to the very end before closing it.

"I'm right, aren't I?"

He set the book on the side table, nodded to himself, and stood up from where he had been reclining against the bed. For a moment, it looked like he was heading to inspect the desk, but instead, Edwin  opened the door right next to the bed and disappeared into the darkness.

That's my dressing room.

Click.

As Giselle blinked at the doorway, where light began to spill, her cheeks suddenly flushed.

I hope I didn't leave my underwear in there.

She couldn't recall. Just as she set down her glass and started to stand up, intending to check the dressing room—

Click.

The light went out, and Edwin  returned to the bedroom. Between his long fingers was a short object, clenched as if it were a cigar.

It wasn't until Edwin  sat down next to her that Giselle realized what the glistening gold object was.

My lipstick?

He bit the cap end as if it really were a cigar. The stick slid out of its casing. It was the brightest red lipstick among the ones Edwin  had gifted her.

Depending on the observer, it could look either sensual or vulgar.

In any case, Giselle did not want to be viewed as that kind of woman. That's why she had never used it. The lipstick, still in its pristine state, now sat in Edwin's hand.

Why did he take it?

Before the bewildered Giselle could say anything, Edwin  spat out the cap he had in his mouth.

Thud.

The cap fell to the floor, rolling untidily before coming to a halt. It was an act that seemed at odds with Edwin's usual meticulous demeanor, appearing quite reckless.

"Giselle, look at me."

As Giselle stared in astonishment at the floor, his hand slid under her chin. There was no time to comply before she was forced to oblige.

She flinched. Giselle instinctively tried to draw back, but his hand did not retreat, firmly following her movements until it gripped her chin.

Was it because her chin was small or because his hand was large?

With one hand, he seemed to completely engulf her chin, turning her face toward him. Even when she was already looking at him, Edwin didn't let go.

He stared intently at her, as if scrutinizing her soul. Perhaps it was the dimness of the room, but his deep blue eyes looked like an abyss.

She had always thought Edwin's  eyes resembled the sky just before dawn, like the one she had seen when she first met him.

But this was the first time his gaze reminded her of an abyss. She felt herself being pulled into it. If she tried to flee, that dark blue water might leap out, engulf her, and drag her down.

To the unknown depths where who knows what lurked.

But if what lurks at the bottom of that abyss is what I desire...

Giselle wouldn't let herself be dragged; she would willingly throw herself in.

Her breathing trembled, giving away the uncontrollable shivers in her chest despite her effort to suppress them.

Edwin , who had been observing her, raised one eyebrow. Then, his lips curved into a crooked smile, lifting just one corner.

What did that sneer mean?

Her confused daze, alcohol-induced and warm, brought her back to her senses. Observing his face, now so unlike himself, the meaning of her trembling changed.

Am I imagining things because I'm drunk?

She might be. After one blink, that cold twist in his expression vanished without a trace. What remained was the same stern yet subtly kind Sir she had always known.

"Have you been a good girl all this time?"

This question was the quintessential him. It would have been perfect, in fact, if it weren't for the bright red lipstick he held up in front of her face while still holding her chin.

"What... do you mean?" "I told you not to become a woman too soon."

The sudden comment made Giselle blink in surprise.

Was he serious or joking?

For an orphan, reading the room was a matter of survival. Giselle, who was usually adept at accurately interpreting Edwin's moods, now found him unreadable, as if he were someone she had never known.

Unable to comprehend, she merely nodded her head, looking at the crimson tip held between them.

Since the day Edwin spoke those words, she had never colored her lips like this nor involved herself with any man.

She had thought that was enough to say she had followed his words.

"You don't even know what I meant by that, do you?"

Had she been wrong?

Giselle blinked again, her eyes wide.

She had assumed he meant his reluctance to let go of the girl he cherished, or his uneasiness about her transition to adulthood. But that wasn't it?

As she looked at him in a daze, his thumb, which had been gripping her chin, moved to lightly brush her soft cheek, tracing a slow arc before pressing down on her lower lip.

The fleshiness of the lip yielded, parting her tightly closed lips. Once separated, the thumb retreated and rested near her ear.

Giselle waited silently, suppressing her unease.

What would touch her lips next?

Lipstick.

Disappointing.

A smooth stick pressed down on her lower lip, gently smearing it. Even a single stroke left a vivid color, the lipstick dragged across her plump lip, leaving it boldly painted. Without a doubt, her lips were now crimson.

It must have looked either sensual or vulgar—neither of which she desired. But she didn't dare tell him to stop.

"I told you not to become a woman yet because the time wasn't right. But now you want to give that chance to another man, when I've been waiting to make you one."

Through lips pressed together by the carmine color, Giselle let out a shaky breath, filled with elation.

Thud

Edwin  set the lipstick down on the table and asked,

"Tell me. Did you kiss that shameless rogue?" "No."

Giselle tried to shake her head in response, but the firm grip on her chin prevented it.

"Any other man?" "No." "Am I the first?" "Yes!"

Please, be the first, Sir.

Even before she could plead, her wish was granted. The hand gripping her chin quickly slipped through her hair, grasping the back of her head and pulling her forward. Giselle obediently followed.

His lips pressed against hers, which she willingly offered.

If this was a dream, Giselle wished to die at that very instant. That way, she would never have to learn that this surreal ecstasy was nothing but a cruel illusion.

If that happened, Giselle would believe it until the moment her soul ceased to exist, leaving no trace of itself.

Sir kissed me. I shared my first kiss with him.

The lips that should have been bursting with joy at that moment were captured by another pair of lips, which were no longer her own. Not even gasped breaths were enough to release the overwhelming excitement welling up inside.

Emotions rushed in, overflowing, and eventually taking the form of a single tear that slipped from the corner of her eye.

Her trembling hands clung tightly to his shoulders, as if trying to hold onto that moment. His warmth always made Giselle shiver.

However, Giselle was now convinced that nothing could send more chills through her than the heat his lips transmitted to hers.

Since she began harboring unrequited feelings for him, she desperately yearned every time he gave her a kiss on the forehead or the back of her hand.

I wish I could feel Sir's lips on mine, just once.

But she had always believed it would never happen, so she confined her thoughts to secret imaginings. Every time she recalled the lingering sensations on the back of her hand, she would tell herself that this must be what it felt like when lips touched.

Like imagining the taste of champagne while drinking grape juice.

Both were forbidden to her as a child. One of them, she believed, would remain forbidden forever, even as an adult. That's why even imagining it made her feel guilty.

But comparing Edwin's kiss to champagne? Now that she had tasted both, placing them on the same plane felt like blasphemy.

The shamefully explicit sound, something she never thought her lips would produce with his, escaped between them. As soon as Edwin  pulled away, Giselle covered her mouth with both hands.

During the kiss, she had dared to keep her eyes open, memorizing the image of him kissing her with the utmost determination, etching it onto the film of her memory.

But now that their lips had parted, she didn't dare look at him. For an instant, she glimpsed his serene face, his lips stained an indecently rosy color. That fleeting moment brought back her reason, which desire had pushed aside.

I kissed Sir.

The kiss that had once felt sinful even in imagination was now a reality. And now, even her guilt was real.

This is blasphemy.

Her reasoning screamed inside her mind.

Kissing the man who had raised her since childhood was a blasphemy. A blasphemy against morality.

Chapter 40.

Now... what should I do?

The reason her heart was pounding was now twofold. Giselle was caught in a swirling eddy of emotions as incompatible as oil and water, leaving her confused, yet Edwin appeared completely unperturbed.

"Giselle, I am a man too. I'm sorry if you saw me as a father figure, but..." "No. I have never thought of you as my father."

Amidst the confusion, this was one thing she could deny without a trace of uncertainty.

Right. He is not even my real father.

Realizing this, a surge of defiance rose against herself for feeling guilty about something neither blood nor law bound them to.

She defiantly lifted her gaze, which had been fixed downward, to meet the man before her. His lips, stained with carmine, no longer seemed frivolous. Her reddened eyes, heated by fervor, perfectly complemented the trace of the kiss.

"Haa..."

The shallow breaths escaping through her red lips felt unbearably hot. She licked her lower lip with the tip of her tongue. She still did not know what his tongue would feel like.

Giselle was aware of something called a deep kiss that involved tongues. She only knew of it. Movies usually showed only the meeting of the lips, and people didn't engage in inappropriate acts like that on the street in films either.

She had once overheard a classmate who was dating explain what it was like and how it was done. The explanation of the method hadn't been easy to grasp, leaving her with only a vague recollection of how it supposedly felt.

She said it was like bells ringing in your head, fireworks bursting in your mouth, and butterflies fluttering in your chest.

Even that didn't make much sense to her, but one thing was certain: it was supposed to be an overwhelmingly sweet, beautiful, and exciting experience.

Would such a moment ever come for Sir and me?

The mere locking of lips had left her breathless, as if she were about to die, so anything beyond that might truly kill her from a heart attack. Wavering between wanting and not wanting to know that sensation, her tongue stayed put, and her mouth remained closed.

Edwin's Adam's apple visibly bobbed, like that of someone parched. What was he planning to do to her now? Giselle swallowed hard in sync with him.

"I want to be a man to you. Do you want to remain a girl for me forever?"

Transfixed, Giselle shook her head, staring at him.

"Shall I make you a woman?"

Without even contemplating what becoming a woman entailed, Giselle instinctively nodded.

"You've given your permission."

Edwin's hand reached for the back of her head. But before he could touch it, Giselle closed the gap, pressing her lips to his first. This time, she initiated the kiss.

Once the threshold is crossed, the second time feels easier and bolder.

The mere brush of lips felt inadequate. Giselle lightly pressed his lips between hers, making noises as she kissed and stole kisses. The more she sampled his lips, the thirstier she became, as if she were swallowing seawater.

Didn't he feel the same way? He merely stroked her back sweetly as she clung to him, accepting her increasingly impatient kisses at a leisurely pace. Shame washed over her at the thought that she was the only one who was this desperate.

Peck.

"Haa, mm..."

But when their lips parted, he abruptly changed. He grabbed the back of her head and yanked her lips to his with enough force to part them.

Her gasped cry spilled into his mouth. His rough breath countered with a thrust, followed by the invasion of his tongue, which caused Giselle's sleepy, closed eyes to snap open.

That deep kiss she had only heard about...

The sensation was nothing like what she had imagined.

His tongue traced her teeth and gums before brushing the delicate inner flesh of her cheek. When it rubbed against her unmoving tongue, she felt a shiver run through her.

It wasn't sweet, nor was it beautiful. It was terrifying, like a village girl being chased by soldiers.

Edwin's lips parted after what felt like an eternity, leaving her stunned. But the kiss wasn't over.

"Stick out your tongue."

What was he trying to do?

Embarrassed and afraid, Giselle hesitated. Edwin , who had been looking at her with burning eyes, lightly tapped her closed lips, prompting her to open them. When she didn't comply, he chuckled softly as if humoring a child.

"Didn't you say you wanted to become a woman?"

Though she blushed deeply and nodded, she still didn't open her mouth. She didn't understand what sticking out her tongue had to do with becoming a woman.

"It seems you don't understand..."

His hand, which had been on the back of her head, began tracing its way down her back.

"...what it means to become my mistress."

Mistress?

The mere thought of him seeing her as a woman was exhilarating to the point of madness, but mistress?

Lost in his words, she didn't realize his hand reached her waist, pulling her closer. Obediently, she allowed herself to be drawn in, her back pressed against his front.

He was hugging her from behind, as lovers do. Giselle knew what it meant to be lovers.

"Shall I teach you?"

Although she thought there was no need for lessons, if Edwin  was willing to teach her, she would gladly let him guide her. Giselle nodded, oblivious to how differently he might define being lovers.

Huh...?

His hands, which had been resting on her waist, slid upward under the cardigan. Giselle's eyes widened.

"Sir? Wait a moment..."

Before she could finish the sentence, his hands slid unhesitatingly under her nightgown, grasping her.

He had grabbed her breasts.

"Ah!"

Startled, she tried to pull away, but his hands held her firmly, pulling her back down. Not only did he refuse to let go, but he boldly massaged her chest, whispering in her ear.

"This is what it means."

She had never imagined it.

To be his mistress, she had thought, meant gaining the right to hug and kiss him while keeping their relationship a secret.

"Ha!"

When he pinched and tugged at her nipples as if trying to make them stand up, Giselle's entire body shuddered.

"Sir..."

That didn't mean Giselle was entirely ignorant of the intimate affairs between lovers. However, she had never expected Edwin , who had always treated her like a child, to want such things from her so soon.

"This is too fast, isn't it?"

Her thin voice intermittently cracked as she tried to suppress the moans that threatened to escape every time he touched her.

"I've waited long enough. I've held myself back just for today." "Ah, hnn!" "I can't hold back anymore."

This is not like Edwin.

The cardigan she had put on to cover her chest was now completely useless, its fabric pushed up and bulging around his thick fingers. Giselle didn't know what to do as the distorted shapes kept shifting.

Sir is doing indecent things to me.

His lips, which had been nibbling at her earlobe, let out a low moan.

Sir is making lewd sounds.

"Hah, Giselle, I am a man too." "Ah...."

She knew. She had seen him as a man, too. But she had never imagined him as the type of man who would grope a woman's chest as if trying to crush it, overcome by excitement to the point of moaning. That didn't fit the reserved image of Edwin  she had known.

The Edwin who had scorned those consumed by lust was now acting like someone who saw only desire when it came to her. This was not the Edwin she knew.

"Hnn, Sir...."

Giselle began to feel not only unfamiliarity but fear. She tried to pull his hand out from under her nightgown, but he wouldn't budge.

"Stop...." "You are not a child anymore. You are an adult." "But still, ah!"

His fingers had found her hardened peak and were now pinching and rubbing it. A strange whimper threatened to escape her lips, Giselle quickly shut her mouth.

"Giselle, it's alright. It's me, your Sir."

That's what's strange.

She couldn't stand the strange situation of Edwin touching her breasts and becoming aroused. She tried to pull away from him again, but he wouldn't let go. Her cardigan was pulled to the sides, the buttons popping off one by one with a faint snap.

Giselle couldn't help but see it. Under the thin white fabric, two veiny hands were kneading the pale flesh roughly. Her excited nipples, peeking out between his fingers, looked ready to pierce the fabric at any moment.

The thought of having to hide made her instinctively curl up, but she ended up huddling back into his arms.

"That's right."

As if praising her, he kissed her forehead, while his fingers deliberately played with the stiff, pink buds.

*

Continue in Part 2!!


